[Clinical study of the imaging validity in detecting infiltration of the mesenteric-portal axis in pancreatic carcinoma].The authors examine the value of different imaging techniques (CT, MRI) in the diagnosis of the involvement of the mesenteric-portal vessels in the pancreatic cancer. In 20 jaundiced patients they obtained in all cases a correct diagnosis about the etiology of the jaundice. The correspondence of the preoperative imaging study with the involvement of the mesenteric-portal vessels was respectively 73% for the CT and 78% for the MRI. In all cases the intra-operative echography allowed a correct diagnosis of the vascular involvement.Multimodality staging optimizes resectability in patients with pancreatic and ampullary cancer.Few patients with pancreatic cancer have resectable disease at the time of diagnosis, and a variety of nonsurgical techniques are available to provide effective palliation of jaundice and pain. Accurate preoperative staging is essential to identify patients with unresectable disease, thereby minimizing unnecessary surgery. Currently used diagnostic tests include contrast-enhanced computerized tomography (CT), visceral angiography, endoscopic ultrasound, and laparoscopy, but their utility remains controversial. To evaluate the accuracy of these various diagnostic tests, 30 consecutive patients with histologically proven pancreatic or ampullary adenocarcinoma treated between 1992 and 1996 were evaluated. All 30 patients had contrast-enhanced CT and laparoscopy, 22 patients (73%) had visceral angiography, and 16 patients (53%) had endoscopic ultrasound. Individual and combined predictive values of resectability and unresectability as well as the sensitivities and specificities were determined for all diagnostic tests and compared with intraoperative findings. When CT, visceral angiography, and laparoscopy were combined, the predictive values of resectability and unresectability were 75 and 90 per cent, respectively, with a sensitivity of 75 per cent and a specificity of 90 per cent. Therefore, the combined use of selected diagnostic tests proved more effective than any single diagnostic test for accurately staging patients with pancreatic head and ampullary cancers and should be considered to minimize unnecessary surgery.The role of (18)fluoro-deoxyglucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography in resectable pancreatic cancer.The role of (18)fluoro-deoxyglucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography in pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma is debated. We retrospectively assessed the value of (18)fluoro-deoxyglucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography in addition to conventional imaging as a staging modality in pancreatic cancer.(18)Fluoro-deoxyglucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography was performed in 72 patients with resectable pancreatic carcinoma after multi-detector computed tomography positron emission tomography was considered positive for a maximum standardized uptake value >3.Overall, 21% of patients had a maximum standardized uptake value ≤ 3, and 60% of those had undergone neoadjuvant treatment (P=0.0001). Furthermore, 11% of patients were spared unwarranted surgery since positron emission tomography/computed tomography detected metastatic disease. All liver metastases were subsequently identified with contrast-enhanced ultrasound. Sensitivity and specificity of positron emission tomography/computed tomography for distant metastases were 78% and 100%. The median CA19.9 concentration was 48.8 U/mL for the entire cohort and 292 U/mL for metastatic patients (P=0.112).The widespread application of (18)fluoro-deoxyglucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography in patients with resectable pancreatic carcinoma seems not justified. It should be considered in selected patients at higher risk of metastatic disease (i.e. CA19.9>200 U/mL) after undergoing other imaging tests. Neoadjuvant treatment is significantly associated with low metabolic activity, limiting the value of positron emission tomography in this setting.Preoperative locoregional re-evaluation by endoscopic ultrasound in pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma after neoadjuvant chemoradiation.The accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) for the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma (PDA) has been confirmed. Chemo-radiotherpay (CRT) induces tumor changes which can limit the accuracy of EUS. The aim of our study was to analyze the efficacy of EUS following neoadjuvant CRT comparing findings with the pathology results.From November 1996 to October 2003, 45 patients with histologically proven and EUS-staged PDA were treated with neo-adjuvant CRT and radical surgery. All were restaged before surgery using both EUS and computed tomography. Fifteen patients were found to have developed distant metastases. Thirty patients finally underwent pancreaticoduodenectomy (N=24) or distal pancreatectomy (N=6).Following CRT, tumor stage was correctly assessed in 12 patients (40%). The most frequent misinterpretation was overestimation of tumor size (N=13, 43.3%). Locoregional vascular invasion of veins was suspected by EUS in 13 patients (43.3%) but surgical findings and the histological examination were both negative. Node status was correctly assessed in 27 patients (90%) but nodal involvement was found on the histological specimen in only 3 patients.Preoperative EUS after neoadjuvant CRT for PDA does not enable reliable definitive selection of patients for surgery, probably due to radiation-induced pancreatic changes.Positron emission tomography does not add to computed tomography for the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer.Positron emission tomography (PET) has been proposed for pancreatic cancer diagnosis and staging.112 patients with suspected pancreatic cancer underwent 18F-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose gamma camera PET and computed tomography (CT), of whom 62 also had laparoscopic ultrasonography and 70 underwent abdominal exploration for potential resection. The final diagnosis was malignancy in 78 and benign disease in 34 patients (25 with chronic pancreatitis).The diagnostic sensitivity and specificity for PET were 73 and 60% compared to 89 and 65% for CT respectively (Cohen's kappa = 0.59). In 30 patients CT was equivocal with cancer in 14 and benign disease in 16. PET correctly diagnosed 13 of these patients (cancer in 6 and benign disease in 7), interpreted 4 as equivocal (cancer in 3 and benign disease in 1) but was incorrect in the remaining 13 patients (cancer in 5 and benign disease in 8). The sensitivity and specificity for detecting small volume metastatic disease were 20 and 94% for CT and 22 and 91% for PET, respectively.PET had a similar accuracy to that of CT for imaging pancreatic cancer but it did not provide any additional information in patients with equivocal CT findings and currently would seem of little benefit for the staging of pancreatic cancer.Vascular invasion in pancreatic cancer: evaluation of endoscopic ultrasonography, computed tomography, ultrasonography, and angiography.Current methods for detecting vascular invasion in pancreatic cancer can be inaccurate, invasive, and expensive. The aim of this study is to assess the value of current imaging modalities in determining vascular invasion by pancreatic cancer.The results of Endoscopic Ultrasonography (EUS), Computed Tomography (CT), Ultrasonography (US), and Angiography performed in 170 patients, suffering from pancreatic cancer, were retrospectively studied and correlated with intra-operative findings and surgical anatomopathological diagnosis after resection. We assessed sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy for detecting vascular invasion.EUS turned out to be the most reliable imaging technique for detecting vascular invasion in pancreatic cancer, with a sensitivity of 55%, specificity of 90%, positive predictive value of 61.1%, negative predictive value of 87.5%, and accuracy of 82.2%. CT results were 39.4%, 90%, 52%, 84.4%, and 79.1% for the respective categories, with however, better results with multislice CT. The US results were 3.7% for the sensitivity, 96.3% for the specificity, 25% for the positive predictive value, 75.2% for the negative predictive value, and 73.4% for the accuracy. For angiography, the sensitivity, the specificity, the positive predictive value, the negative predictive value, and the accuracy were 52.6%, 72.3%, 43.5%, 79.1%, and 66.7% respectively.In this study, EUS was the most valuable imaging modality in assessing vascular invasion (especially for venous invasion) for pancreatic cancer, with an accuracy of more than 80%. A further prospective study should be carried out to evaluate the combination of imaging modalities for the detection of vascular involvement, especially with multi-slice CT which almost reached the performances obtained by EUS.Impact of endoscopic ultrasound with fine-needle aspiration on the surgical management of pancreatic cancer.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) with EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) enables one to visualize the pancreas and surrounding structures and can provide access for FNA of those structures that appear suspicious for tumor.From 1993 to 1995, 50 patients suspected of having pancreatic cancer underwent EUS/EUS-FNA and abdominal computed tomography (CT). Malignancy was found in 30 (60%) cases, which included 24 (48%) pancreatic adenocarcinomas.Endoscopic ultrasound/EUS-FNA identified 26 of the 30 malignancies (85%) and 21 of the 24 pancreatic adenocarcinomas (88%), with no false positives. Thirteen of the 24 pancreatic cancer patients had lymph nodes that were sampled with EUS/EUS-FNA. Seven of these 13 patients (62%) were found to have metastatic spread to lymph nodes. Operations were performed on 11 of the pancreatic cancer patients. Of these 11, the 5 that were predicted to be resectable by EUS/EUS-FNA underwent successful resection. Of the 6 predicted to be unresectable, 5 had palliative biliary bypasses, and 1 had a grossly positive margin of resection.Endoscopic ultrasound/EUS-FNA can identify patients for curative surgical resection. It can also preoperatively identify patients with regional nodal disease for inclusion in appropriately designed clinical trials.The role of endoscopy in the treatment, management, and personalization of pancreatic cancer.Preoperative staging and tumor resectability assessment of pancreatic cancer: prospective study comparing endoscopic ultrasonography, helical computed tomography, magnetic resonance imaging, and angiography.The objective of this study was to evaluate prospectively the efficacy of different strategies based on endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS), helical computed tomography (CT), magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), and angiography (A) in the staging and tumor resectability assessment of pancreatic cancer.All consecutive patients with pancreatic carcinoma judged fit for laparotomy were studied by EUS, CT, MRI, and A. Results of each of the imaging techniques regarding primary tumor, locoregional extension, lymph-node involvement, vascular invasion, distant metastases, tumor TNM stage, and tumor resectability were compared with the surgical findings. Univariate, logistic regression, decision, and cost minimization analyses were performed.Sixty-two patients with pancreatic cancer were included. Helical CT had the highest accuracy in assessing extent of primary tumor (73%), locoregional extension (74%), vascular invasion (83%), distant metastases (88%), tumor TNM stage (46%), and tumor resectability (83%), whereas EUS had the highest accuracy in assessing tumor size (r = 0.85) and lymph node involvement (65%). The decision analysis demonstrated that the best strategy to assess tumor resectability was based on CT or EUS as initial test, followed by the alternative technique in those potentially resectable cases. Cost minimization analysis favored the sequential strategy in which EUS was used as a confirmatory technique in those patients in whom helical CT suggested resectability of the tumor.Helical CT and EUS are the most useful individual imaging techniques in the staging of pancreatic cancer. In those cases with potentially resectable tumors a sequential approach consisting of helical CT as an initial test and EUS as a confirmatory technique seems to be the most reliable and cost minimization strategy.An MRI-driven practice: a new perspective on MRI for the evaluation of adenocarcinoma of the head of the pancreas.The purpose of the study was to describe the MRI-driven management of masses at the head of the pancreas.The main outcome measure was tumor resectability.A retrospective review of prospective radiographic diagnoses was undertaken.Between 2004 and 2008, we have treated 124 patients for a radiographic diagnosis of adenocarcinoma of the head of the pancreas. This diagnosis was correct in 96.0% of the time. MRI was 100% sensitive in determining resectability, 73.2-78.9% specific, and had an overall accuracy of 86.3-87.5%. MRI could detect venous and arterial involvement with 95% and 95.9% accuracy, respectively, and missed only six metastases.MRI is a useful tool in the preoperative imaging of pancreatic head lesions that is highly sensitive and very specific for resectable disease. Prospective trials of MRI in this setting are indicated.Preoperative assessment of blood vessel involvement in patients with pancreatic cancer.The major prerequisite for resection of a pancreatic tumor is non-involvement of large blood vessels. Preoperative assessment of blood vessel infiltration may prevent unnecessary surgery. The aim of our study was to investigate the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in diagnosis of pancreatic cancer and in preoperative staging. Thirteen patients (7 females, 6 males; mean age 64 years) with a pancreatic tumor, but no evidence of distant metastases, underwent EUS and computerized tomography (CT) in order to assess blood vessel involvement by the tumor. The results were compared with intraoperative findings in 12 patients and with postmortem findings in 1 patient. A tumor was demonstrated by EUS in 12 patients and was confirmed at surgery in all 12 patients. In one patient no tumor was demonstrated by EUS, although a tumor was visible by CT; no tumor was found at surgery. In two patients CT failed to demonstrate a pancreatic tumor that was demonstrated by EUS; at surgery a tumor was detected in both patients. EUS detected blood vessel involvement in seven patients, which was confirmed at surgery in six of them. In the other six patients surgery confirmed the EUS finding of no blood vessel involvement. CT detected blood vessel involvement in two patients only. The overall accuracy of EUS and CT for detecting the tumor was 100% and 77% respectively, and for blood vessel involvement 92% and 61% respectively. In conclusion, EUS is an accurate procedure for preoperative assessment of blood vessel involvement in patients with pancreatic cancer. This procedure may enable the selection of those patients who may benefit from surgery, and should be part of the evaluation of patients with pancreatic cancer who are candidates for curative surgery.The role of routine preoperative EUS when performed after contrast enhanced CT in the diagnostic work-up in patients suspected of pancreatic or periampullary cancer.In patients suspected of pancreatic or periampullary cancer, abdominal contrast-enhanced computed tomography (CT) is the standard diagnostic modality. A supplementary endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is often performed, although there is only limited evidence of its additional diagnostic value. The aim of the study is to evaluate the additional diagnostic value of EUS over CT in deciding on exploratory laparotomy in patients suspected of pancreatic or periampullary cancer.We retrospectively analyzed 86 consecutive patients who routinely underwent CT and EUS before exploratory laparotomy with or without pancreatoduodenectomy for suspected pancreatic or periampullary carcinoma between 2007 and 2010. Primary outcomes were visibility of a mass, resectability on CT/EUS and resection with curative intent.A mass was visible on CT in 72/86 (84%) patients. In these 72 patients, EUS demonstrated a mass in 64/72 (89%) patients. Resectability was accurately predicted by CT in 65/72 (90%) and by EUS in 58/72 (81%) patients. In 14/86 (16%) patients no mass was seen on CT. EUS showed a mass in 12/14 (86%) of these patients. A malignant lesion was histological proven in 11/12 (92%) of these patients. Overall, resectability was accurately predicted by CT and EUS in 90% (77/86) and 84% (72/86), respectively.In patients with a visible mass on CT, suspected for pancreatic or periampullary cancer, EUS has no additional diagnostic value, does not influence the decision to perform laparotomy and should therefore not be performed routinely. In patients without a visible mass on CT, EUS is useful to confirm the presence of a tumor.Selective use of endoscopic ultrasound in the evaluation of carcinomas of the pancreatic head.The aims of this study were to assess the role of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) in the evaluation of adenocarcinoma of the head of the pancreas in cases of diagnostic dilemma and to determine the strength of agreement between perceived pre-operative stage as determined by computerised tomography (CT) and EUS and histopathological stage.Patients undergoing pancreatic EUS were identified from a computerised radiology database. The strengths of agreement between the radiological and histopathological stages were determined by the weighted kappa (Kw) statistic.Fifty-eight patients were identified. Of 37 patients with a pancreatic head mass on prior imaging, 32 had a diagnosis of adenocarcinoma confirmed by EUS, as did 11 of 21 patients with suspicious pancreatic head lesions. Twenty-five of 43 patients were deemed to have resectable carcinomas, and 2 patients had resectable mucinous lesions. In comparing CT and EUS in the 25 patients undergoing resection, the Kw for T and N stages was 0.250 (p = 0.05) and -0.080 (p = 0.288), respectively, for CT, compared with 0.738 (p = 0.0001) and 0.606 (p = 0.0001), respectively, for EUS.EUS was effective in assessing the resectability of pancreatic head adenocarcinomas. Furthermore, EUS held a significant 3-fold advantage over CT with regard to T stage and an even higher significant advantage with regard to N stage.[Comparison of endoscopic ultrasonography with computer-assisted tomography in the determination of preoperative stage and resectability of pancreatic and ampullary cancers].To study and compare the accuracy and sensitivity of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and CT scaning in determination of preoperative stage and vascular invasion by pancreatic and ampullary cancers.Fourty-two pancreatic cancer patients and 18 ampullary cancer patients were studied. With patients prepared according to conventional endoscopy, Olympus EUM-30 scope 1 set with a side view and 360 degrees rotate and switchable scanning probe [ultrasound frequency (7.5/12 MHz)], was introduced to the descending duodenum through the esophagus. Gas within the duodenum and stomach was aspirated. Then, in order to to facilitate ultrasound transmission, 200 ml deaerated water was injected into the duodenum and 500 ml into the stomach to distend it. The structures of each part of pancreatic head and ampullary together with surrounding vessels were scanned. Then, the scope was withdrawn to the gastric antrum, body and fundus gradually, while the pancreatic body and tail were scanned.Between Apr. 1996 to May 2004, a total of 42 pancreatic cancer patients and 18 ampullary cancer patients were examined by EUS. Meanwhile, all these 58 patients received preoperative CT scaning. The results of stage and vascular invasion determined by EUS in this series were as following; pancreatic cancer group (n = 42): accuracy in T2-4 stage was 100.0% (5/5), 75.0% (9/12) and 48.0% (12/25), respectively; ampullary cancer group (n = 18): T1-4 stage was 75.0% (3/4), 66.7% (2/3), 75.0% (6/8) and 33.3% (1/3), respectively; the accuracy in N stage: P-group: 80.0% in N1 (4/5), 90.0% in N0 (9/10); A-group: 50.0% in N1 (3/6), 91.0% in N0 (10/11). The sensitivity, specificity of vascular invasion, resectability and unresectablilty determined by EUS and CT as compared with surgical findings during operation was 52.9% (9/17), 93.1% (27/29), 77.1% (27/35) and 81.8% (9/11) for EUS (n = 60), respectively; and 11.8% (2/17), 92.6% (25/27), 62.5% (25/40) and 50.0% (2/4) for CT (n = 58), respectively.Endoscopic ultrosonography being one of the best image examinations to determine the stage and vascular invasion for pancreatic and ampullary cancer paitients is able to detect small pancreatic or ampullary cancer less than 2.0 cm in diameter due to its high resolution; but can not detect the secondary multiple distal metastases such as spread into the liver, peritonium or hepatoduodenal ligament, etc. due to its ultrasound depth limitation.Outcomes after preoperative endoscopic ultrasonography and biopsy in patients undergoing distal pancreatectomy.This retrospective cohort study analyzes the potential risks associated with preoperative fine needle aspiration (FNA) biopsy guided by endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in patients undergoing distal pancreatectomy.Excluding 204 patients with acute or chronic pancreatitis and those with previous pancreatic resections, 230 consecutive patients with primary pancreatic neoplasms underwent elective distal pancreatectomy between 2002 and 2009. The most common indications were adenocarcinoma (28%), intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN; 20%), and endocrine neoplasms (17%). Two-way statistical comparisons were performed between patients who did (EUS(+)) or did not (EUS(-)) undergo preoperative EUS-FNA.Distal pancreatectomy was performed open in 118 patients (56%) and laparoscopically in 102 patients (44%). No differences were observed in age, sex, American Society of Anesthesiologists class, operative time, or blood loss between the EUS(+) (n = 179) and EUS(-) (n = 51) groups. Splenectomy was performed in 162 patients (70%) and was more common in the EUS(+) group. With the exception of adenocarcinoma (n = 57 [32%] EUS(+) vs n = 6 [12%] EUS(-); P < .01), the final pathologic diagnosis did not differ significantly between the EUS groups. Postoperative complications were more common in the EUS(+) patients with cystic neoplasms (43% vs 16% EUS(-); P = .04). EUS-FNA caused pancreatitis in 2 patients preoperatively. No differences in overall or recurrence-free survival were noted between cancer patients in the EUS groups. Patterns of tumor recurrence were not associated with EUS-FNA.Preoperative EUS-FNA is not associated with adverse perioperative or long-term outcomes in patients undergoing distal pancreatectomy for solid neoplasms of the pancreas. The potentially detrimental long-term impact of preoperative EUS-FNA in patients with resectable pancreatic adenocarcinoma was not observed, but will require additional study.[Preoperative diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer by endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS)--a comparative study with other diagnostic tools].Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS), ultrasonography (US), computed tomography (CT), and angiography (Angio) were performed in 26 patients with pancreatic cancer which were all resected. Preoperative findings of each diagnostic tools were compared with histological findings. In order to discuss the effectiveness of each body imagings, the preoperative staging of pancreatic cancer was evaluated in direct invasion to the anterior pancreatic capsule and stomach (S), direct invasion to the duodenum (D), direct invasion to the retroperitoneal adjacent vessels (Rp), and regional lymph node metastasis (N). The overall accuracy rate was 77% with EUS (50% with US, 38% with CT, 56% with Angio) in S, 81% with EUS (44% with US, 38% with CT, 63% with Angio) in D, 77% with EUS (58% with US, 42% with CT, 73% with Angio) in Rp, and 65% with EUS (58% with US, 38% with CT) in N. EUS revealed high accuracy rates because EUS images of the whole pancreas, surrounding organs and major vessels were clearly visualized through the gastroduodenal walls. Also, the accuracy rates of Angio in Rp and US in N were almost the same as those of EUS in Rp and N. However, it was difficult for every procedure to diagnose the retroperitoneal perineural invasion. From these results, EUS is one of the most beneficial procedures for detecting of the extent of cancer. EUS is expected to be popularized in the diagnosis and staging of the pancreatic cancer.MRI with mangafodipir trisodium in the detection and staging of pancreatic cancer.The purpose of this study was to compare prospectively computed tomography (CT) and magnetic resonance (MR) imaging before and after mangafodipir trisodium infusion for the detection and staging of focal pancreatic lesions. From November 1996 to October 1997, 43 consecutive patients suspected to have a focal pancreatic lesion were included in a phase III study. Triphasic helical CT was performed, as well as MRI at 1.5 T, as follows: axial T1-weighted (T1w) turbo spin echo (TSE), spectral presaturation with inversion recovery (SPIR) T1w TSE, T1w turbo field echo (TFE), and SPIR T2w TSE before and after mangafodipir trisodium (0.01 mmol/ml, 0.5 ml/kg) infusion. Imaging results were correlated with surgery, laparoscopy, laparoscopic ultrasound, and biopsy. Objective measurements were performed by measuring signal intensities (SIs) of lesion and parenchyma and calculating contrast indexes (CIs) and contrast-to-noise-ratios (CNRs) to assess the delineation of the tumor. SIs were correlated with four phantom standards with a known SI. Thirty-eight pancreatic adenocarcinomas were present, as well as one cystadenoma, two papillomas, and two cases of focal pancreatitis. SI measurements revealed significant increases in CIs for the lesion compared with the parenchyma in T1w TSE (69.7 vs 152.7; P = 0. 0003) and T1w TFE (107.8 vs 194.2; P = 0.0002). These series also revealed significant increases in CNRs (for T1w TSE: 9.7 vs 13.0; P = 0.0407 and for T1w TFE: 14.5 vs 26.1; P = 0.0001). In the other series, there was no significant increase. CT detected 38 lesions, MRI without mangafodipir trisodium detected 39 lesions, and MRI with mangafodipir trisodium detected 40 lesions, giving detection accuracy rates of 88%, 91%, and 93%, respectively. Staging accuracy rates for vascular ingrowth were 81%, 75%, and 81%, respectively. Overall staging accuracy rates were 57%, 54%, and 54%, respectively, mostly due to undetected small metastases in the peritoneum, omentum, or liver (< 1 cm). This study indicates that a) MRI after mangafodipir trisodium gives a better delineation of the tumor in T1w series, but b) does not significantly improve the detection rate and staging accuracy of focal pancreatic lesions over MRI without this contrast medium.EUS diagnosis of vascular invasion in pancreatic cancer: surgical and histologic correlates.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) has been compared to intraoperative surgical palpation for diagnosis of vascular invasion by pancreatic cancer. This study compares EUS with vascular resection and histologic evidence of vascular invasion in resected pancreatic masses.All patients with solid pancreatic masses who underwent both preoperative EUS and surgery at 1 hospital over a 7 year period were identified. The relationship of pancreatic masses to adjacent vessels was prospectively assessed by EUS. EUS findings were compared to surgical and pathology gold standards. "Vascular adherence" was defined as tumor adherence requiring vascular resection during surgery, and "vascular invasion" as histologic invasion of vessel wall by tumor.30 of 68 patients were resectable. Among these 30, vascular adherence was present in 8, including 18% of patients with an intact echoplane between tumor and adjacent vessels at EUS, 29% of those with loss of echoplane alone, and 50% of those with additional EUS features of vascular involvement. Vascular invasion was present in 4, including 12% of patients with an intact echoplane, 0% of those with loss of echoplane alone, and 33% of those with additional EUS features. Sensitivity, specificity, PPV, and NPV of EUS were 63%, 64%, 43% and 80% for vascular adherence and 50% 58%, 28% and 82% for vascular invasion. NPV rose to 90% for vascular adherence if only the portal confluence vessels were considered.EUS has poor sensitivity, specificity, and positive predictive value for diagnosis of venous involvement by pancreatic cancer.[The role of magnetic resonance imaging in the preoperative evaluation of the peripancreatic vasculature in pancreas carcinoma].To evaluate the accuracy of magnetic resonance angiography (MRA) to predict vascular involvement in pancreas carcinoma.This prospective trial included 42 patients with suspected pancreas carcinoma. All patients underwent MRA, different tomographic sequences (MRI) and surgery. Peripancreatic vessels were analyzed for vascular involvement, with the tumor infiltration graded on a scale of 0 to 4 (grade 0 - 4). The imaging findings were correlated with surgery and histopathology.The sensitivity of MRA to predict vascular involvement was 61 % (19 of 31 evaluated vessels) and the specificity 97 % (148 of 153). Sensitivity and specificity for axial MRI were both 94 % (29 of 31 and 144 of 153 evaluated vessels). The difference in the sensitivities of MRA and MRI was statistically significant (p < 0.01). Vascular involvement was correctly graded in 58 % (18 of 31) by MRA and in 74 % (23 of 31) by MRI.MRA alone is not sufficient to diagnose vascular involvement in pancreas carcinoma, but provides an adequate overview of the vascular anatomy. A combined protocol of MRA and MRI is needed for an acceptable evaluation of the peripancreatic vessels.Staging of pancreatic and ampullary cancer by endoscopy.Is endoscopic ultrasonography superior to multidetector CT for assessing pancreatic cancer?Positron emission tomography (PET) has limited utility in the staging of pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Positron emission tomography (PET) as an adjunct to conventional imaging in the staging of pancreatic adenocarcinoma is controversial. Herein, we assess the utility of PET in identifying metastatic disease and evaluate the prognostic potential of standard uptake value (SUV).Imaging and follow-up data for patients diagnosed with pancreatic adenocarcinoma were reviewed retrospectively. Resectability was assessed based on established criteria, and sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of PET were compared to those of conventional imaging modalities.For 123 patients evaluated 2005-2011, PET and CT/MRI were concordant in 108 (88 %) cases; however, PET identified occult metastatic lesions in seven (5.6 %). False-positive PETs delayed surgery for three (8.3 %) patients. In a cohort free of metastatic disease in 78.9 % of cases, the sensitivity and specificity of PET for metastases were 89.3 and 85.1 %, respectively, compared with 62.5 and 93.5 % for CT and 61.5 and 100.0 % for MRI. Positive predictive value and negative predictive value of PET were 64.1 and 96.4 %, respectively, compared with 75.0 and 88.9 % for CT and 100.0 and 91.9 % for MRI. Average difference in maximum SUV of resectable and unresectable lesions was not statistically significant (5.65 vs. 6.5, p = 0.224) nor was maximum SUV a statistically significant predictor of survival (p = 0.18).PET is more sensitive in identifying metastatic lesions than CT or MRI; however, it has a lower specificity, lower positive predictive value, and in some cases, can delay definitive surgical management. Therefore, PET has limited utility as an adjunctive modality in staging of pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Comparison between endoscopic ultrasound and magnetic resonance imaging for the staging of pancreatic cancer.Preoperative staging of pancreatic cancer is crucial for proper therapy. Through this study, we aimed to compare the ability of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) to effectively detect and stage pancreatic cancer.One hundred twenty-seven patients undergoing EUS-fine-needle aspiration and MRI for the workup of pancreatic cancer were captured in a prospective database for comparison. The final surgical stage was recorded in patients who went to surgery.Of 127 patients, 48 were surgically explored, and of these, 22 (46%) underwent pancreaticoduodenectomy. Agreement in the patients' staging between EUS and MRI was 94 (74%) of 127. Magnetic resonance imaging was more likely to report metastatic disease or arterial involvement. The overall correlation between EUS and MRI was marginal (κ = 0.42; 95% CI, 0.26-0.58). Of the 48 surgically explored patients, 12 (25%) were understaged by MRI, 13 (27%) were understaged by EUS, and 1 (2%) were overstaged. Endoscopic US and MRI had a sensitivity of 34 (97.2%) of 35 for stage II tumors and 35 (100%) of 35 for lower-stage tumors, respectively.Endoscopic US and MRI had marginal correlation for staging, especially the more advanced tumors. Although EUS has the added advantage of tissue acquisition for confirmation, the tumors understaged by both the modalities were different. Therefore, both tests should be performed for accurate staging.Endoscopic ultrasound staging and guided fine needle aspiration biopsy in patients with resectable pancreatic malignancies: a single-center prospective experience.Endoscopic ultrasound staging and guided fine needle aspiration biopsy (EUS-FNA) is a highly accurate diagnostic method, useful in characterizing pancreatic lesions, obtaining definitive tissue diagnosis in patients with suspected pancreatic lesions, and providing accurate locoregional staging that enhances diagnostic certainty and evaluation of appropriateness of surgical intervention. The aims of this study were to evaluate the preoperative contribution of EUS staging and EUS-FNA in patients with suspected resectable pancreatic malignancies.A prospective study was conducted in a tertiary referral center. During a 54-month period, a total of 103 consecutive patients were prospectively evaluated with EUS and EUS-FNA. Enrolled in the study were patients with resectable pancreatic lesions, who underwent surgery.The overall operating characteristics of EUSFNA were sensitivity 96.7%, specificity 90.0%, positive predictive value 98.9%, negative predictive value 75.0%, and diagnostic accuracy 96.1%.EUS and EUS-FNA have a high accuracy and positive predictive value in the preoperative determination of resectability in pancreatic cancer.Endoscopic ultrasound for diagnosis and staging of pancreatic tumors.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is proving to be a useful tool for evaluation of clinically suspected pancreatic masses unsatisfactorily evaluated by other means of imaging. We reviewed the records of 19 patients who had CT and EUS performed for clinically suspected pancreatic masses. Each patient had subsequent surgical exploration. Nineteen patients (11 females and 8 males) presenting with symptoms (11 with obstructive jaundice, 6 with abdominal pain and weight loss) or incidental CT findings suspicious for pancreatic carcinoma underwent EUS for further pancreatic evaluation. All of these patients had exploratory laparotomies, with 13 pancreaticoduodenectomies, 3 distal pancreatectomies and splenectomies, 1 bypass procedure, 1 open pancreatic and hepatic biopsy showing metastatic disease, and 1 open exploration with negative fine-needle aspiration biopsy. EUS correctly identified pancreatic neoplasms in 17 of 19 cases, with two false positives. The tumors included 15 adenocarcinomas, 1 microcystic adenoma, and 1 lymphoma. Node status was correctly predicted in 9 of 12 specimens. Nine of 12 tumors had accurate tumor staging by EUS. Absence of vascular invasion was accurately predicted in 13 of 14 cases. Two patients had metastatic disease discovered at laparotomy. All 19 patients had preoperative abdominal CT scans, with six of these negative for pancreatic masses. EUS is more sensitive than CT in detecting pancreatic masses and is more accurate than CT in locally staging pancreatic tumors. This higher sensitivity is important because those patients with earlier stage tumors are the most likely to benefit from resection.Radial endoscopic ultrasonography in the preoperative staging of pancreatic cancer.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is a diagnostic method that aims to detect and stage tumors of the pancreas more accurately. It has a high predictive role regarding tumor resectability.The present paper aims to assess the diagnostic accuracy of radial EUS in the staging of pancreatic cancer as well as the role of EUS to predict tumor resectability.30 patients (22 males, 8 females, mean age 61 +/- 12 years) with pancreatic masses staged by both radial EUS and surgery (17 patients with intraoperative exploration and 13 with pathological examination of surgical specimens) and with histologically proved adenocarcinoma were included in the study. Surgical examination was indicated in patients with pancreatic masses evidenced by imaging methods other than EUS, without distant metastases proved preoperatively, and without taking into consideration the staging obtained by EUS. Resectability criteria for pancreatic tumors as assessed by EUS were invasion of superior mesenteric artery or invasion of celiac trunk.The accuracy of EUS T staging was 86.6%, that of N staging was 93.3% while that of the vascular invasion was 80%. The accuracy of EUS for predicting tumor stage had a direct impact on the assessment of tumor resectability (83.3%, CI 95%: 81.5- 85.2). It had a sensitivity of 100%, specificity of 75%, PPV of 91.6% and NPV of 100%.The radial EUS of the pancreas is an accurate method for tumor staging. For establishing tumor resectability, association with other imaging methods is advisable for arterial assessment.Ultrafast magnetic resonance imaging improves the staging of pancreatic tumors.This prospective study was undertaken to evaluate the accuracy of a noninvasive "all-in-one" staging method in predicting surgical resectability in patients with pancreatic or periampullary tumors.Despite progress in imaging techniques, accurate staging and correct prediction of resectability remains one of the chief problems in the management of pancreatic tumors. Staging algorithms designed to separate operable from inoperable patients to save the latter an unnecessary laparotomy are becoming increasingly complex, expensive, time-consuming, invasive, and not without risks for the patient.Between August 1996 and February 1997, 58 consecutive patients referred for operation of a pancreatic or periampullary tumor were examined clinically and by 5 staging methods: 1) percutaneous ultrasonography (US); 2) ultrafast magnetic resonance imaging (UMRI); 3) dual-phase helical computed tomography (CT); 4) selective visceral angiography; and 5) endoscopic cholangiopancreatography (ERCP). The assessment of resectability by each procedure was verified by surgical exploration and histologic examination.The study comprised 40 male and 18 female patients with a median age of 63 years. Thirty-five lesions were located in the pancreatic head (60%), 11 in the body (19%), and 1 in the tail of the gland (2%); there were 9 tumors of the ampulla (16%) and 2 of the distal common duct (3%). All five staging methods were completed in 36 patients. For reasons ranging from metallic implants to contrast medium allergy or because investigations already had been performed elsewhere, US was completed in 57 (98%), UMRI in 54 (93%), CT in 49 (84%), angiography in 48 (83%), and ERCP in 49 (84%) of these 58 patients. Signs of unresectability found were vascular involvement in 22 (38%), extrapancreatic tumor spread in 16 (26%), liver metastases in 10 (17%), lymph node involvement in 6 (10%), and peritoneal nodules in only 2 patients (3%). These findings were collated with those of surgical exploration in 47 patients (81 %) and percutaneous biopsy in 5 (9%); such invasive verification was deemed unnecessary and therefore unethical in 6 clearly inoperable patients (10%). In assessing the four main signs of unresectability (extrapancreatic tumor spread, liver metastases, lymph node involvement, and vascular invasion), the overall accuracy of UMRI was 95.7%, 93.5%, 80.4%, as compared to 85.1%, 87.2%, 76.6% for US and 74.4%, 87.2%, 69.2% for CT. In assessing vascular invasion, the sensitivity, specificity, and overall accuracy of angiography were 42.9%, 100%, and 68.8%, respectively. There were 3 complications (12.5%) after 24 resections, 5 in 17 palliative procedures, and none after 6 explorations only. The hospital stay was 14 days after resection, 13 after palliative bypass, and 6 after exploration alone. There was no operative or hospital mortality in these 58 cases.Although it is by no means 100% accurate, UMRI is equal or even superior to all other staging methods. It probably will replace most of these, because it provides an "all-in-one" investigation avoiding endoscopy, vascular cannulation, allergic reactions, and x-radiation. But because even UMRI is not perfect, the final verdict on resectability of a tumor still will depend on surgical exploration in some cases.The accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound, endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography, computed tomography, and transabdominal ultrasound in the detection and staging of primary ampullary tumors.To compare the accuracy between EUS (endoscopic ultrasound), ERCP (endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography), CT (computed tomography), and transabdominal US (ultrasound) in the detection and staging of primary ampullary tumors. We will also try to discuss the influence of endobiliary stent on EUS in staging ampullary tumors.Twenty-one patients with ampullary tumors were evaluated by EUS, ERCP, CT, and US before operation. The accuracy was assessed with TNM staging and compared with the surgical-pathological findings.EUS was superior to CT and US in detecting ampullary tumors, but EUS and ERCP are of similar sensitivity (EUS 95%, ERCP 95%, CT 19%, US 5%). EUS was superior to CT and US in T staging (EUS 75%, CT 5%, US 0%) and detecting lymph node metastasis (EUS 50%, CT 33%, US 0%) of ampullary tumors. The accuracy of EUS in T and N staging of ampullary tumors tended to be decreased in the presence of endobiliary stent (stenting: T 71%, N 75%; nonstenting T 83%, N 100%), but there was no statistical significance.EUS was superior to CT and US in assessing primary ampullary tumors, but it was not significantly superior to ERCP in detecting ampullary tumors. The presence of endobiliary stent may decrease the accuracy of EUS in staging ampullary tumors.[Endoscopic ultrasonography in determining resectability of the pancreatic adenocarcinoma].The publication presents the results of the examination and treatment of 82 patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma. The main objective of the work is the evaluation of endosonography diagnostic significance in identifying tumor vascular invasion and determining resectability of the tumor. The paper describes an EUS methodology, type of echoendoscopes and ultrasound criteria for tumor invasion to the blood vessels. Vessel invasion during endosonography was suspected in 48 (58.5%) cases, according to surgery data, tumor invasion into upper abdomen vessels was detected in 51 patients (62.2%). Sensitivity of endosonography in detecting vessel invasion was 90.2%, specificity--93.5%, accuracy--91.5%. Endosonography being in trend of present day ideas about the criteria of pancreatic cancer resectability is the leading method in the selection of patients to surgery.Preoperative evaluation of pancreatic cancer: comparison of gadolinium-enhanced dynamic MRI with MR cholangiopancreatography versus MDCT.To determine the accuracy of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) including dynamic imaging using three-dimensional gradient-echo (3D-GRE) sequences and MR cholangiopancreatograpy (MRCP) compared with that of multidetector row CT (MDCT) with regard to resectability in pancreas cancer.From February 2004 to July 2008, 54 patients (32 men, 22 women: age range, 28-83 years; mean age, 63.1 years old) with surgically proven pancreatic carcinoma, who had undergone preoperative gadolinium-enhanced 3D-GRE MRI with MRCP and triple-phase MDCT, were included in this retrospective study. Two, clinically experienced attending radiologists independently reviewed the two image sets. These readers evaluated the tumor conspicuity, presence of vascular invasion, choledochal and duodenal invasion, lymph node metastases, distant metastasis, and tumor resectability. The results were compared with the surgical and histopathologic findings using receiver operating characteristic analysis (Az) and kappa statistics.Curative resections were performed on 42 patients. Regarding the tumor conspicuity, MRI had a significantly higher Az value compared with MDCT according to both reviewers (P < 0.05). The accuracy of resectability was Az = 0.753 and 0.768 on MRI and Az = 0.829 and 0.762 on MDCT for each reviewer, and the difference in the accuracy of resectability was not significant between MRI and MDCT for either reviewer (P > 0.05). Two imaging sets showed a similar diagnostic performance in the evaluation of vascular involvement, lymph node metastasis, and distant metastasis.Dynamic 3D-GRE MRI with MRCP shows superior tumor conspicuity and similar diagnostic performance compared with MDCT in evaluating the resectability of pancreatic cancer.[Endoscopic ultrasonography in pancreatic carcinoma].Even though pancreatic cancer is not such a common diagnosis, its treatment is very expensive and it has a great economic impact to the health system. 5-year survival rates after excessive surgical treatment is only 5%, which imposes more careful selection of patients that have to be surgically treated. According to experience from some medical centers all over the world, EUS is considered as a high sensitive diagnostic method for establishing a diagnosis of pancreatic cancer and evaluation of TNM staging. The main purpose of this survey is to present our experience in using of EUS as a diagnostic method in establishing a diagnosis of pancreatic cancer, as well as to evaluate how reliable this method is in preoperative evaluation if tumor could be successfully resected. We examined the group of 63 patients with pancreatic cancer, which were surgically explored after EUS examination. We wanted to compare TNM status before and after the surgical treatment. All patients were examined by Olympus equipment for endoscopic ultrasound with radial probe working with the frequency of 7,5 and 12 MHz at the Department for Endoscopic Ultrasound of the Clinic for Gastroenterology and Hepatology, Clinical Center of Serbia. Evaluation of pancreatic tumor extension to local organs (pancreas, duodenum, choledochus, stomach, colon and large veins) was performed for all patients. All regional lymph nodes were also explored. Due to low penetration ability of the probe working with the frequency of 7.5 MHz, EUS is not a suitable method for evaluation of M stage (figure 8,9). Patients were divided in different groups, specified by TNM status. For 10 patients resection was estimated as a probably successful solution, but only 8 of them was surgically treated. According to this, our estimation was 79.7% accurate, which is in accordance to results obtained from other medical centers all over the world.Pancreatic adenocarcinoma: MDCT versus MRI in the detection and assessment of locoregional extension.To compare dynamic-contrast enhanced multirow detector computed tomography (MDCT) including multiplanar reformatted images (MPR) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) including magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography images for the detection and assessment of locoregional extension of pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Twenty-four patients with and 21 patients without pancreatic adenocarcinoma underwent triple-phase MDCT and MRI. Three radiologists independently attempted to detect pancreatic adenocarcinoma and assess locoregional extension in 3 sessions. First session involved MDCT images. In the second session, radiologists had access to coronal and sagittal MPR images together with the axial images (MDCT + MPR). Third session involved MR images. Results were compared with surgical findings using receiver operating characteristic analysis and kappa statistics.Regarding tumor detection, MDCT + MPR had a significantly higher value for areas under the curve (0.96 +/- 0.02) at receiver operating characteristic analysis compared with those of MRI (0.90 +/- 0.03) and MDCT (0.85 +/- 0.04). MDCT + MPR had the highest mean sensitivity (96%), and MRI had the highest mean specificity (98%). For locoregional extension, MDCT + MPR showed the highest kappa values of the study for all factors evaluated (range, 0.63-0.86).In conclusion, multiphasic MDCT imaging with MPR images was superior to multiphasic MDCT imaging without MPR images and to comprehensive MRI employing 2-D sequences and magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography for both the detection and assessment of locoregional extension of pancreatic adenocarcinomas. MRI might be used for further lesion characterization regarding its high specificity.Preoperative assessment of pancreatic malignancy using endoscopic ultrasound.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) has been regarded as the most accurate modality for locoregional staging of pancreatic malignancy. However, several recent studies have questioned this. The current study assessed the accuracy of EUS in determining preoperative resectability of pancreatic neoplasia.A retrospective review was performed of patients with pancreatic malignancy who had preoperative EUS and underwent surgery. EUS-predicted resectability was compared with surgical resectability. Where available, accuracies of vascular and nodal staging were also assessed.Forty-five patients were identified (mean age 60 years, age range = 36-79 years). All patients underwent surgical exploration; vascular staging was available in 32 cases and 17 cases underwent surgical resection. The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of EUS in determining unresectability were 66%, 100%, and 78% respectively. Overall EUS stage concurred with surgical stage in 56%, greater than surgical stage in 4%, and less than surgical stage in 40%. Vascular staging on EUS had a sensitivity of 69% and a specificity of 100%. Accuracy of nodal staging was 71%.EUS had a high specificity for assessing unresectable pancreatic malignancy. This technique should be used to avoid unnecessary surgical exploration of incurable lesions. However, EUS had only a moderate sensitivity, and a proportion of patients staged preoperatively as having resectable disease will not be surgically resectable.The use of endoscopic ultrasonography in the diagnosis and staging of carcinoma of the papilla of Vater.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) was evaluated in the diagnosis of carcinoma of the papilla of Vater. Thirteen cases of carcinoma of the papilla examined by EUS were investigated with the aim of assessing the detection capability of EUS in comparison with other diagnostic tools, and its usefulness in diagnosing the extent of the tumor. The EUS image of the normal papilla of Vater presents as a round protruded region with the layered structure of the duodenal papilla along with images of periampullary organs. All but one of 13 tumors of the duodenal papilla presented as a hypoechoic solid mass at EUS. On the basis of an analysis of the layered structure of the papilla of Vater and/or the duodenal wall, EUS images of 12 cases of ampullary carcinoma confirmed histologically were analysed. The EUS images of the tumors of the duodenal papilla corresponded well with the histological findings. When the extent of carcinoma was classified in 4 stages by EUS, the accuracy rate was 83%. EUS is one of the most promising procedures for determining the extent of tumors of the duodenal papilla.Endosonography is superior to angiography in the preoperative assessment of vascular involvement among patients with pancreatic carcinoma.Surgical exploration in patients with pancreatic carcinoma without adequate preoperative attempts to determine resectability results in resection in only a minority of patients. Besides distant metastases, involvement of the major vessels is the most important parameter for determining resectability in patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma. Angiography has been an integral part of pancreatic cancer staging. Lately, endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) has emerged as a more accurate tool in the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer. We hypothesize that EUS is more accurate than selective venous angiography (SVA) for assessing resectability of pancreatic adenocarcinoma based on preoperative evaluation of vascular involvement. Twenty-one patients who met the inclusion criteria were prospectively evaluated with both EUS and SVA before undergoing surgical exploration for attempted curative resection. Vascular involvement was determined by EUS and SVA using previously described criteria. The sensitivity, specificity, and overall accuracy of EUS and SVA in assessing vascular involvement were compared, using surgical exploration as the gold standard. Endoscopic ultrasound had a higher sensitivity than SVA for detecting vascular involvement (86% vs. 21%, respectively; p = 0.0018). The specificity and accuracy of EUS for detecting vascular involvement was 71% and 81%, respectively. In contrast, the specificity and accuracy of SVA for detecting vascular involvement was 71% and 38%, respectively. Endoscopic ultrasound is significantly more sensitive than angiography for detecting vascu lar involvement in patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma and, thus, may improve patient selection for attempted curative resection.Prospective evaluation of pancreatic tumors: accuracy of MR imaging with MR cholangiopancreatography and MR angiography.To prospectively assess accuracy of magnetic resonance (MR) imaging, MR cholangiopancreatography (MRCP), and MR angiography in patients suspected of having pancreatic tumors.Sixty-six patients suspected of having pancreatic tumors underwent MR imaging (unenhanced and contrast material-enhanced MR, MRCP, and contrast-enhanced MR angiography). Two blinded readers prospectively analyzed the images by consensus, and results were correlated with surgery, biopsy, or follow-up findings. Results were tabulated in two-by-two tables.MR assessment of pancreatic lesion status (differentiation of benign vs malignant) resulted in 60 correct diagnoses (accuracy, 91%), and six (10%) false diagnoses. Among histologically proved malignant tumors, MR imaging yielded correct diagnoses in 42 of 44 patients (sensitivity, 95%; 95% CI: 85%, 99%), whereas 18 of 22 patients with benign findings were classified correctly. At MR imaging, findings in four patients with chronic pancreatitis were wrongly categorized as malignant tumors (specificity, 82%; 95% CI: 60%, 95%), and in one patient, a distal common bile duct carcinoma was not detected. In no patient with pancreatic adenocarcinoma was this tumor misdiagnosed as benign. In patients with malignant tumors who underwent resection, local-regional tumor growth and vascular infiltration were accurately classified in 89% and 94%, respectively. MR imaging depicted histologically proved synchronous hepatic metastases in 82%. The positive and negative predictive values for cancer nonresectability were 90% and 83%, respectively, and the accuracy, sensitivity, and specificity were 85%, 69%, and 95%, respectively.Unenhanced and contrast-enhanced MR imaging with MRCP and MR angiography offers potential as a noninvasive tool for assessment of patients suspected of having pancreatic tumors.Is a preoperative multidiagnostic approach to predict surgical resectability of periampullary tumors still effective?Multimodality staging is recommended in patients with periampullary tumors to optimize preoperative determination of resectability. We investigated the potency of currently used diagnostic procedures in order to determine resectability.Ninety-five consecutive patients with periampullary tumors prehospitally staged resectable underwent preoperative diagnostic tests: helical-computed tomography (CT) with maximum intensity projection of arterial vessels (MIP), magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), magnetic resonance cholangiopancreaticography (MRCP), endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS), endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreaticography (ERCP), digital subtraction angiography (DSA), and positron emission tomography (PET). Diagnoses were verified by surgery and histopathology.In 45 patients with benign and 50 patients with malignant periampullary tumors sensitivity for tumor diagnosis was 89% to 96% in CT, MRI, EUS, and PET. Small tumors were best diagnosed by EUS (100%). Diagnosis of malignancy was made with 85% (EUS), 83% (CT), 82% (PET), and 72% (MRI) accuracy. Arterial vessel infiltration was best predicted by CT/MIP with an accuracy of 85%. For venous vessel infiltration MRI reached 85% accuracy. Accuracy rates for local nonresectability were 93% (EUS), 92% (MRI), and 90% (CT). Two and 4 of 8 patients with distant metastases were identified by CT and PET, respectively. The correct diagnosis of malignancy and determination of resectability was made by CT in 71% and by MRI in 70%. Biliary stenting reduced accuracy of CT diagnosis of malignancy from 88% to 73%.CT obtained before stenting was the single most useful test, providing correct diagnosis in 88% and resectability in 71% of patients. If no tumor is depicted in CT, EUS should be added. Uncertain venous vessel infiltration can be verified by MRI or EUS. Angiography should no longer be a routine diagnostic procedure. Equivocal tumors or possible metastasis may be further examined with PET.The value of positron emission tomography/computed tomography for evaluating metastatic disease in patients with pancreatic cancer.Routine application of positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) for pancreatic cancer staging remains a controversial approach. The purpose of this study was to reassess the clinical impact of PET/CT for the detection of distant metastasis of pancreatic cancer.From January 2006 to June 2009, 125 patients with histologically proven pancreatic cancer that had undergone PET/CT at our hospital were retrospectively reviewed. To evaluate the clinical efficacy of PET/CT on the management plan, the post-PET/CT management plans were compared with the pre-PET/CT management plans.After the conventional staging workup, we determined that 76 patients (60.8%) had resectable lesions, whereas 48 patients had unresectable lesions. One patient underwent explorative laparotomy due to equivocal resectability. Positron emission tomography/computed tomography diagnosed distant metastasis in only 2 (2.6%) of the 76 patients with resectable lesions, and these patients did not undergo unnecessary surgical treatment. Complete resection was not performed in 8 of the 74 operative patients because they had distant metastasis detected during the operative procedure. Positron emission tomography/computed tomography diagnosed distant metastasis in 32 of the 44 patients with metastatic lesions that were histologically shown to have sensitivity of 72.7%.Positron emission tomography/computed tomography has a limited role in the evaluation of metastatic disease from pancreatic cancer.The clinical utility of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration in the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic carcinoma.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) guided fine-needle aspiration (FNA) of pancreatic lesions is being increasingly used. Our aim was to determine the safety, accuracy, and clinical utility of EUS-guided FNA in both the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer.Forty-four patients (24 men/20 women) had EUS-guided FNA of pancreatic lesions (39 head/neck, 5 body, 3 tail) and/or associated lymph nodes. The mean age was 61 (range, 28 to 88 years). The indication for EUS-guided FNA was a pancreatic lesion seen initially on CT (39%), ERCP (43%), or EUS (18%). Follow-up data were collected on all patients for mean of 14.5 months (range 1 to 33 months).CT detected only 15 of 61 (25%) focal lesions seen by EUS, Adequate specimens were obtained by EUS-guided FNA in 44 of 47 (94%) pancreatic lesions and 14 of 14 (100%) associated lymph nodes (overall adequacy was 95%). Of the 46 lesions in which specimens were adequate and a final diagnosis was available (32 malignant, 14 benign), EUS-guided FNA had a sensitivity of 92%, specificity of 100%, and diagnostic accuracy of 95% for pancreatic lesions and 83%, 100%, and 88% for lymph nodes, respectively. Six percent of pancreatic cases had inadequate specimens and, if included, lowered the sensitivity to 83%, specificity to 80%, and diagnostic accuracy to 88% for pancreatic lesions. In 3 patients with enlarged celiac nodes on EUS, EUS-guided FNA was able to make a tissue diagnosis of metastasis, which changed the preoperative staging and precluded surgery. EUS in combination with EUS-guided FNA precluded surgery in 12 of 44 (27%) and may have precluded surgery in an additional 6 of 44 (14%). EUS-guided FNA avoided the need for further diagnostic tests, thus expediting therapy in a total of 25 (57%) patients and influenced clinical decisions in 30 of 44 (68%) patients. The estimated cost savings based on surgeries avoided was approximately $3300 per patient. There was only one complication (2%), a post-FNA fever.EUS-guided FNA of the pancreas appears to be a safe and effective method that increases both the diagnostic and staging capability of EUS in pancreatic cancer. The clinical impact of EUS-guided FNA includes avoiding surgery and additional imaging studies with a substantial cost savings.Magnetic resonance angiography in the resectability assessment of suspected pancreatic tumours.The aim of this prospective study was to evaluate MRI, including MR angiography (MRA), in the preoperative assessment of the resectability of suspected malignancy of the pancreas. A total of 17 patients with suspected pancreatic carcinoma and planned surgery were investigated with conventional angiography, ultrasonography with Doppler technique, MRI and MRA. The MRA protocol included both 2D inflow angiography and 3D phase-contrast angiography. Surgery was carried out in 13 patients. The image quality of MRA was judged satisfactory in all cases. The findings with respect to vascular involvement agreed between the radiological methods in all but 3 cases. When the findings were correlated with the final diagnosis, one false-negative case was found for each of the three methods. The results suggest that MRI with MRA, including both the phase-contrast and inflow techniques, has a similar diagnostic value to that of conventional angiography and ultrasonography in the preoperative assessment of the portal venous system in patients with pancreatic carcinoma. Further studies are needed to establish the optimal diagnostic procedure.Endoscopic ultrasonography versus helical CT in diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer.Compare the performances of EUS to helical CT in the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Forty two consecutive patients (mean age 63 years; 25 men, 17 women) who had surgical exploration and histologically proved pancreatic cancer were retrospectively included. All our patients underwent with endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and helical computed tomography (helical CT). Data analysis compared helical CT, EUS with the surgical data with or without histological study in diagnosis, staging and resectability of pancreatic cancer. Surgical findings were used as gold standard.For positive diagnosis EUS was more sensitive 100% (CI:93-100) than helical CT 88% (CI:77-95). But helical CT was more specific 89% (CI:64-98) than EUS 83% (CI:58-96) for small tumors whose diameter is below 2.5 cm in witch EUS was more sensitive in their detection (100% versus 83%). In evaluating venous involvement EUS was more sensitive than helical CT (96% versus 50%; p<0.05), while CT was more specific (81% versus 75%; p<0.05). Regarding lymph nodes invasion, the two imaging technique had the same sensibility (56%) with better specificity for helical CT (83% versus 75%; p<0.05). The accuracy of EUS in identifying the T and N stages were 80% and 67% respectively, while helical CT have an accuracy of 50% and 71% respectively. EUS and helical CT correctly identified all resectable tumors while EUS was more accurate than helical CT in detecting non resectable tumors 94% versus 69%.EUS remains superior to helical CT in positive diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma especially for small tumors and also for the diagnosis of venous invasion and in identifying non resectable tumors. The two techniques have the same accuracy in the detection of lymph node involvement.The use of EUS to diagnose malignant portal venous system invasion by pancreatic cancer.CT scanning and mesenteric angiography are insensitive tests diagnosing vascular invasion by pancreatic cancer. Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) has been proposed as an alternative. The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of specific EUS criteria for diagnosing malignant invasion of the branches of the portal venous system have not been determined.This is a prospective blinded evaluation of EUS and angiography to diagnose malignant invasion of the portal venous system by pancreatic cancer in 45 patients, 28 of whom underwent surgery. Surgical staging was used as the gold standard for determining the accuracy of EUS and angiography.Four EUS criteria were studied and the overall accuracy rates were as follows: irregular venous wall (87%), loss of interface (78%), proximity of mass (73%), and size (39%). Although "irregular venous wall" was the most accurate, it suffered from a low sensitivity rate (47%) because of its relative inability to detect superior mesenteric vein invasion (sensitivity of 17%). The angiographic criteria had accuracy rates of 73% to 90% with low sensitivity rates (20% to 77%). The clean resection rate was 86% when all tests were used, 78% if EUS was used without angiography, and 60% if only angiography was used.EUS is highly sensitive for detecting portal and splenic vein invasion by pancreatic cancer, but may be insensitive for superior mesenteric vein involvement.18F-FDG positron emission tomography CT (FDG PET-CT) in the management of pancreatic cancer: initial experience in 12 patients.Staging and restaging of pancreatic malignancy can be demanding. Often, there are liver lesions seen on diagnostic CT suspicious for secondary deposits. Positron emission tomography (PET)-CT may have a great potential in confirming or ruling out actual malignancy in those areas.We prospectively studied 12 pancreatic adenocarcinoma patients, who had undergone PET-CT imaging as part of their staging or restaging process. Imaging was performed after intravenous administration of 10 mCi F-18 FDG. Results were compared with CT, histopathological findings and/or clinical follow up.PET-CT correctly identified 11 lesions and ruled the absence of disease in 4 out of 4 patients (PPV 92%, NPV of 100%, and accuracy 94%), compared to CT which had (PPV 79%, NPV 50% and accuracy 75%). CT identified 4 metastatic liver lesions in 12 patients of which 3 were actually benign processes.FDG-PET detects pancreatic malignancy and metastatic disease with higher accuracy than conventional CT. The ability of PET-CT to rule out or correctly identify metastases greatly enhances the physician's decision-making process to choose the right therapeutic intervention.[Resectability of pancreatic head adenocarcinoma].[MRI in the evaluation of peripancreatic vessel invasion and resectability of pancreatic carcinoma].To investigate the role of MRI in evaluating the peripancreatic vessel invasion and resectability of pancreatic carcinoma based on the comparison of MRI image with surgical exploration, and try to establish the criteria for assessment of the sensitivity, specificity and accuracy of resectability.Forty-one pancreatic carcinoma patients confirmed by pathology received preoperative plain and contrast enhanced MRI scan, and 37 of them had additional coronal MRA scan. Peripancreatic vessel invasion was preoperatively assessed based on MRI features, and the vessel invasion degree from the uninvolved to the severely involved was divided into 6 grades represented by 1, 2a, 2b, 3a, 3b and 4, respectively. Compared with the findings during the surgery, the sensitivity and specificity of each vessel invasion grade were studied and the receiver operator characteristic curve (ROC) was drawn. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and accuracy of resectability evaluation based on 2 and 2a degree were calculated respectively. The resectability of involved arteries and veins of grade 2 were also analyzed.Of the 41 patients, 22 had resectable tumor, with 20 curative resection and 2 palliative. Compared with the findings during surgery, seven vessels including three arteries and four veins were not correctly interpreted by MRI. If grade 1,2a,2b,3a and 3b was used as the resectable standard,respectively, the sensitivity to predict the unresectbility was 78.3%, 84.8%, 67.4%, 56.5% and 47.8%, respectively. Receiver operator characteristic curve demonstrated that grade 2a was the optimal critical point. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and accuracy of grade 2a in predicting the unresectbility were 84.8%, 98.5%, 92.9%, 96.6% and 95.9%.Our data showed that grade 2a (tumor involvement < 2 cm long and < 1/2 circumference of the vessel) may be more sensitive and accurate in predicting the resectability, which may be considered as the line of demarcation between the respectable and unresectable cases in clinical practice.Pancreatic carcinoma: MR, MR angiography and dynamic helical CT in the evaluation of vascular invasion.To assess the value of MR angiography in combination with contrast-enhanced MR imaging, and to compare MR imaging including MR angiography with dynamic contrast-enhanced dual phase helical CT in the preoperative assessment of vascular invasion in patients with suspected pancreatic carcinoma.MR imaging only, MR imaging including MR angiography and dynamic contrast-enhanced dual phase helical CT images of 48 patients who were operated due to suspicion of pancreas cancer were correlated with the surgery results in terms of vascular invasion. Pathologic diagnosis were pancreatic adenocarcinoma in 31 patients of which nine had surgically confirmed vascular invasion. Sensitivity, specificity, predictive values (including 95% confidence intervals) and accuracy of MR imaging only, MR imaging including MR angiography and helical CT were calculated.Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values and accuracy were 56, 100, 100, 85, 87%; 67, 100, 100, 88, 90% and 67, 100, 100, 88, 90%, respectively, for MR imaging only, MR imaging including MR angiography and helical CT in the adenocarcinoma group. The corresponding figures in the overall study group were 56, 97, 83, 90, 90%; 67, 97, 86, 93, 92% and 67, 97, 86, 93, 92%. Confidence intervals (95%) showed that the differences in the diagnostic efficacy of the techniques were not statistically significant in the overall study group, but the confidence intervals were undefined in the adenocarcinoma group due to the small sample size.Diagnostic efficacy of MR imaging when combined with MR angiography is equal to that of dynamic contrast-enhanced dual phase helical CT in the assessment of vascular invasion of pancreatic tumors.Defining a role for endoscopic ultrasound in staging periampullary tumors.The goal of the preoperative workup in patients with suspected periampullary carcinoma is to establish the diagnosis with a high degree of certainty. In this study we compared endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and computed tomography (CT) scans for the detection of tumor, lymph node metastasis, and vascular invasion in patients with suspected periampullary carcinoma in order to define a role for EUS in the preoperative staging of these patients.Thirty-seven consecutive patients received EUS and CT scanning followed by operation for presumed periampullary carcinoma during a 30-month period. Both imaging modalities were reviewed in a blinded fashion and the results compared with pathology and operative reports on all patients.Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value for tumor detection by EUS were 97%, 33%, 94%, and 50%, respectively, compared with 82%, 66%, 97%, and 25% for CT scan. For lymph nodes the values were 21%, 80%, 57%, and 44%, respectively, for EUS compared with 42%, 73%, 67%, and 50% for CT. For vascular invasion, the values were 20%, 100%, 100%, and 89%, respectively, for EUS, compared with 80%, 87%, 44%, and 96% for CT.CT is the initial study of choice in patients with suspected periampullary tumors. EUS is superior for detecting tumor and for predicting vascular invasion. Therefore, EUS should be used for patients in whom CT does not detect a mass and for those with an identifiable mass on CT in whom vascular invasion cannot be ruled out.Endoscopic ultrasonography in staging local resectability of pancreatic and periampullary malignancy.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) was performed before surgery in 14 patients with pancreatic cancer and in 9 patients with periampullary carcinoma. EUS enabled accurate determination of the extent of the lesions and the presence of suspicious lymph node enlargements. Carcinoma deeply infiltrating into the surrounding structures and major blood vessels was strongly indicative of local non-resectability. In contrast, clearly defined well-circumscribed hypoechoic tumours with no evidence of distant lymph node involvement were compatible with local resectability. The presence of multiple enlarged lymph nodes with irregular echo pattern adjacent to the major blood vessels (hepatic artery, coeliac trunk, aorta) surrounding locally resectable tumours was indicative of the palliative nature of the resection. Technical improvement, in particular the possibility of guided cytological aspiration, may further enhance the diagnostic value of this new imaging technique.[Benefit of PET/CT in the preoperative staging in pancreatic carcinomas].Prognosis of patients with pancreatic cancer is poor. Median survival from diagnosis without determining surgical treatment is 3-11 months, after surgical treatment between 13-20 months according to various studies. 5-year survival rate is below 5%. The only chance of cure remains a radical surgical resection. Early diagnosis and determining resectability of tumour is the most important objective in patients with pancreatic cancer. Aim of this work is to evaluate the benefits and define the role of 18F-FDG PET/CT in preoperative staging.195 patients (103 men, 92 women, mean age 66.7 year, range 32-88 years) with suspected pancreatic lesions underwent enhanced 18F-FDG PET/CT in the preoperative staging in addition to standard investigative methods (ultrasonography, contrast enhanced CT, EUS, EUS FNA). All PET/CT findings were compared with standard methods (CT, EUS, EUS FNA), with peroperative findings and definitive histology in surgical patients as the reference standards. Interpretation of the extent of the tumor defined by TNM classification. Limitations of the local resectability was advanced local stage (T4) and presence of distant metastases (M1).In 195 patients with suspected pancreatic lesions was pre-operatively performed PET/CT in the period 1/2007-3/2009. 153 patients with pancreatic cancer, of which 72 was not suitable for radical surgery because of local inoperability or a generalization of the disease. The sensitivity of PET/CT in the capture of primary lesions was 92.2%, specificity 90.5%. False negative findings in 12 patients, false-positive results occurred in 4 cases, positive predictive value (PPV) 97.2%, negative predictive value (NPV) 76.0%. In the assessment of regional lymph nodes sensitivity was 51.9%, specificity 58.3%, PPV 58.3%,NPV 51.9%. In detection of distant metastases PET/CT reached sensitivity 82.8%, specificity 97.8%, PPV 96.9%, NPV 87.0%. PET/CT found distant metastases in 12 patients, which standard methods failed to detect. Surgery was cancelled in 15 patients (15.6%) with potentially resectable tumour based on the performance of PET/CT findings and the management of treatment was changed.PET/CT is highly sensitive and specific method suitable for preoperative staging of pancreatic cancer. It improves the selection of patients for surgery, who can benefit from and reduces the number of incorrectly indicated operations.[Prospective evaluation of the clinical significance of ultrasonography, helical computed tomography, magnetic resonance imaging and endoscopic ultrasonography in the assessment of vascular invasion and lymph node metastasis of pancreatic carcinoma].To evaluate prospectively the efficacy of ultrasonography (US), helical computed tomography (HCT), endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in the assessment of vascular invasion and lymph node metastasis in pancreatic carcinoma.Consecutive 68 patients with pancreatic carcinoma were studied. Results of each imaging techniques regarding vascular invasion and lymph node metastasis were compared with the surgical and pathological findings.(1) US findings were confirmed moderately in accordance with surgical and pathological results in the evaluation of inferior cava vein, splenic artery and vein invasion of pancreatic carcinoma. HCT findings of evaluating superior mesenteric vein, portal vein, splenic vein were confirmed greatly in accordance with surgical and pathological results. The results of evaluating superior mesenteric artery, inferior cava vein, splenic artery, common hepatic artery, proper hepatic artery, celiac trunk, abdominal aorta were confirmed moderately in accordance with surgical and pathological results. MRI findings of evaluating superior mesenteric artery and vein, portal artery and vein were moderately in accordance with surgical and pathological results. EUS findings of evaluating splenic vein were confirmed greatly in accordance with surgical and pathological results, and moderately in accordance with surgical and pathological results in the evaluation of superior mesenteric vein. (2) EUS had the highest sensitivity (75.0%), accuracy (87.5%), and negative predictive values (91.7%) in the evaluation of lymph node metastasis. The sensitivity of HCT and MRI were 37.5% and 35.3%, which were significantly lower than that of EUS. The sensitivity of US was 18.7%, which was the lowest of all. In addition, the multivariate logistic regression analysis confirmed that EUS had an independent predictive value (OR: 34.50, 95%CI: 6.54 - 182.09).Helical CT should be considered the most precise technique to evaluate vascular invasion. EUS had an independent predictive value with respect to tumor metastasis to regional lymph nodes.Gadobenate dimeglumine-enhanced 3.0-T MR imaging versus multiphasic 64-detector row CT: prospective evaluation in patients suspected of having pancreatic cancer.To compare the diagnostic performance (detection, local staging) of multiphasic 64-detector row computed tomography (CT) with that of gadobenate dimeglumine-enhanced 3.0-T magnetic resonance (MR) imaging in patients suspected of having pancreatic cancer.The institutional review board approved this prospective study, and all patients provided written informed consent. Multidetector CT and MR imaging were performed in 89 patients (48 women aged 46-89 years [mean, 65.6 years] and 41 men aged 46-86 years [mean, 65.3 years]) suspected of having pancreatic cancer on the basis of findings from clinical examination or previous imaging studies. Two readers independently assessed the images to characterize lesions and determine the presence of focal masses, vascular invasion, distant metastases, and resectability. Findings from surgery, biopsy, endosonography, or follow-up imaging were used as the standard of reference. Logistic regression, the McNemar test, and κ values were used for statistical analysis.Focal pancreatic masses were present in 63 patients; 43 patients had adenocarcinoma. For reader 1, the sensitivities and specificities in the detection of pancreatic adenocarcinoma were 98% (42 of 43 patients) and 96% (44 of 46 patients), respectively, for CT and 98% (42 of 43 patients) and 96% (44 of 46 patients) for MR imaging. For reader 2, the sensitivities and specificities were 93% (40 of 43 patients) and 96% (44 of 46 patients), respectively, for CT and 95% (41 of 43 patients) and 96% (44 of 46 patients) for MR imaging. Vessel infiltration was determined in 22 patients who underwent surgery, and reader 1 obtained sensitivities and specificities of 90% (nine of 10 vessels) and 98% (119 of 122 vessels), respectively, for CT and 80% (eight of 10 vessels) and 96% (117 of 122 vessels) for MR imaging; for reader 2, those values were 70% (seven of 10 vessels) and 98% (120 of 122 vessels) for CT and 50% (five of 10 vessels) and 98% (120 of 122 vessels) for MR imaging. Both readers correctly assessed resectability in 87% (13 of 15 patients) of cases with CT and 93% (14 of 15 patients) of cases with MR imaging. Nonresectability was assessed correctly with CT in 75% (six of eight patients) of cases by reader 1 and 63% (five of eight patients) of cases by reader 2; nonresectability was correctly assessed with MR imaging in 75% (six of eight patients) of cases by reader 1 and 50% (four of eight patients) of cases by reader 2. None of the differences between modalities and readers were statistically significant (P > .05).Both CT and MR imaging are equally suited for detecting and staging pancreatic cancer.http://radiology.rsna.org/lookup/suppl/doi:10.1148/radiol.11101189/-/DC1.Local extension of pancreatic carcinoma: assessment with thin-section helical CT versus with breath-hold fast MR imaging--ROC analysis.To compare contrast material-enhanced thin-section helical CT with breath-hold contrast-enhanced MR imaging for sensitivity in the detection of pancreatic adenocarcinoma and for accuracy in local tumor staging.Fifty-seven patients (37 men, 20 women aged 42-28 years) suspected of having pancreatic adenocarcinoma were examined. The final diagnosis was confirmed at surgery to be pancreatic cancer in 31 patients; the other 26 patients were deemed not to have pancreatic cancer. All patients underwent both CT and MR imaging (turbo spin-echo and fast low-angle shot) studies. Image quality and pancreatic enhancement were subjectively evaluated. All CT scans and MR images were assessed by two independent observers by using a five-point scale for the detection of tumor and of invasion into the peripancreatic tissue, portal vein, and/or peripancreatic artery. Receiver operating characteristic curves for CT and MR imaging were analyzed.At visual analysis, pancreatic enhancement at CT and at MR imaging was comparable, but depiction of vessels was superior at helical CT. Detectability of tumor was comparable. Helical CT was significantly superior to MR imaging in diagnostic imaging of invasion into the peripancreatic tissue, portal vein, and/or peripancreatic artery (P < .01).Thin-section dynamic CT is more sensitive than MR imaging for detection of peripancreatic and vascular invasion in patients with pancreatic cancer.Ampullopancreatic carcinoma: preoperative TNM classification with endosonography.Endosonography (ES) was used for the preoperative TNM (1987) staging of tumors in 43 patients with pancreatic cancer and 24 patients with ampullary carcinomas. These results were correlated with the histologic findings of resected specimens. Early-stage tumors could be distinguished from advanced stages of cancer with ES. Detailed images of ductular and parenchymal abnormalities allowed distinction between pancreatic and ampullary carcinomas based on anatomic location. The overall accuracy of ES in the assessment of tumor classification in pancreatic and ampullary carcinoma was 92% and 88%, respectively. In diagnosing regional lymph nodes in pancreatic and ampullary tumors the accuracy of ES was 74% and 54%, respectively. For diagnosing metastatic lymph nodes in pancreatic and ampullary carcinoma the accuracy of ES was 91% and 80%, respectively. The prevalence of lymph node metastases in T1 pancreatic cancers and T1 ampullary carcinomas was 40% and 0%, respectively. Discrimination between inflammation and metastases was difficult with ES. ES was not accurate in assessing distant metastases because of the limited penetration depth of ultrasound.Comparison of multislice computed tomography and endoscopic ultrasonography with operative and histological findings in suspected pancreatic and periampullary malignancy.This study compared multislice computed tomography (MSCT) with endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic and periampullary malignancy.Data were collected prospectively on patients having MSCT and EUS for suspected pancreatic and periampullary malignancy.Eighty-four patients had MSCT and EUS, of whom 35 underwent operative assessment (29 resections). In assessing malignancy, there was no significant difference between MSCT and EUS, and agreement was good (82 per cent, kappa = 0.49); the sensitivity and specificity of MSCT were 97 and 87 per cent, compared with 95 and 52 per cent respectively for EUS (P = 0.264). For portal vein/superior mesenteric vein invasion, MSCT was superior (P = 0.017) and agreement was moderate (72 per cent, kappa = 0.42); the sensitivity and specificity were 88 and 92 per cent for MSCT, and 50 and 83 per cent for EUS. For resectability, there was no significant difference and agreement was good (78 per cent, kappa = 0.51). EUS had an impact on the management of 14 patients in whom MSCT suggested benign disease or equivocal resectability.MSCT is the imaging method of choice for pancreatic and periampullary tumours. Routine EUS should be reserved for those with borderline resectability on MSCT.[18 F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography for characterization and initial staging of pancreatic tumors].To evaluate positron emission tomography (PET) with (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) for characterizing and initial staging of pancreatic tumors and to determine its impact on therapeutic strategy.This study included 24 patients with pancreatic tumor who underwent PET before treatment. Twenty-two patients had a malignant tumor and two had a benign tumor. The PET scan was performed after intravenous injection of FDG with a gamma camera. PET findings were compared with histology of the pancreatic tumor (n=24), liver metastases (n=5), peritoneal metastases (n=5), and lymph node metastases (n=5). Absence of metastasis or lymph node involvement was determined by surgery or by CT scan, ultrasonography, magnetic resonance imaging and at least two months follow-up.The sensitivity of the PET scans to identify pancreatic carcinoma was 64% (95% confidence interval 44-84%). PET scans could not be interpreted for lymph node involvement adjacent to the tumor. For liver metastases, the PET scan was positive in 3 out of 5 patients. For peritoneal metastases, the PET scan was positive in 4 out of 5 patients but was doubtful in one. There were two false positives. Among the 4 cystic tumors, the PET scan was positive for 2 malignant tumors and negative for 2 benign tumors. Surgical strategy was modified in only one of the 24 patients on the basis of PET findings.The sensitivity of PET for the diagnosis of primary malignant pancreatic tumor was found to be low. The contribution of FDG-PET to the surgical decision appears to be limited to the detection of metastases or lymph node involvement distant from the tumor, contraindicating surgery. Nevertheless, the sensitivity of FDG-PET is lower than that of laparoscopy for peritoneal metastases. Indications for PET should be included in an evaluation of therapeutic decision making and cost analysis.Improved detection of hepatic metastases from pancreatic cancer using periodically rotated overlapping parallel lines with enhanced reconstruction (PROPELLER) technique after SPIO administration.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the detection of hepatic metastases from the pancreatic cancer using different MR imaging methods, including superparamagnetic iron oxide (SPIO)-enhanced fat-saturated T2-weighted imaging with periodically rotated overlapping parallel lines with enhanced reconstruction (PROPELLER) technique.The institutional review board approved this prospective study. Eighty-two patients (mean age, 55 years) underwent different MR imaging with a 1.5-T scanner. Diagnostic performance with receiver operating characteristics (ROC) curves and sensitivity were evaluated for the following image sets: (A) unenhanced images (T1-weighted in-phase and opposed-phase gradient-echo [GRE] images, and fat-saturated T2-weighted turbo spin-echo [TSE] images) that were included in the subsequent image sets, (B) diffusion-weighted images, (C) SPIO-enhanced fat-saturated T2-weighted TSE images with prospective acquisition correction (PACE), (D) SPIO-enhanced T2*-weighted GRE images, and (E) SPIO-enhanced fat-saturated T2-weighted TSE images acquired with PROPELLER and PACE.The areas under the ROC curves were 0.58 +/- 0.05 (mean +/- standard errors), 0.81 +/- 0.04, 0.70 +/- 0.05, 0.80 +/- 0.04, and 0.90 +/- 0.03, and sensitivity was 0.47, 0.69, 0.56, 0.66, and 0.77 for image sets (A) to (E), respectively, for all lesions. Image set (E) had significantly larger area under the ROC curve for detection of hepatic lesions and higher sensitivity than others.SPIO-enhanced fat-saturated T2-weighted MR imaging with the PROPELLER technique is more effective for detecting hepatic metastases of pancreatic cancer than diffusion-weighted MR imaging, SPIO-enhanced fat-saturated T2WI without the PROPELLER technique, or SPIO-enhanced T2*-weighted GRE imaging.Prediction of vascular involvement and resectability by multidetector-row CT versus MR imaging with MR angiography in patients who underwent surgery for resection of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma.To compare the diagnostic value of dual-phase multidetector-row CT (MDCT) and MR imaging with dual-phase three-dimensional MR angiography (MRA) in the prediction of vascular involvement and resectability of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma.116 patients with proven pancreatic adenocarcinoma underwent both MDCT and combined MR imaging prior to surgery. Of 116 patients, 56 who underwent surgery were included. Two radiologists independently attempt to assess detectability, vascular involvement and resectability of pancreatic adenocarcinoma on both images. Results were compared with surgical findings and statistical analysis was performed.MDCT detected pancreatic mass in 45 of 56 patients (80.3%) and MR imaging in 44 patients (78.6%). In assessment of vascular involvement, sensitivities and specificities of MDCT were 61% and 96% on a vessel-by-vessel basis, respectively. Those of MR imaging were 57% and 98%, respectively. In determining resectability, sensitivities and specificities of MDCT were 90% and 65%, respectively. Those of MR imaging were 90% and 41%, respectively. There was no statistical difference in detecting tumor, assessing vascular involvement and determining resectability between MDCT and MR imaging (p=0.5).MDCT and MR imaging with MRA demonstrated an equal ability in detection, predicting vascular involvement, and determining resectability for a pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma.Preoperative local MRI-staging of patients with a suspected pancreatic mass.The aim of this study was to define the value of MRI of the pancreas for preoperative local staging of patients with a suspected pancreatic mass. Ninety-four patients (41 women, 53 men; age range 32-87 years) with a suspected pancreatic tumor underwent preoperative staging with MRI on a 1.5-T system. The MRI protocol included breath-hold MR cholangiopancreatography in turbo spin-echo technique, biphasic contrast-enhanced 3D MR angiography, and MRI of the upper abdomen with breath-hold T2-weighted half-Fourier acquired single-shot turbo spin-echo and T1-weighted fast-low-angle-shot (pre- and postcontrast) sequences. Data were collected prospectively and analyzed by two radiologists in agreement modality. Evaluation criteria were vascular involvement, resectability, and a characterization benign vs malignant. Results were compared to histopathology in 78 patients. Sixteen patients were followed-up. In 74 of 94 patients a solid tumor or an inflammation of the pancreas ( n=62) or the papilla ( n=12) was detected. In this group, MRI had a sensitivity of 98%, a specificity of 92%, and an accuracy of 96% in the characterization of malignant tumors. Regarding only the solid tumors, the positive predictive value of MRI was 87% with respect to resectability. Other pathologic findings included adenoma or inflammation of the duodenum ( n=5), carcinoma or benign stenosis of the choledochus duct ( n=7) and carcinoma of the gall bladder ( n=2). In 6 patients MRI did not depict any pathologic findings, and follow-up confirmed this interpretation. Magnetic resonance imaging allows a local preoperative staging in patients with suspected pancreatic tumor. Limitations, however, concern to the diagnostics of peritoneal and/or liver metastases.Vascular invasion in pancreatic cancer: predictive values for endoscopic ultrasound and computed tomography imaging.To evaluate the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) to determine vascular invasion in patients with pancreatic cancer.Data were obtained prospectively from patients with a pancreatic lesion who underwent EUS, computed tomographic (CT) imaging, and surgery from March 2005 to March 2010.Fifty patients were included with a mean ± SD age 61 ± 11.5 years; 27 (54%) were women. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value for EUS were the following: 61.1 (95% CI, 38.6-79.7), 90.3 (95% CI, 75.1-96.7), 78.6 (95% CI, 52.4-92.4), and 80 (95% CI, 64.1-90), respectively. The area under the curve for EUS and that for CT were 0.80 (95% CI, 0.68-0.92) and 0.74 (95% CI, 0.61-0.86), respectively. The positive predictive value for arterial invasion was 100% (95% CI, 61-100) for EUS and 60% (95% CI, 31.3-83.2) for CT. There were no complications associated with the EUS or the CT.Endoscopic US is a very good option to detect vascular invasion in patients with pancreatic cancer and is especially sensitive for arterial invasion. When it is available, we recommend that it be performed in addition to CT staging.Comparison of diffusion-weighted MR imaging and multidetector-row CT in the detection of liver metastases in patients operated for pancreatic cancer.The purpose of this study is to determine the value of diffusion-weighted MR imaging (DWI) in the detection of liver metastases in patients with pancreatic tumors when compared to multidetector-row CT (MDCT).DWI and MDCT were performed in 31 consecutive patients with newly diagnosed, potentially resectable pancreatic tumors. CT images were obtained in the arterial and the portal venous phase. For DWI, a respiratory-triggered single-shot echo-planar imaging sequence (b values: 0, 300, and 600 s/mm(2)) was acquired. Images were analyzed in consensus by two radiologists blinded to the clinical data. Imaging results were correlated with intraoperative surgical and ultrasound findings as well as with results of histopathologic analysis and imaging follow-up.Sensitivity and specificity in detecting liver metastases were 53.3% and 77.8% for MDCT and 86.7% and 97.5% for DWI, respectively. In our study population DWI would have changed the therapeutic management in 4 out of 31 patients (12.9%) when compared to MDCT.In the present pilot study, DWI performed significantly better than MDCT in the detection of liver metastases in patients with pancreatic tumors. Therefore, DWI may help to optimize therapeutic management in those patients in the future.Cross-modality PET/CT and contrast-enhanced CT imaging for pancreatic cancer.To explore the diagnostic value of the cross-modality fusion images provided by positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) and contrast-enhanced CT (CECT) for pancreatic cancer (PC).Data from 70 patients with pancreatic lesions who underwent CECT and PET/CT examinations at our hospital from August 2010 to October 2012 were analyzed. PET/CECT for the cross-modality image fusion was obtained using TureD software. The diagnostic efficiencies of PET/CT, CECT and PET/CECT were calculated and compared with each other using a χ(2) test. P < 0.05 was considered to indicate statistical significance.Of the total 70 patients, 50 had PC and 20 had benign lesions. The differences in the sensitivity, negative predictive value (NPV), and accuracy between CECT and PET/CECT in detecting PC were statistically significant (P < 0.05 for each). In 15 of the 31 patients with PC who underwent a surgical operation, peripancreatic vessel invasion was verified. The differences in the sensitivity, positive predictive value, NPV, and accuracy of CECT vs PET/CT and PET/CECT vs PET/CT in diagnosing peripancreatic vessel invasion were statistically significant (P < 0.05 for each). In 19 of the 31 patients with PC who underwent a surgical operation, regional lymph node metastasis was verified by postsurgical histology. There was no statistically significant difference among the three methods in detecting regional lymph node metastasis (P > 0.05 for each). In 17 of the 50 patients with PC confirmed by histology or clinical follow-up, distant metastasis was confirmed. The differences in the sensitivity and NPV between CECT and PET/CECT in detecting distant metastasis were statistically significant (P < 0.05 for each).Cross-modality image fusion of PET/CT and CECT is a convenient and effective method that can be used to diagnose and stage PC, compensating for the defects of PET/CT and CECT when they are conducted individually.Is endosonography an effective method for detection and local staging of the ampullary carcinoma? A prospective study.The relatively rare carcinoma of the ampulla of Vater is a neoplasia with a good prognosis compared to pancreatic cancer. Preoperative staging is important in planning the most suitable surgical intervention.To prospectively evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of Endoscopic Ultrasonography (EUS) in comparison with conventional US and CT scan, in staging of patients with ampullary carcinoma.20 patients (7 women and 13 men) with histologically proven carcinoma of the ampulla of Vater were assessed by EUS, CT scan and US. Results were compared to surgical findings.Endoscopic biopsies were diagnostic in 76% of the patients. Detection of ampullary cancer with US and CT scan was 15% and 20% respectively. Only indirect signs of the disease were identified in the majority of cases using these methods. Overall accuracy of EUS in detection of ampullary tumours was 100%. The EUS was significantly (p < 0.001) superior than US and CT scan in ampullary carcinoma detection. Tumour size, tumour extension and the existence of metastatic lymph nodes were also identified and EUS proved to be very useful for the preoperative classification both for the T and the N components of the TNM staging of this neoplasia. The diagnostic accuracy for tumour extension (T) was 82% and for detection of metastatic lymph nodes (N) was 71%.EUS is more accurate in detecting ampullary cancer than US and CT scan. Tumor extension and locally metastatic lymph nodes are more accurately assessed by means of EUS than with other imaging methods.[Comparison of MRI manifestations and histopathologic findings in pancreatic head carcinoma in vivo ex vivo].To prospectively analyze the correlation of MRI image characteristics with histopathological findings in pancreatic head carcinoma in vivo and ex vivo.Sixteen patients with pancreatic head carcinoma were examined by 1.5T MRI. MR sequences included pre-and post-contrast dynamic 2D FLASH T1WI, TSE T2WI + fat suppressed (FS). All fresh specimens were scanned again within an hour after resection during the Whipple procedure, and were then cut into slices along the direction of MRI scan. The MRI image characteristics were compared with gross and histopathologic findings of the specimens.The tumor size ranged from 1.5 cm x 2.0 cm to 4.8 cm x 4.2 cm with a mean value of 3.6 cm x 3.1 cm. The MRI findings in vivo showed hypointensity in 14 lesions and isointensity in 2, and on 2D FLASH T1WI and TSE T2WI, all lesions displayed mixed intensity except 3 lesions with iso-intensity. During post-contrast dynamic pancreatic parenchymal phase, 15 lesions showed mild enhancement and 11 lesions had ring enhancement sign. Nine lesions displayed progressive irregular moderate enhancement during post-contrast dynamic hepatic phase. Four lesions showed enhancement with iso- and hyperintensity in post-contrast dynamic delayed phase. The MRI findings demonstrated that all lesions ex vivo had hypointensity on 2D FLASH T1 WI and mixed intensity on TSE T2WI + FS. Tumor tissues mainly displayed hypointensity, and the area containing tumor and inflammatory tissue showed iso-intensity on 2D FLASH T1WI. On T2WI + FS, the fibrosis proportion displayed hypo or isointensity, while the tumor and chronic inflammatory tissue demonstrated slight hyperintensity, and the zones of mucous degeneration or pancreatic ductal dilatation displayed hyper-intensity. The ring enhancement of tumor was caused by multiple factors and no obvious enhancement within tumor and fibrosis area were observed during post-contrast dynamic pancreatic parenchymal phase. Progressive irregular enhancement originated from desmoplastic reaction within the tumor during post-contrast dynamic hepatic phase and delayed phase, respectively.Pancreatic head carcinomas contain various kinds of tissues. MRI can reveal these pathologic characteristics. No obvious hemorrhage and necrosis within the tumor were observed in this series.Contrast-enhanced 18F-FDG PET/CT: 1-stop-shop imaging for assessing the resectability of pancreatic cancer.Patients with pancreatic cancer continue to have a poor prognosis, with a 5-y survival rate of less than 5%. Surgery is the only treatment that offers a potential cure. Determining resectability is the principal goal of staging in pancreatic cancer patients. Our objective was to evaluate the value of combined contrast-enhanced (18)F-FDG PET/CT in assessing the resectability of pancreatic cancer and to compare enhanced PET/CT with the performance of PET alone and unenhanced PET/CT.Fifty patients (25 women and 25 men; mean age, 64.3 y; range, 39-84 y) with biopsy-proven pancreatic adenocarcinoma underwent enhanced (18)F-FDG PET/CT for the evaluation of resectability. Criteria for unresectability were distant metastases, peritoneal carcinomatosis, arterial infiltration, or invasion of neighboring organs other than the duodenum. The performance of enhanced PET/CT regarding resectability was compared with that of PET alone and unenhanced PET/CT. Histology, intraoperative findings, and follow-up CT with clinical investigations were used as the reference standard.According to the reference standard, 27 patients had disease that was not resectable because of distant metastases (n=17), peritoneal carcinomatosis (n=5), or local infiltration (n=5). In the assessment of resectability, PET alone had a sensitivity of 100%, specificity of 44%, accuracy of 70%, positive predictive value of 61%, and negative predictive value of 100%; unenhanced PET/CT had respective values of 100%, 56%, 76%, 66%, and 100%; and enhanced PET/CT, 96%, 82%, 88%, 82%, and 96%. In 5 patients, unresectability was missed by all imaging methods and was diagnosed intraoperatively. Enhanced PET/CT was significantly superior to PET alone (P=0.035), and there was a trend for enhanced PET/CT to be superior to unenhanced PET/CT (P=0.070).The use of enhanced PET/CT as a 1-stop-shop imaging protocol for assessing the resectability of pancreatic cancer is feasible and accurate. Enhanced PET/CT is significantly superior to PET alone.Role of 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography imaging in surgery for pancreatic cancer.To evaluate the role of positron emission tomography using 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG-PET) in the surgical management of patients with pancreatic cancer, including the diagnosis, staging, and selection of patients for the subsequent surgical treatment.This study involved 53 patients with proven primary pancreatic cancer. The sensitivity of diagnosing the primary cancer was examined for FDG-PET, CT, cytological examination of the bile or pancreatic juice, and the serum levels of carcinoembrionic antigens (CEA) and carbohydrate antigen 19-9 (CA19-9). Next, the accuracy of staging was compared between FDG-PET and CT. Finally, FDG-PET was analyzed semiquantitatively using the standard uptake value (SUV). The impact of the SUV on patient management was evaluated by examining the correlations between the SUV and the histological findings of cancer.The sensitivity of FDG-PET, CT, cytological examination of the bile or pancreatic juice, and the serum levels of CEA and CA19-9 were 92.5%, 88.7%, 46.4%, 37.7% and 69.8%, respectively. In staging, FDG-PET was superior to CT only in diagnosing distant disease (bone metastasis). For local staging, the sensitivity of CT was better than that of FDG-PET. The SUV did not correlate with the pTNM stage, grades, invasions to the vessels and nerve, or with the size of the tumor. However, there was a statistically significant difference (4.6 +/- 2.9 vs 7.8 +/- 4.5, P = 0.024) in the SUV between patients with respectable and unresectable disease.FDG-PET is thus considered to be useful in the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer. However, regarding the staging of the disease, FDG-PET is not considered to be a sufficiently accurate diagnostic modality. Although the SUV does not correlate with the patho-histological prognostic factors, it may be useful in selecting patients who should undergo subsequent surgical treatment.Impact of 18-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography on the management of pancreatic cancer.We compared the usefulness of positron emission tomography with the glucose analogue 2-deoxy-2-[18F]-fluoro-D-glucose (FDG-PET) and multidetector-row computed tomography (MD-CT) in diagnosing pancreatic cancer and in determining the patients' suitability for surgery.We reviewed the clinical FDG-PET data of 103 consecutive pancreatic cancer patients between July 2004 and March 2009.The detection rates of pancreatic cancer by MD-CT (89%) and FDG-PET (91%) were similar. From the MD-CT findings, 38 patients were judged as operable, and 65, inoperable. Among the inoperable patients, noncurative factors (metastasis to the liver, peritoneum, remote lymph nodes, bones, and other organs and major arterial invasion) were detected by MD-CT and/or FDG-PET. Detection rates of liver metastasis and arterial invasion by FDG-PET were significantly inferior to those of MD-CT (neither was detected by FDG-PET alone). Remote lymph nodes and bone metastasis were detected in 20 lesions by FDG-PET alone; however, MD-CT indicated other noncurative factors in these patients. All 65 patients could be diagnosed as inoperable without FDG-PET.FDG-PET is not a suitable imaging modality for either diagnosis or preoperative treatment in pancreatic cancer patients. Since it is expensive, FDG-PET as a routine diagnostic tool in pancreatic cancer patients must be used with caution.The diagnostic accuracy and strength of agreement between endoscopic ultrasound and histopathology in the staging of ampullary tumors.Ampullary tumors are rare. Reports on ampullary tumor staging are heterogeneous and combine both periampullary and ampullary tumors. This study assessed the performance of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) in the local staging of ampullary tumors only.Data were collected retrospectively. We included patients with an ampullary tumor who underwent EUS and surgical resection. Tumor (T) and nodal (N) TNM staging for EUS and histopathological (HP) staging were compared.From 2009 to 2010, a total of 79 patients with ampullary tumors were identified. Of these, 26 had both EUS and Whipple's surgery and were included (28 did not undergo resection, 13 had palliative surgery only and 12 had resection without EUS). For T staging by HP, there were 2 (7.7 %) T1, 11 (42.3 %) T2, 12 (46.2 %) T3 and 1 (3.8 %) T4 tumors. The accuracy of EUS T staging was 73.1 % with a Kappa value of 0.564 (p < 0.0001). The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), negative predictive values (NPV) of EUS, respectively were 50.0 %, 91.7 %, 33.3 % and 95.7 % for T1 tumors; 81.8 %, 80.0 %, 75.0 % and 85.7 % for T2; 75.0 %, 92.9 %, 90.0 % and 81.3 % for T3 tumors. For N staging by HP, 17 (65.4 %) were N0 and 9 (34.6 %) N1. The N staging diagnostic accuracy was 80.8 % with a Kappa value of 0.586 (p = 0.003). The sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV for N0 disease were 82.4 %, 77.8 %, 87.5 % and 70.0 %, respectively while for N1 they were 77.8 %, 82.4 %, 70.0 % and 87.5 %, respectively.EUS had a moderate strength of agreement with histopathology for both T and N staging, and a high diagnostic accuracy for nodal staging.Staging of ampullary and pancreatic carcinoma: comparison between endosonography and surgery.The aim of the study was to update our previously published data on the clinical TNM staging of ampullary and pancreatic carcinoma by endosonography.Endosonography was performed in 70 patients with pancreatic cancer and in 32 patients with ampullary carcinoma. TNM staging was carried out before surgery and compared with findings of histology and/or surgery.Endosonography was accurate in staging the depth of tumor invasion. Early-stage carcinomas could be distinguished from advanced cancers. Nonresectability was accurately assessed on the basis of vascular involvement using real-time ultrasound. Tumor compression due to peritumoral pancreatitis and direct tumor invasion into the base of the mesocolon could not be diagnosed by endosonography. The overall accuracy in tumor staging for pancreatic and ampullary carcinomas was 83.6% and 84.4%, respectively. Endosonography was accurate in diagnosing regional lymph node metastases but not accurate in defining nonmetastatic lymphadenopathy and distant metastases.Endosonography was accurate in staging tumor stage and lymph node metastases. Minimally invasive methods of resection for superficial ampullary cancers should be based on endosonography staging.Contrast-enhanced harmonic EUS with novel ultrasonographic contrast (Sonazoid) in the preoperative T-staging for pancreaticobiliary malignancies.Sonazoid is a new second-generation microbubble contrast for ultrasonography. In this pilot study, the diagnostic role of contrast-enhanced harmonic imaging endoscopic ultrasonography (CH-EUS) with Sonazoid was prospectively evaluated in preoperative T-staging of pancreaticobiliary malignancies.Patients with suspected pancreaticobiliary malignancies underwent CH-EUS by a single examiner. After the lesions were observed carefully with conventional harmonic imaging EUS (H-EUS), CH-EUS was performed with intravenous injection of Sonazoid. A reviewer who was blinded reviewed the recordings of H-EUS and CH-EUS and assessed the T-staging. The accuracy of H-EUS and CH-EUS for T-staging was compared to the results of surgical histopathology in patients who underwent surgery.Twenty-six patients underwent surgical resection and could be included in the study. The final diagnosis were pancreatic cancer in 11, bile duct cancer in 7, gallbladder cancer in 4 and ampullary cancer in 4. The overall accuracy of H-EUS and CH-EUS for T-staging were 69.2 (18/26) and 92.4% (24/26), respectively (p < 0.05). There were disagreement in six cases between H-EUS and CH-EUS. CH-EUS staged correctly in all of these six cases, whereas H-EUS misdiagnosed the depth of invasion in one case of gallbladder cancer and one case of ampullary cancer, and invasion of portal vein in two cases of pancreatic cancer and two cases of bile duct cancer.The depth of invasion of biliary cancer and vascular invasion of pancreatic and biliary cancer could be demonstrated more clearly with CH-EUS compared to H-EUS. CH-EUS has the potential to improve the diagnostic accuracy of preoperative T-staging of pancreaticobiliary malignancies.Assessment of resectability of pancreatic cancer with dynamic contrast-enhanced MR imaging: technique, surgical correlation and patient outcome.The aim of our work was to investigate the use of a dynamic contrast-enhanced MR (DCEMR) technique for staging apparently localised pancreatic cancer, and to determine the patterns of tumour and vascular enhancement with this technique. Thirty-five consecutive patients were examined. The MR findings were correlated with surgical findings in 13 patients and with clinical outcome in 22 patients. Breath-hold gradient-echo fast low angle shot (TR = 100, TE = 4, flip angle 80 degrees ) acquisitions were obtained at 10 and 40 s (right anterior coronal oblique plane) and at 90 s (axial plane) following intravenous gadolinium. Mean contrast-to-noise ratio was higher on the first than the second acquisition (p < 0. 001) and higher on the second acquisition than the third (p < 0.005). Tumour conspicuity was greatest and arterial anatomy was best demonstrated on the first acquisition and the portal venous anatomy on the second. Small tumours were isointense by the third acquisition. Maximal intensity projections were helpful. The MR findings correctly predicted the surgical findings in 11 of 13 cases (85 %) and the clinical course in the other 22 patients. The DCEMR imaging technique is valuable in the staging of patients with pancreatic cancer. Capillary and portal venous phase images are both required for complete local staging.[Comparison of multi-slice spiral CT and magnetic resonance imaging in evaluation of the un-resectability of blood vessels in pancreatic tumor].To compare the values of multi-slice spiral CT (MSCT) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in evaluating the un-resectability of blood vessels in pancreatic tumor.Images obtained from MSCT and MRI of pancreas in 14 patients with pancreatic cancer were retrospectively reviewed. MSCT scanning included arterial phase, pancreatic-portal phase, and delay-phase. MRI scanning included fat-suppressed T2WI, dual-echo T1WI, and fat-suppressed T1WI before and after injection of contrast (arterial phase, pancreatic-portal phase, delay-phase, and late delay phase). Seven patients received operations within two weeks after the examinations. The staging of peripancreatic blood vessels in MSCT and MRI images was evaluated and compared. The veracity of MSCT and MRI in assessing the un-resectability of peripancreatic blood vessels was calculated and compared according to the findings in operation.All the tumors were observed in MSCT and MRI images. Statistical difference existed in staging of peripancreatic blood vessels and in evaluating their un-resectability between MSCT and MR (P < 0.05). The sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value of the un-resectability assessed by MSCT were 77.8%, 95%, 91.8%, 77.8%, and 95%, respectively, and those assessed by MR were 66.7%, 90%, 85.7%, 60%, and 92.3%, respectively.Dynamic MSCT is better than dynamic MR to some extent in evaluating the un-resectability of peripancreatic blood vessels in pancreatic tumor.Clinical utility of endoscopic ultrasonography for pancreatic tumors.Staging of pancreatic carcinoma by endoscopic ultrasonography.The ability of EUS to diagnose small pancreatic cancer is well known. In this study, we present our experience with EUS in the local staging of 29 patients with pancreatic carcinoma who underwent surgery. EUS was 79, 83 and 79% accurate in determining anterior (including gastric), duodenal and retroperitoneal (vascular) invasion by the tumor. Ultrasonography (48, 39 and 55%, respectively) and CT (38, 33 and 41%, respectively) were less reliable. EUS was equal to angiography in diagnosing vascular involvement. EUS was more effective in detecting splenoportal infiltration (sensitivity 88%, specificity 78%) than arterial involvement (accuracy 50%). EUS was also less reliable in determining the N stage (66%) and in stage grouping (72%). Although EUS is superior to ultrasonography and CT in the local staging of pancreatic carcinoma, further studies must show whether improved staging criteria will lead to better results.Endoscopic ultrasonography in the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic adenocarcinoma. Results of a prospective study with comparison to ultrasonography and CT scan.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) was compared to ultrasonography (US) and CT scan (CT) in order to evaluate its role in the diagnosis and the locoregional spread assessment of pancreatic cancer. Sixty-four patients suspected of pancreatic cancer were studied prospectively, and the results of imaging techniques were compared to histology and surgical exploration. There were 49 cases of pancreatic adenocarcinoma, 11 of pancreatitis, 2 of common bile duct carcinoma, 1 lymphoma and 1 hepatocellular carcinoma with peripancreatic metastatic lymph nodes. EUS was significantly more accurate (91%) than CT (66%) and US (64%) for diagnosis of pancreatic cancer. EUS was able to image all 7 cancers less than 25 mm in diameter, US and CT only one. There were 4 false positives with EUS which were all cases of pseudotumorous pancreatitis. For detecting lymph node involvement, EUS was significantly more sensitive (62%) and accurate (74%) than US (8% and 37%) and CT (19% and 42%), respectively. Invaded lymph nodes adjacent to large tumors and micrometastatic involvement were responsible for this lack of sensitivity. EUS was significantly more sensitive (100%) than CT (71%) and US (17%) for detecting venous involvement. The specificity of EUS was lower (67%) because of duodenal bulb stenosis and large tumors. In conclusion, this prospective and comparative study confirms that EUS is an accurate tool for diagnosis and locoregional spread assessment of pancreatic cancer when performed in a reference center. EUS is of particular interest for small tumours. However, EUS does not enable differentiation of pseudotumorous pancreatitis from adenocarcinoma.Comparison of multidetector CT and endoscopic ultrasonography in malignant pancreatic mass lesions.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) has been shown to be superior to conventional CT in detecting and staging pancreatic cancer. We conducted a prospective trial to compare EUS and MDCT, in discriminating benign/malignant, in determining local and vascular invasion of a suspected pancreatic cancer and deciding its resectability.The study was performed at the Gastroenterology Department of Izmir Ataturk Training and Research Hospital, from June 2009 to June 2010, all patients with suspected pancreatic and periampullary tumors referred to our department were enrolled. A total of 56 patients were evaluated at the beginning. Five patients having distal CBD tumor (n=2), gallbladder tumor (n=1) and papillary tumor (n=2) were excluded from the study. Analysis was done for the remaining 51 patients.For the diagnosis of resectability/unresectability, EUS alone demonstrated a definite role in 4 (9%) of the 43 patients in confirming surgical and pathologic results and MDCT alone demonstrated a definite role in 6 (14%) of the 43 patients in confirming their results. An accurate diagnostic decision regarding resectability/unresectability was accomplished in 27 (63%) patients with EUS and MDCT.While MDCT is clinically quite effective, in terms of a correct resectability/unresectability decision, EUS should also be used.Value of helical computed tomography, angiography, and endoscopic ultrasound in determining resectability of periampullary carcinoma.High-quality preoperative radiographic evaluation is crucial in selecting patients with periampullary carcinomas who are candidates for surgical exploration and tumor resection while minimizing the rate of unnecessary laparotomy.Twenty-one consecutive patients were prospectively investigated using helical computed tomography (CT) scanning, endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS), and selective visceral angiography (SVA) to determine tumor resectability. All patients were explored and resectability determined.Helical CT had a sensitivity of 63%, a specificity of 100%, and an overall accuracy of 86%. EUS had a sensitivity of 75%, a specificity of 77%, and an overall accuracy of 76%. SVA had a sensitivity of 38%, a specificity of 92%, and an overall accuracy of 71%.Helical CT scanning is the best preoperative imaging test to determine tumor resectability. EUS is more sensitive than CT for tumor detection, but underestimates resectability. SVA is no longer helpful in the preoperative evaluation of these malignancies.Diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer: comparison of mangafodipir trisodium-enhanced MR imaging and contrast-enhanced helical hydro-CT.The purpose of this study was to compare mangafodipir trisodium-enhanced MR imaging performed with a phased array coil and contrast-enhanced single-detector helical CT for accuracy in the detection and local staging of pancreatic adenocarcinoma and in the differentiation between cancer and focal pancreatitis.Forty-two patients with suspected pancreatic masses underwent contrast-enhanced helical CT and mangafodipir trisodium-enhanced MR imaging at 1.5 T. The images were assessed for the presence or absence of tumors; characterization of masses; and presence of vascular invasion, lymph node metastases, or liver metastases. Imaging findings were correlated with findings at laparotomy, laparoscopy, biopsy, or follow-up.Focal masses were present in 36 patients (cancer, n = 26; focal pancreatitis, n = 7; other, n = 3). The sensitivity for lesion detection of MR imaging was 100% and of CT, 94%. Two small malignant lesions were missed on CT. For the diagnosis of tumor nonresectability, the sensitivity of MR imaging and CT was 90% and 80%, respectively. Liver metastases were missed on MR imaging in one of the eight patients and on CT in four. For differentiation between adenocarcinoma and nonadenocarcinoma, the sensitivity of MR imaging was 100% (positive predictive value, 90%; negative predictive value, 100%), and the sensitivity of CT was 92% (positive predictive value, 80%; negative predictive value, 67%). Receiver operating characteristic analysis revealed that the mean area under the curve for MR imaging was 0.920 and for CT, 0.832 (not significant).Mangafodipir trisodium-enhanced MR imaging is as accurate as contrast-enhanced helical CT for the detection and staging of pancreatic cancer but offers improved detection of small pancreatic metastases and of liver metastases compared with CT.Performance characteristics of EUS for locoregional evaluation of ampullary lesions.The accuracy of EUS in the locoregional assessment of ampullary lesions is unclear.To compare EUS with ERCP and surgical pathology for the evaluation of intraductal extension and local staging of ampullary lesions.Retrospective cohort study.Tertiary-care referral center.All patients who underwent EUS primarily for the evaluation of an ampullary lesion between 1998 and 2012.EUS.Comparison of EUS sensitivity/specificity for intraductal and local extension with ERCP and surgical pathology by using the area under the receiver-operating characteristic (AUROC) curves and outcomes of the subgroup referred for endoscopic papillectomy.We identified 119 patients who underwent EUS for an ampullary lesion, of whom 99 (83%) had an adenoma or adenocarcinoma. Compared with ERCP (n = 90), the sensitivity/specificity of EUS for any intraductal extension was 56%/97% (AUROC = 0.77; 95% confidence interval [CI], 0.64-0.89). However, when using surgical pathology as the reference (n = 102), the sensitivity/specificity of EUS (80%/93%; AUROC = 0.87; 95% CI, 0.76-0.97) and ERCP (83%/93%; AUROC = 0.88; 95% CI, 0.77-0.99) were comparable. The overall accuracy of EUS for local staging was 90%. Of 58 patients referred for endoscopic papillectomy, complete resection was achieved in 53 (91%); in those having intraductal extension by EUS or ERCP, complete resection was achieved in 4 of 5 (80%) and 4 of 7 (57%), respectively.Retrospective design.EUS and ERCP perform similarly in evaluating intraductal extension of ampullary adenomas. Additionally, EUS is accurate in T-staging ampullary adenocarcinomas. Future prospective studies should evaluate whether EUS can identify characteristics of ampullary lesions that appropriately direct patients to endoscopic or surgical resection.Preoperative evaluation of periampullary tumors by endoscopic sonography, transabdominal sonography, and computed tomography.The purpose of this retrospective study was to compare the sensitivity of endoscopic sonography (EUS), transabdominal sonography (US), and CT in the detection of, local staging of, and prediction of vascular involvement by or distant metastasis from periampullary tumors.Seventy-four consecutive patients with presumed periampullary tumors were evaluated by EUS, US, and CT during a 3.25-year period. The local staging accuracy of the modalities was assessed in the 36 patients with solid tumors who underwent surgery. The sensitivity of the modalities in predicting vascular involvement and distant metastasis was assessed in the 56 patients with carcinomas.EUS was the most sensitive modality in the detection (EUS, 97%; US, 24%; and CT, 39%; p < 0.001 for EUS versus US or CT) and T classification (EUS, 72%; US, 11%; CT, 22%; p < 0.001 for EUS versus US or CT) of periampullary tumors. EUS also had better sensitivity than US in detecting lymph node metastasis from periampullary cancers (EUS, 47%; US, 7%; and CT, 33%; p = 0.02 for EUS versus US; p = 0.7 for EUS versus CT). The accuracy of EUS in determining the T classification (without stent, 81%; with stent, 65%) and N classification (without stent, 80%; with stent, 70%) tended to decrease in the presence of an endobiliary stent, but the differences were not significant. EUS was the most sensitive modality in demonstrating vascular involvement (EUS, 100%; US, 0%; and CT, 33%; p = 0.002 for EUS versus US; p = 0.03 for EUS versus CT) but was not significantly different in detecting distant metastasis (EUS, 11%; US, 44%; and CT, 44%).EUS is superior to US and CT in the local assessment of periampullary tumors. The staging accuracy of EUS is minimally but not significantly affected by the presence of an endobiliary stent.Identification and staging of pancreatic tumours using computed tomography, endoscopic ultrasound and mangafodipir trisodium-enhanced magnetic resonance imaging.Pancreatic malignancy can be staged by a number of different investigations, either alone or in combination. The purpose of the present study was to compare the use of endoscopic ultrasound, CT and mangafodipir trisodium-enhanced MRI for the staging of pancreatic malignancy, particularly with respect to determining resectability prior to surgery. Twenty-seven patients referred for the investigation of a suspected pancreatic malignancy were entered into the trial. All patients had contrast-enhanced CT, gadolinium and mangafodipir trisodium-enhanced MRI, and endoscopic ultrasound (EUS). Images were assessed for nodal staging, tumour staging and resectability for each investigation, and the results compared with findings at surgery. The results for the accuracy of MRI, CT and EUS, in detecting T4 disease versus T3 or lower was 78, 79 and 68%, respectively; nodal involvement was 56, 63 and 69%, respectively; and overall resectability (including the T stage, presence of involved nodes and metastases) was 83, 76 and 63%, respectively. There was no significant difference demonstrated between the three tests. The present study suggests that for patients referred for investigation and staging of pancreatic malignancy, EUS and MRI scanning convey little advantage over contrast-enhanced CT. Furthermore, although mangafodipir trisodium improved the conspicuity of pancreatic tumours, it has little influence on T staging.Impact of F18-fluorodeoxyglycose positron emission tomography/computed tomography on the management of resectable pancreatic tumours.Positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) using F18-fluorodeoxyglucose has been shown to be valuable in the management of malignant disease. The aim of this study is to investigate the impact of this technique on the management of patients with resectable pancreatic tumours.Thirty-six patients with 37 potentially resectable pancreatic tumours on diagnostic CT imaging underwent PET/CT scans. Operative findings, histological reports and/or clinical follow-up served as standard of reference. The impact of PET/CT on patient management was estimated by calculating the percentage of patients whose treatment plan was altered due to PET/CT.Pancreatic adenocarcinoma was diagnosed in 30 patients, neuroendocrine tumours in 3, mass-forming pancreatitis in 3 and serous cystadenoma in 1. The median standard uptake (max) value was 5.0 (range 2.2-12.0). Sensitivity and specificity of detecting extrapancreatic metastatic disease were 73% and 100%, respectively. Three occult liver metastases were detected at laparotomy following negative PET/CT. PET/CT findings influenced the management of 8 (22%) patients - 3 with liver metastases, 3 with bone metastases, 1 with lymph node metastases and 1 by identifying the benign appearance of the pancreatic tumour.PET/CT achieves a significant diagnostic impact in detecting extrapancreatic metastatic disease. F18-fluorodeoxyglucose PET/CT appears to be useful in assessing suspicious pancreatic masses.Comparison of endoscopic ultrasonography and multidetector computed tomography for detecting and staging pancreatic cancer.Accurate preoperative detection and staging of pancreatic cancer may identify patients with locoregional disease that is amenable to surgical resection.To compare endoscopic ultrasonography and multidetector computed tomography (CT) for the detection, staging, and resectability of known or suspected locoregional pancreatic cancer.Prospective, observational, cohort study.Single, tertiary referral hospital in Indianapolis, Indiana.120 participants with known or suspected locoregional pancreatic cancer.Endoscopic ultrasonography followed by multidetector CT was performed in all patients. Patients with known or suspected pancreatic cancer deemed potentially resectable by 1 or both tests were considered for surgery.Detection, staging, and resectability of pancreatic cancer. Surgically resected pancreatic cancer with negative microscopic histologic margins was considered resectable.Of 120 patients enrolled, 104 (87%) underwent endoscopic ultrasonography and CT. Of the 80 patients with pancreatic cancer, 27 (34%) were managed nonoperatively, and 53 (66%) treated surgically had resectable (n = 25) or unresectable (n = 28) cancer. For the 80 patients with cancer, the sensitivity of endoscopic ultrasonography (98% [95% CI, 91% to 100%]) for detecting a pancreatic mass was greater than that of CT (86% [CI, 77% to 93%]; P = 0.012). For the 53 surgical patients, endoscopic ultrasonography was superior to CT for tumor staging accuracy (67% vs. 41%; P < 0.001) but equivalent for nodal staging accuracy (44% vs. 47%; P > 0.2). Of the 25 resectable pancreatic tumors in patients recommended for surgery, endoscopic ultrasonography and CT correctly identified 88% and 92%, respectively, as resectable. Of the 28 unresectable pancreatic tumors in patients recommended for surgery, endoscopic ultrasonography and CT correctly identified 68% and 64%, respectively, as unresectable.Radiologists who read the scans and endosonographers were not blinded to previous radiographic information. Because of the modest sample size, CIs of the sensitivity estimates were sometimes wide.Compared with multidetector CT, endoscopic ultrasonography is superior for tumor detection and staging but similar for nodal staging and resectability of preoperatively suspected nonmetastatic pancreatic cancer.Preoperative staging of periampullar cancer with US, CT, EUS and CA 19-9.Several diagnostic methods are available for preoperative staging of periampullary cancers. It happens that on the basis of preoperative findings the patient is prepared for radical surgery, but during the operation the lesion turns out to be unresectable.We studied 43 patients operated on for periampullary cancer. Preoperatively, all patients were evaluated by ultrasonography, computed tomography, endoscopic ultrasonography and the level of carbohydrate antigen 19-9 was assessed. Statistical parameters were calculated and compared.Endoscopic ultrasonography has specificity of 70.8% and positive predictive value regarding tumor resectability 55.8%. Computed tomography has a specificity of 45.8% and carbohydrate antigen 19-9 of 66.7%. Positive predictive value for computed tomography and carbohydrate antigen 19-9 is 40.6% and 52.6%, respectively. Ultrasonography is the least accurate method with specificity of 12.5% and positive predictive value 29.7%. A combined use of different diagnostic methods has higher positive predictive value, highest (65.1%) being found for the combination of endoscopic ultrasonography and carbohydrate antigen 19-9. Statistical tests showed statistically significant differences between diagnostic methods.Among the diagnostic methods studied, endoscopic ultrasonography showed the highest accuracy in predicting tumor resectability. The use of either endoscopic ultrasonography and carbohydrate antigen 19-9 or computed tomography and carbohydrate antigen 19-9 is accurate enough for assessing tumor resectability.[Retroactive evaluation of perioperative staging and surgical decision making for patients with pancreatic cancer].[The endosonographic staging of pancreatic carcinoma].Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS), conventional ultrasound (US), computed tomography (CT) and angiography were compared in their assessment of local resectability in 35 consecutive patients (19 men, 16 women; mean age 49.8 [42-821] years) with non-metastatic carcinoma of the pancreas. The findings were made prospectively and independently of each other. EUS proved to be superior to transabdominal US and to CT in the diagnosis of tumour infiltration of the portal and splenic veins. For the portal vein the sensitivity was 93% by EUS, 14% by US and 36% by CT. Corresponding figures for the splenic vein were 92%, 39% and 69%. EUS was markedly superior to angiography in the diagnosis of portal vein involvement (sensitivity of 93% and 36%, respectively), but the two methods had similar sensitivity regarding splenic vein infiltration (92 and 100%). Tumour involvement of the coeliac trunk was diagnosed with higher sensitivity angiographically (86%) than by EUS (57%), CT (71%) or US (29%). Regarding T and N staging, EUS was superior to both US and CT. These data indicate that EUS is the most accurate method for local tumour staging of potentially resectable pancreatic carcinoma. It can replace angiography in the diagnosis of portal vein infiltration.3DFT-flash MR imaging of pancreatic cancer with gadopentetate dimeglumine.We evaluated the usefulness of dynamic 3-dimensional Fourier transformation (3DFT) fast low angle shot (FLASH) MR imaging using gadopentetate dimeglumine (Gd-DTPA) to assess the extent of pancreatic cancer.Breath-hold 3DFT-FLASH MR images (20/4; 25 degrees flip angle; 7 partitions; 3-5-mm slice thickness) were obtained before the ++administration of 0.1 mmol/kg of Gd-DTPA, just after (early phase), and 1 and 2 min (late phases) after in 14 patients with pancreatic cancer. All patients underwent surgical removal or laparotomy. We compared the findings of T1-, T2-, and postcontrast T1-weighted spin-echo (conventional SE) and 3DFT-FLASH imaging with histologic or surgical findings.Dynamic MR images could delineate the pancreatic tumors more clearly than the conventional SE images, and were useful for diagnosing vessel invasion. The contrast-to-noise ratio between the pancreatic cancer and the surrounding pancreatic parenchyma was significantly higher with the dynamic 3DFT-FLASH image than with the conventional SE images (p<0.01).Dynamic 3DFT-FLASH MR imaging with Gd-DTPA is useful in delineating and evaluating the extent of pancreatic cancer.Contribution of PET in the detection of liver metastases from pancreatic tumours.Although uptake of 2-deoxy-2-[fluorine-18]fluoro-D-glucose (FDG) in the liver is basically high, metastatic liver tumours are known to be positive on positron emission tomography (PET). The purpose of this study is to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of FDG-PET in detecting hepatic metastases from pancreatic cancer.Thirty-four patients with histologically proven malignant tumours of the pancreas underwent FDG-PET, computed tomography (CT) and transabdominal ultrasound (US). The findings of PET, CT and US were compared with the histopathologic findings at surgery or with clinical follow-up and the diagnostic accuracy of PET was evaluated.PET showed 28 regions of high FDG uptake (SUV = 3.3-9.1) in 13 patients. Twenty-six foci were metastatic lesions confirmed by surgery (n = 11), clinical follow-up (n = 10) or autopsy (n = 5). FDG-PET accurately differentiated seven metastatic lesions from cysts when the diagnosis by US or CT was unreliable because of the small size of the lesion. In two patients who had areas of high uptake in the liver, no metastases were detected by surgery. FDG-PET showed no areas of increased uptake in 21 patients. Surgery revealed no metastatic lesions in the liver in 20 of 21 patients, but a liver metastasis was found at surgery in one patient. The diagnostic accuracy of FDG-PET was 90%, which was comparable with that of US or CT.Our data suggest that PET is reliable in detecting liver, metastases from pancreatic cancer.Staging of pancreatic and ampullary carcinoma by endoscopic ultrasonography. Comparison with conventional sonography, computed tomography, and angiography.In a prospective study, endoscopic ultrasonography was compared with transabdominal ultrasonography, computed tomography, and angiography in 60 consecutive patients with pancreatic (n = 46) and ampullary (n = 14) cancer considered to be candidates for surgery. The diagnostic value of these imaging procedures in determining local resectability was assessed. The diagnosis of ampullopancreatic malignancy was made by operation (n = 40) or puncture/biopsy (n = 20). In the 40 patients who underwent surgery, endoscopic ultrasonography was significantly superior to abdominal ultrasonography and computed tomography in determining tumor size and extent and lymph node metastases of pancreatic and ampullary cancer. Furthermore, involvement of the portal venous system as judged by histopathology or surgical exploration was correctly assessed by endoscopic ultrasonography in 95%, whereas angiography (85%), computed tomography (75%) and abdominal ultrasonography (55%) were less sensitive. Of 11 cases of portal venous infiltration found at surgery, endoscopic ultrasonography correctly predicted 10, abdominal ultrasonography only 1, computed tomography 4, and angiography 5 (P less than 0.05 for all three comparisons). Twenty patients did not undergo surgery for different reasons: of those, 9 patients were excluded from operation because of portal venous involvement as shown by angiography. Endoscopic ultrasonography detected portal venous invasion in all these cases. In contrast to the venous system, arterial encasement was less reliably detected by endoscopic ultrasonography. In conclusion, endoscopic ultrasonography is the most effective single imaging procedure for local tumor staging in pancreatic and ampullary cancer. Thus, endoscopic ultrasonography will improve the assessment of tumor resectability and further decrease the need for explorative laparotomy.[Prospective comparison of ultrasonography, helical computed tomography, magnetic resonance imaging, and endoscopic ultrasonography in assessing locoregional invasion of primary pancreatic carcinoma].To evaluate prospectively the efficacy and clinical significance of ultrasonography (US), helical computed tomography (HCT), endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in assessing locoregional invasion to the surrounding tissue or organs of primary pancreatic carcinoma.Sixty-eight consecutive patients with pancreatic carcinoma underwent US, HCT, EUS and MRI examinations before surgical exploration. All imaging results in terms of tumor size and locoregional invasion were assessed separately by two diagnostic radiologists and compared with the surgical and pathological findings.Among the HCT, US, EUS and MRI examinations, EUS had the highest accuracy in assessing tumor size with a regression coefficient for the maximal and minimal diameter of 1.0250 (P = 0.0426) and 0.9873 (P < 0.0001), respectively. In the assessment of locoregional invasion to the surrounding tissue or organs, EUS also had the highest accuracy (75.8%) and sensitivity (80.0%), but MRI had the highest positive predicting value (97.4%). None of these four imaging techniques was significantly correlated with the surgical findings when analyzed by univariate logistic regression.Endoscopic ultrasonography may be the most useful imaging technique in assessing tumor size, but for assessing loco-regional invasion of primary pancreatic carcinoma, combination of more than one imaging techniques may be necessary.Radial endoscopic ultrasound and spiral computed tomography in the diagnosis and staging of periampullary tumors.The early detection and accurate staging of pancreatic and ampullary cancer is of utmost importance for the achievement of surgical radical treatment. The aim of this study was to assess prospectively the role of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in detection and staging of pancreatic and ampullary cancer, comparing its results to those obtained with spiral computed tomography (SCT).Sixty-one patients with suspected pancreatic and ampullary tumors were included, 46 (75, 4%) of whom presented with obstructive jaundice. Patients underwent EUS and SCT within a 7-day period. Examiners were unaware of the previous imaging results, except conventional echography. Image interpretation was compared to surgical and histopathological findings.Fifty-six (91, 8%) patients were surgically explored. Clinical follow-up and/or tissue diagnosis determined the correct diagnosis in the remaining five patients. Pancreatic cancer and ampullary cancer were observed in 29 (47, 6%) and 10 (16, 4%) patients, respectively. Chronic pancreatitis and choledocholithiasis were the most common diagnosis in patients with non-neoplastic disease. EUS was more effective than SCT for the definition of the final diagnosis in patients with obstructive jaundice (87.0 vs. 67.4%, p = 0.04). Both exams were equally effective for detecting pancreatic cancer but EUS predicted more accurately the involvement of portal-mesenteric axis by the tumor (87.0 vs. 67.4%, p = 0.04). EUS was particularly useful in the diagnosis of cancer of papilla of Vater.In patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma without unequivocal signs of distant metastatic disease, EUS is more accurate than SCT to predict venous involvement by the tumor. EUS is superior to SCT to detect ampullary adenocarcinoma. Both methods are equally ineffective to detect nodal involvement in pancreatic and ampullary cancer.Role of EUS in the management of pancreatic and ampullary carcinoma: a prospective study assessing resectability and prognosis.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is highly accurate for the staging of tumors, but its role in the management of periampullary carcinoma is still being defined.Seventy-nine patients with pancreatic (n = 73) or ampullary (n = 6) carcinoma underwent prospective evaluation by means of assessment of resectability and survival according to the following three-step staging algorithm: (1) ultrasonography and computed tomography; (2) if tumor appears resectable, EUS; (3) if criteria of resectability are found at EUS, laparotomy for curative resection.The first step of the algorithm helped predict unresectability of tumors and need for palliative treatment for 36 patients. Among the other 43 patients EUS revealed signs of unresectability in 20 additional patients who then underwent palliative surgical or medical treatment (median survival time 7 to 8 months). Twenty-three carcinomas were considered resectable according to EUS findings: Palliative surgery was performed in 9 cases (survival time 6 months), and 14 tumors could be resected in a curative way with a median survival period of 15 (pancreatic) to 16 months (ampullary). In evaluation of resectability, EUS had a 50% sensitivity (positive examination), 100% specificity, 100% positive predictive value, 61% negative predictive value, and 72% accuracy.EUS is accurate for evaluating resectability of ampullary and pancreatic cancer. EUS staging can prevent unnecessary surgery, and the findings correlate well with prognosis. The management of ampullary and pancreatic cancer could be improved with EUS.Diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer by endoscopic ultrasound.The aim of this study was to evaluate the usefulness of and problems associated with endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in the diagnosis and pre-operative staging of pancreatic cancer. 96 patients suspected of having pancreatic cancer were pre-operatively examined with EUS. 37 of these 96 patients had pancreatic cancer. Results of the EUS imaging were compared with findings of histology and/or surgery, and the patient's clinical course. The sensitivity and specificity of EUS for diagnosing pancreatic cancer were 89% and 97%, respectively. EUS had excellent sensitivity regardless of tumour size or location. EUS was accurate (90%) in determining tumour size in pancreatic cancers less than 3 cm in maximum diameter, but not for tumours greater than 3 cm (30%). The accuracy of tumour (T) and nodal (N) staging were 64% and 50%, respectively. EUS is a promising method for the early diagnosis and pre-operative staging of pancreatic cancers, but requires further refinement.Sensitivity and specificity of FDG PET-CT scan in detecting lymph node metastasis in operable periampullary tumours in correlation with the final histopathology after curative surgery.18F-Fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography/computerised tomography (FDG-PET/CT) was investigated for evaluation of periampullary tumours and other gastrointestinal neoplasms. The aim of this study was to evaluate the utility of FDG-PET/CT for detection of lymph node metastasis in periampullary tumours by comparing the preoperative FDG-PET/CT scan finding with postoperative histopathology of lymph nodes. Study was done on 24 patients with diagnosis of periampullary carcinoma either proven or suspected on conventional radiology. Standard uptake value (SUV) were measured for lymph node areas with uptake in FDG-PET/CT and compared with histopathological lymph node status. For detection of lymph node metastasis, FDG-PET/CT with cutoff value SUV max ≥2.0 had a sensitivity of 71.4 % and specificity of 77.8 % and that for SUV max ≥2.5 and 2.8 were 57.1, 42.9 and 77.8, 77.8 %, respectively. The sensitivity and specificity of FDG-PET/CT at each lymph node groups were 72 and 89 % in peripancreatic area, 100 and 93 % in hepatoduodenal area and 100 and 100 % in aortocaval area at SUV max ≥2.0, respectively. At SUV max ≥2.5 the values were 57 and 89 % in peripancreatic area, 100 and 93 % in hepatoduodenal area and 100 and 93 % in aortocaval area. FDG-PET-CT has a possible role in detection of lymph node metastasis in periampullary carcinomas and may be used as a guide for possible lymphadenectomy during surgery and for prognostic purpose.Malignant mediastinal lymphadenopathy detected by staging EUS in patients with pancreaticobiliary cancer.In patients with pancreatic cancer, the presence of malignant mediastinal lymphadenopathy (MML) would preclude definitive resection. A recent study suggested routine evaluation for mediastinal lymph-node metastases in all patients being evaluated for pancreaticobiliary masses. In our practice, we routinely assess for mediastinal lymph-node metastases in all patients undergoing EUS for pancreaticobiliary cancer.We retrospectively evaluated the presence of MML by EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA) in 160 consecutive patients with a definite diagnosis of pancreaticobiliary cancer (pancreatic and periampullary cancers) who underwent EUS-FNA by a single operator from 2000 to 2004. Lymph nodes that were round and hypoechoic with sharp margins were considered suspicious and were sampled by FNA.Of the 160 patients included in this study, 78 had peripancreatic lymph nodes (49%: 95% CI[41%, 58%]), 25 had celiac lymph nodes (16%: 95% CI[10%, 22%]), and 14 patients had mediastinal lymph nodes (9%: 95% CI[4%, 13%]) that were suspicious for malignancy by morphologic criteria. In 8 of 14 patients with suspicious mediastinal lymph nodes, FNA documented MML in 5%: 95% CI[2%, 8%]. Only one of these 8 patients with MML had other sites of documented distant metastases by CT and/or positron emission tomography scans. However, 7 of 8 patients had locally advanced cancers.MML is detected by staging EUS-FNA in 5% of patients with pancreaticobiliary cancer. Because of its important implications, endosonographers should routinely assess for MML in patients who undergo staging EUS for pancreaticobiliary malignancy.[Combined conventional magnetic resonance, magnetic resonance angiography, and magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography in the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic carcinoma].This study was aimed to integrating MR CholangioPancreatography (MRCP) and MR Angiography (MRA) to conventional MR images in the diagnosis and resectability assessment of pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Twenty-three consecutive patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma (16 in the head and 7 in the body-tail region) were examined with MR. Conventional MR, 3D MRCP and venous and arterial MRA images were acquired to assess biliary and vascular involvement. Acquisition time never exceeded 40-45 minutes. The images were independently studied by two radiologists and the final reading was decided upon consensus among readers. Sixteen patients underwent surgery.The diagnosis was confirmed at surgery in 16 patients and at percutaneous biopsy in 7. Interreader agreement was considered high, with .83 interobserver variability. Pancreatic adenocarcinoma was found in all patients examined. Unresectability because of vascular involvement was correctly assessed in all patients but 1. Biliary obstruction was demonstrated in 13 patients, involving the biliary and pancreatic ducts in 9 and the biliary ducts only in 4.Technical advances now permit the extensive application of MRI to the study of abdominal conditions. The combination of MRI, MRCP and MRA can provide most of the information needed for the diagnosis and resectability assessment of pancreatic adenocarcinoma, which can otherwise be obtained only performing three different exams.Pancreatic carcinoma: MR assessment of tumor invasion of the peripancreatic vessels.Our goal was to determine the value of MRI in the assessment of vascular invasion in the preoperative staging of pancreatic carcinoma.In 53 consecutive patients with an established diagnosis of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma, SE T1-weighted and breath-hold gradient echo images at 0.5 T were obtained before and after bolus injection of Gd-DTPA. Major peripancreatic vessels were evaluated for the presence of (a) no tumor invasion, (b) contiguity with tumor, and (c) tumor encasement. All patients subsequently underwent surgery. Results of unenhanced and contrast-enhanced MRI studies were compared with the histologic findings in the resected specimens in 34 cases and with the surgical findings in 19 nonresected cases.In six patients, pathologic examination showed the presence of tumor confined to the pancreas with no vascular invasion. With MRI, five of these cases were correctly evaluated; in the remaining case, tumor-vessel contiguity was erroneously diagnosed. In 21 patients, tumor contiguity with adjacent vessels was found at pathologic examination. At MRI, 16 of these cases were correctly assessed, and 5 were understaged as tumors confined to the pancreas. Of the remaining 26 patients, 7 had vascular encasement by tumor at pathologic examination of the resected specimen; the other 19 patients had unresectable tumors encasing the adjacent vessels at surgical evaluation. MRI detected vascular encasement in 21 of these 26 cases; in the other 5, tumor contiguity was incorrectly diagnosed. The overall accuracy of MRI for determining vascular invasion was 79%.MRI is a helpful method for preoperative assessment of vascular involvement due to pancreatic carcinoma.Role of endoscopic ultrasound and magnetic resonance imaging in the preoperative staging of pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) have both been assessed individually as staging modalities for pancreatic cancer. The aim of our study was to assess whether tumor staging by both EUS and MRI in the same cohort of patients could predict resectability and unresectability in patients with pancreatic cancer.A review of 63 patients evaluated preoperatively with both EUS and MRI for pancreatic adenocarcinoma between January 1995 and December 1998 was done. Patients were staged as resectable or unresectable by predefined criteria. Preoperative staging by both modalities was compared to surgical outcome and the sensitivity and predictive values of each modality for determining resectability and unresectability was determined.EUS did not allow for complete T- and N-staging in 10 patients; therefore, for EUS, the final analysis was done on 63 of 73 patients (86%). EUS correctly staged 22 of 36 patients with resectable tumors. The sensitivity of EUS for resectability was 61%, with a positive predictive value of 69%. All 73 patients had complete MRI examinations; therefore, the final analysis was done on all 73 patients. MRI correctly staged 30 of 41 patients with resectable tumors. The sensitivity of MRI for predicting resectability was 73% with a positive predictive value of 77%. MRI and EUS both predicted resectability in 18 patients, of whom 16 (89%) were found to be resectable on surgical exploration. MRI and EUS both predicted unresectability in 17 (27%) patients, of whom 4 (24%) were found to be resectable on surgical exploration. When both MRI and EUS agreed on resectability, the positive predictive value for resectability was 89%. When both MRI and EUS agreed on unresectability, the positive predictive value for unresectability was 76%.Neither MRI nor EUS alone were highly sensitive or predictive of resectability. However, when both tests agreed on resectability, nearly all patients were found to be resectable on surgical exploration.Positron emission tomography/computed tomography influences on the management of resectable pancreatic cancer and its cost-effectiveness.We sought to determine the impact of positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) on the management of presumed resectable pancreatic cancer and to assess the cost of this new staging procedure.PET using 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) is increasingly used for the staging of pancreatic cancer, but anatomic information is limited. Integrated PET/CT enables optimal anatomic delineation of PET findings and identification of FDG-negative lesions on computed tomography (CT) images and might improve preoperative staging.Patients with suspected pancreatic cancer who had a PET/CT between June 2001 to April 2004 were entered into a prospective database. Routine staging included abdominal CT, chest x-ray, and CA 19-9 measurement. FDG-PET/CT was conducted according to a standardized protocol, and findings were confirmed by histology. Cost benefit analysis was performed based on charged cost of PET/CT and pancreatic resection and included the time frame of staging and surgery.Fifty-nine patients with a median age of 61 years (range, 40-80 years) were included in this analysis. Fifty-one patients had lesions in the head and 8 in the tail of the pancreas. The positive and negative predictive values for pancreatic cancer were 91% and 64%, respectively. PET/CT detected additional distant metastases in 5 and synchronous rectal cancer in 2 patients. PET/CT findings changed the management in 16% of patients with pancreatic cancer deemed resectable after routine staging (P = 0.031) and was cost saving.PET/CT represents an important staging procedure prior to pancreatic resection for cancer, since it significantly improves patient selection and is cost-effective.Pancreatic adenocarcinoma: combination of MR imaging, MR angiography and MR cholangiopancreatography for the diagnosis and assessment of resectability.The purpose of this study was to determine the possibility of integrating MR cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) and MR angiography (MRA) to conventional MR images in the diagnosis and assessment of resectability of pancreatic adenocarcinoma. Twenty-three patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma were prospectively examined with MR. Conventional MR images were acquired in all patients. Three-dimensional MRCP and MRA images were acquired in all patients with suspected biliary and vascular involvement. Acquisition time was less than 45 min in all cases. Images were independently evaluated by two radiologists, with final reading decided by consensus among readers. Diagnosis was confirmed with surgery in 16 patients and with percutaneous biopsy in 7. Concordance among readers was high with a kappa value of 0.83. Pancreatic adenocarcinoma was observed in all patients. Correct assessment of unresectability due to vascular involvement was found in 22 of 23 patients. Biliary obstruction was evident in 13 patients, involving the biliary and pancreatic ducts in 9 and the biliary ducts only in 4. Technical advances permit extensive use of MRI in the evaluation of abdominal pathologies. The combination of MR imaging, MRCP, and MRA can provide sufficient information for the diagnosis and assessment of resectability of pancreatic adenocarcinoma, which otherwise would require three different exams.Radial scanning and linear array endosonography for staging pancreatic cancer: a prospective randomized comparison.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is known to be accurate for staging pancreatic cancer. Little data exist to determine if linear array or radial scanning EUS is superior for staging pancreatic cancer. This prospective comparison was undertaken to assess the accuracy of linear array and radial scanning EUS for staging pancreatic cancer.Patients with pancreatic cancer referred for EUS staging were randomized to linear array or radial scanning EUS. Staging accuracy for each was determined by comparison to surgical pathology in those patients going to surgery.Seventy-nine patients with pancreatic cancer were enrolled and 33 had surgical resection. Of these, 17 patients were randomized to linear array and 16 to radial scanning EUS. The remaining 46 patients did not have surgery because of comorbid illness or clinically unresectable disease. EUS staging accuracy for linear array was 94% (16 of 17) for T and 71% (12 of 17) for N staging, whereas radial scanning was 88% (14 of 16) for T and 75% (12 of 16) for N staging. For predicting vascular invasion, radial scanning was 100% accurate (16 of 16) while linear array was 94% (16 of 17) accurate. There was one false-negative assessment of invasion using linear array EUS.Overall, both EUS designs appear equivalent for staging pancreatic cancer and assessing vascular invasion. In view of our findings and the capability for ultrasound-directed fine-needle aspiration with linear array EUS, this instrument may be the preferred choice for evaluating pancreatic masses.Endoscopic ultrasound criteria for vascular invasion in the staging of cancer of the head of the pancreas: a blind reevaluation of videotapes.It has been claimed in several prospective studies that endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is highly accurate in the locoregional staging of pancreatic cancer. However, the value of the EUS criteria for the diagnosis of vascular involvement is less well established. To totally exclude potential bias introduced by the availability of prior information, a completely blinded analysis of videotapes of patients with cancer of the pancreatic head was therefore conducted.Videotape sequences of 75 patients with cancer of the head of the pancreas with surgical confirmation or unequivocally positive angiography demonstrating vascular invasion were reevaluated without any clinical data or information from other imaging studies. Involvement of the vascular system (portal vein with confluence, superior mesenteric vein, celiac axis) was assessed on EUS with special emphasis on EUS parameters of the tumor-vessel relationship.The overall sensitivity and specificity of EUS in the diagnosis of venous invasion were 43% and 91%, respectively, when using predetermined parameters (visualization of tumor in the lumen, complete obstruction, or collateral vessels). If the parameter "irregular tumor-vessel relationship" had been added to these criteria, the sensitivity would have risen to 62%, but the specificity would have fallen to 79%. The only vascular system that could be properly visualized by EUS was the portal vein/confluence area. The positive and negative predictive values for the single parameters chosen to diagnose portal venous involvement were as follows: 42% and 33% for irregular tumor-vessel relationship, 36% and 34% for visualization of tumor in the vascular lumen, 80% and 28% for complete vascular obstruction, and 88% and 18% for collateral vessels.In a completely blinded evaluation of the EUS diagnosis of vascular invasion by cancer of the head of the pancreas it was not possible to find suitable morphologic parameters with clinically useful sensitivity and specificity values (over 80%).Pancreatic carcinoma: what is the best imaging test?[Comparison of color Doppler ultrasonography and endoscopic ultrasonography for preoperative evaluation of the mesenteric-portal axis in pancreatic lesions].This prospective study was undertaken to evaluate the accuracy of ultrasonography combined with colour Doppler and endoscopic ultrasonography for predicting superior mesenteric and portal vein involvement in pancreatic diseases.The study was prospective. Forty-four patients were included. Ultrasonography with colour Doppler was performed in 30 patients, endoscopic ultrasonography in 43. Prediction of superior mesenteric vein or portal vein involvement was blindly assessed by physicians without knowledge of results of other imaging methods. Resectability or potential resectability (n = 34) and irresectability (n = 10) were assessed in all patients by surgery. Thirty patients underwent a pancreaticoduodenectomy.For endoscopic ultrasonography the sensitivity (0.90), the specificity (0.88), the positive predictive value (0.69) and the negative predictive value (0.97) were better than those observed with ultrasonography and Doppler (050, 0.88, 0.69, 0.97, respectively). The specificity of computed tomography (0.96) was better than that of endoscopic ultrasonography but predictive negative values were similar.Imaging methods to predict superior mesenteric or portal vein involvement in pancreatic diseases are becoming increasingly numerous, complex, and expensive. Endoscopic ultrasonography has a better diagnostic value for correctly predicting resectability than ultrasonography with Doppler. However, for decision making, usefulness of these methods seems to be limited.The value of 18F-FDG positron emission tomography/computed tomography on the pre-operative staging and the management of patients with pancreatic carcinoma.To evaluate the value of FDG-PET/CT on the pre-operative staging of pancreatic cancer and its impact on clinical management.From December 2006 to January 2013, data of pancreatic carcinoma patients who underwent surgical treatment at our center was collected retrospectively. MDCT and FDGPET/CT were used separately to diagnose and stage the tumor. Pre-operation staging by MDCT with chest x-ray and by FDG-PET/CT was compared according to the final pathological staging.A total of 79 histologically proven pancreatic cancer patients were enrolled in this study. FDG-PET/CT was more accurate in the detection of tumor (PET/CT vs. MDCT: 93.67% vs. 88.61%, p=0.402). The SE (60.00% vs. 24.00%, p=0.01) and accuracy (87.81% vs. 76.83%, p=0.015) of PET/CT to detect distant metastasis is significantly higher than those of MDCT. FDG-PET/CT also showed advantage over CT in the detection of metastatic lymph nodes (52.83% vs. 16.98%, p<0.001; accuracy: 66.67% vs. 41.33, p=0.002). The extra staging information PET/CT provided could have skipped eight patients (10.13%) of unnecessary surgical exploration.FDG-PET/CT is an important staging procedure and helps to make the clinical decision for the patients with pancreatic carcinoma.Comparison of linear array endoscopic ultrasound and helical computed tomography for the staging of periampullary malignancies.The purpose of this study was to compare linear array endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and helical computed tomography (CT) scan in the preoperative local staging evaluation of patients with periampullary tumors.Patients evaluated with EUS and CT for suspected periampullary malignancies from 1996 to 2000 were analyzed. Surgical/pathology staging results were the reference standard.Forty-eight patients (28 men and 20 women; mean age, 62 +/- 4.9 years; range, 18-90 years) were identified. Malignancy was histologically confirmed in 44 patients. Parameters evaluated included tumor size, lymph node metastases, and major vascular invasion. EUS was significantly more sensitive (100%), specific (75%), and accurate (98%) than helical CT (68%, 50%, and 67%, respectively) for evaluation of the periampullary mass (P <.05). In addition, EUS detected regional lymph node metastases in more patients than helical CT. Sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of EUS were 61%, 100%, and 84%, in comparison to 33%, 92%, and 68%, respectively, with CT. Major vascular involvement was noted in 9 of 44 patients. EUS correctly identified vascular involvement in 100% compared with 45% with CT (P <.05).Linear array EUS was consistently superior to helical CT in the preoperative local staging of periampullary malignancies.[Prospective evaluation of ultrasonography, multi-slice spiral CT, endoscopic ultrasonography, and magnetic resonance imaging in assessment of TNM staging and assessment of resectability in pancreatic carcinoma].To evaluate prospectively the efficacy and clinical significance of ultrasonography (US), multi-slice spiral CT (MSCT), magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), and endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in assessment of the TNM staging and resectability of pancreatic carcinoma.Consecutive 68 patients with pancreatic carcinoma underwent US, MSCT, MRI, and EUS to assess their efficacies in assessment of the size of carcinoma, lymph node metastasis, and distant metastasis. The results of theses imaging techniques were compared with the surgical and pathological findings.EUS was the most precise technique in evaluating the T staging of pancreatic carcinoma with the coefficients of regression of maximum and minimum radii of 1.025 (P=0.043) and 0.987 (P<0.0001). In the assessment of lymph node metastasis, EUS had the highest sensitivity (75.0%), accuracy (87.5%), and negative predictive values (91.7%). Univariate logistic regression showed that EUS was significantly correlated with the surgical findings (OR: 33.00, 95%CI: 7.18-151.77 P<0.0001). Multivariate logistic regression analysis confirmed that EUS had an independent predictive value (OR: 34.50, 95%CI: 6.54-182.09, P<0.0001). MSCT had the highest sensibility (88.9%) in the assessment of distant metastasis and had the highest accuracy (61.8%) in preoperative TNM staging of pancreatic carcinoma. All 4 imaging techniques were correlated with surgical findings in assessment of the resectability. Multivariate logistic regression analysis confirmed that none of the imaging techniques had independent predictive value.MSCT is the best method in preoperative TNM staging of pancreatic carcinoma. EUS is the best methods in the assessment of tumor size and lymph node metastasis. Preoperative assessment of pancreatic carcinoma needs combination of at least two kinds of imaging techniques.Role of EUS in the preoperative staging of pancreatic cancer: a large single-center experience.Current methods for staging pancreatic cancer can be inaccurate, invasive, and expensive. Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is reported to be highly accurate for local staging of gastrointestinal tumors including pancreatic cancer. The aim of this study was to assess the utility of EUS and CT for staging pancreatic cancer by comparing staging accuracies in surgical patients and evaluating the potential impact of EUS staging and training.This was a preoperative comparison of the diagnostic operating characteristics of these procedures in a referral-based academic medical center. Data were collected on 151 consecutive patients referred with confirmed pancreatic cancer between April 1990 and November 1996. All patients had preoperative CT and EUS performed for staging. In patients undergoing surgery, the surgical staging and/or findings were used to confirm EUS and CT staging.Eighty-one (60%) of 151 patients underwent surgery and made up the study subset. In these 81 patients, surgical exploration provided a final T staging in 93% (75 of 81), N staging in 88% (71 of 81) and data on vascular invasion in 93% (75 of 81). In the surgical patient group, with surgical correlation, EUS accuracy for T staging was as follows: T1 92%, T2 85%, T3 93%, and for N staging was: N0 72%, and N1 72%. CT accuracy for T staging was as follows: T1 65%, T2 67%, T3 38%, and for N staging was as follows: N0 52% and N1 100%. CT failed to detect a mass in 26% of patients with a confirmed tumor at surgery. Overall accuracy for T and N staging was 85% and 72% for EUS and 30% and 55% for CT, respectively. The ability to accurately predict vascular invasion was 93% for EUS and 62% for CT (p < 0.001). EUS was 93% accurate for predicting local resectability versus 60% for CT (p < 0.001). Last, the data were divided into two groups for the senior endosonographer's experience: procedures performed between 1990 and 1992 (98 cases) and 1993 and 1994 (53 cases). This analysis revealed that 7 of 9 instances of mis-staging (78%) occurred in the earlier group, during the learning phase for EUS.EUS is more accurate than CT for staging pancreatic malignancies, including predicting vascular invasion and local resectability. EUS staging was significantly better than CT for T1, T2, and T3 tumors. EUS staging accuracy improved after 100 cases, thus suggesting a correlation between the accuracy of EUS staging and the number of procedures performed.EUS, PET, and CT scanning for evaluation of pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Preoperative diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma can be difficult. Computed tomography (CT) is the standard, noninvasive imaging method for evaluation of suspected pancreatic adenocarcinoma, but it has limited sensitivity for diagnosis, local staging, and metastases. Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and fluoro-deoxyglucose/positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) are imaging methods that may improve diagnostic accuracy.Thirty-five patients with presumed resectable pancreatic adenocarcinoma were prospectively evaluated with helical CT, EUS, and FDG-PET.Sensitivity for the detection of pancreatic cancer was higher for EUS (93%) and FDG-PET (87%) than for CT (53%). EUS was more sensitive than CT for local vascular invasion of the portal and superior mesenteric veins. EUS diagnosis of vascular invasion was associated with poor outcome after surgery. EUS-guided, fine-needle aspiration allowed tissue diagnosis in 14 of 21 attempts (67%). FDG-PET diagnosed 7 of 9 cases of proven metastatic disease, 4 of which were missed by CT. Two of three metastatic liver lesions suspected by CT were indeterminate for metastases. FDG-PET confirmed metastases.EUS and PET improve diagnostic capability in pancreatic adenocarcinoma. EUS is useful in determining local vascular invasion and obtaining tissue diagnosis. FDG-PET is useful in identifying metastatic disease. Both techniques are more sensitive than helical CT for identification of the primary tumor. (Gastrointest Endosc 2000;52:367-71).The role of endoscopic ultrasound in the preoperative staging of pancreatic malignancies.The role of CT and endoscopic ultrasound in pre-operative staging of pancreatic cancer.The aim of our study was to compare the accuracy of computed tomography and endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) in pre-operative staging of pancreatic cancer.Comparative retrospective study of 86 patients with pancreatic cancer. CT was done in 55 patients, 41 patients were examined by EUS. Each patient underwent surgery and had proven pancreatic cancer by histology. CT and EUS results were correlated to per-operative and histological findings. The main attention was paid to the description of peri-pancreatic lymphadenopathy, para-aortic lymphadenopathy, peri-coeliac lymphadenopathy and tumor relationship to superior mesenteric vein, superior mesenteric artery, portal vein, inferior caval vein and common hepatic artery. A description rate was defined as number of pre-operative findings where the structures and relationships mentioned above were described.The description rates of peri-pancreatic lymph nodes were 11 (20%) at CT and 36 (88.0%) at EUS. Para-aortic lymphadenopathy was described in 9 (16.0%) cases at CT and none at EUS. Peri-coeliac lymphadenopathy was mentioned only one time (2.0%) at CT contrary to 12 (29.0%) at EUS. Relationship of the tumor to the mesenteric vessels was well depicted in nine (16.0%) at CT versus nine (22.0%) at EUS. Portal vein relationship was well described in two (4.0%) at CT and seven (17%) cases at EUS. This description rate in vena cava inferior was one (2%) at CT and three (7.0%) at EUS, in hepatic artery it was one (2%) at CT and six (15%) at EUS. In the group of CT, resectability or non-resectability were well predicted in 33 (60%) patients and wrong predicted in 22 (40%) patients. In the group of EUS, resectability or non-resectability were well predicted in 34 (83%) patients and wrong predicted in 7 (17%) patients.According to our study, EUS is more accurate in prediction of local PC resectability than CT.Pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma: preoperative assessment with helical CT versus dynamic MR imaging.To compare helical computed tomography (CT) and dynamic, magnetic resonance (MR) imaging in the evaluation of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma.Dynamic MR images obtained with breath holding, 256 phase- and 512 frequency-encoding steps, 5-mm section thickness, phased-array multicoil, and double-dose gadolinium were available from 21 patients. Dynamic MR images were retrospectively compared with helical CT images in the evaluation of tumor detection, local tumor extension, and vascular involvement.Tumors were detected on dynamic MR images of 19 of 21 (90%) patients and on helical CT scans of 16 (76%) patients. Dynamic MR imaging had equal or better sensitivity, accuracy, and agreement of tumor grade than did helical CT in the comparison of imaging findings and histopathologic findings. Dynamic MR imaging also had equal or better specificity than had helical CT in determination of local tumor extension and vascular involvement, except in the factors of duodenal invasion and portal venous system involvement. However, there was no statistically significant difference among any of these measurements.Dynamic MR imaging may be better than helical CT in the preoperative detection and evaluation of local tumor extension and of vascular involvement of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinomas.Prospective evaluation of EUS versus CT scan for staging of ampullary cancer.Malignancies of the biliary and pancreatic systems are associated with a poor prognosis. However, ampullary cancer carries a better prognosis and is often diagnosed when curative treatment is still possible. Accurate staging is important for the determination of the most appropriate treatment option.(1) To determine the test performance characteristics of EUS and CT in loco-regional staging of ampullary neoplasms, and (2) to determine the impact of CT scan results on the test performance characteristics of EUS.Prospective single-arm intervention study performed in 2 academic hospitals. RESULTS AND MAIN OUTCOME MEASUREMENTS: Thirty-seven patients were screened and 33 staged with EUS and CT. A total of 27 patients (13 men; mean age, 69.5 years; mean serum bilirubin level, 12.6 mg/dL) with locally advanced disease completed the protocol with EUS and CT and underwent surgical resection. Tumor classifications were as follows: 2 patients (7.4%), T1 tumors; 13 patients (48.1%), T2 tumors; and 12 patients (44.4%), T3 tumors, as per surgical pathology. Seventeen tumors (62.9%) were classified as N0 and 10 (37.1%) as N1. The difference in proportion of correct tumor (74.1% vs 51.8%; P = .15, 95% CI, -0.06-0.50) and lymph node (81.4% vs 55.5%; P = .07, 95% CI, -0.01-0.53) staging by EUS and CT, respectively, was not statistically significantly different. However, the strength of tumor (kappa 0.51 vs 0.11) and nodal (kappa 0.59 vs 0.05) agreement with pathology was statistically significantly higher for EUS than for CT (P < .05). EUS was more sensitive and specific than CT for tumor and nodal staging, and the association of CT to EUS data did not improve the final test accuracy.Low number of T1 tumors.EUS is an accurate diagnostic test and exhibits a high level of agreement with surgical pathology. CT findings do not improve the test performance characteristics of EUS. Therefore, the evaluation for metastatic disease should not be compromised by CT protocols that aim to perform tumor and nodal staging. Further studies to determine the role of specialized CT protocols in patients with ampullary malignancies are needed.Is peritoneal cytology a predictor of unresectability in pancreatic carcinoma?Demonstration of unresectability often requires diagnostic laparotomy with high co-morbidity in pancreatic carcinoma. The value of detected peritoneal tumor cells and influence on outcome should be determined.In a prospective study 150 consecutive patients with pancreatic carcinoma were evaluated. Improvement of diagnostic accuracy in diagnosing unresectability was calculated for combination of CT, endoscopic ultrasonography and peritoneal cytology.Unexpected subglissonian metastases were found in 10%. 87 patients with peritoneal washings were included in the study, 20 patients with detected peritoneal tumor cells (n=22) were inoperable. In all patients of this group the ventral integrity of pancreas was damaged. In 23 patients with preoperative existent ascites, only in 4 cases could peritoneal tumor cells be detected. In patients with positive cytology together with disrupted ventral pancreatic margin as predictors of unresectability, sensitivity was 100% and specificity 96%.Addition of diagnostic laparoscopy combined with peritoneal cytology and minimally invasive palliation procedures (endoscopic biliary prosthesis, laparoscopic gastrojejunostomy) to the staging-protocol for pancreatic carcinoma may decrease operative lethality and unnecessary laparotomies may be avoided safely. As unexpected subglissonian micrometastases may additionally be present in 5-10%, perioperative laparoscopy is always advisable.[Endosonography in the T-staging of pancreatic cancer].Pancreatic cancer is the sixth among all oncologic diseases and takes the 4th place on cancer mortality in the world. Pancreatic cancer has poor prognosis. Survival for the 5 years after diagnosis is less than 5%. The objective was the evaluation of endosonography diagnostic significance in identification of tumor vascular invasion and tumor resectability. The treatment results of 82 patients with pancreas adenocarcinoma, technique of endosonography, the types of echo-endoscopes and ultrasonic criteria of vascular invasion are presented in the article. Tumor invasion was suspected in 48 patients (58.5%) during endosonography. Tumor invasion into the blood vessels of the upper abdomen was observed in 51 patients (62.2%). Endosonography sensitivity for detection of tumor invasion was 90.2%, specificity - 93.5%, accuracy - 91.5%. In view of modern criteria of pancreatic cancer resectability endosonography is leading method for selection of patients for surgical treatment. Magnetic resonance imaging with magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography accurately predicts resectability of pancreatic carcinoma.Accurate preoperative staging of pancreatic malignancy aids in directing appropriate therapy and avoids unnecessary invasive procedures. We evaluated the accuracy of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) with magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) in determining resectability of pancreatic malignancy. Twenty-one patients with suspected pancreatic malignancy underwent dynamic, contrast-enhanced breath-hold MRI with MRCP prior to surgical evaluation. Results of this study were correlated with operative results and pathologic findings. The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of MRI with MRCP in detecting a mass, determining the nature of the mass, and predicting lymph node involvement and resectability were determined. MRI with MRCP correctly identified the presence of a pancreatic mass in all 21 of these patients. Following pathologic correlation, it was determined that MRI with MRCP was 81% accurate in determining the benign or malignant nature of the pancreatic mass and 43% accurate in predicting lymph node involvement. In predicting resectability, MRI with MRCP had a sensitivity of 100%, specificity of 83%, positive predictive value of 94%, negative predictive value of 100%, and accuracy of 95%. MRI with MRCP is an accurate, noninvasive technique in the preoperative evaluation of pancreatic malignancy. Information obtained from MRI with MRCP including identification of a mass and predicting tumor resectability may be of value in staging and avoiding unnecessary invasive diagnostic procedures in patients with pancreatic cancer.A prospective evaluation of an algorithm incorporating routine preoperative endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration in suspected pancreatic cancer.Whether tissue diagnosis is required in the preoperative evaluation of patients with suspected pancreatic cancer remains controversial. We prospectively evaluated the accuracy, safety, and potential impact on surgical intervention of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in the preoperative evaluation of suspected pancreatic cancer.All patients who underwent EUS-FNA at our institution (n = 547) over a 4.5-year period were enrolled. Patients underwent surgical exploration and resection based on their comorbidity status, evidence of resectability based on spiral computed tomography (CT) and EUS imaging reviewed in a multidisciplinary approach.Of 547 patients enrolled (median age 64 years, 60% male), 49% presented with obstructive jaundice. The operating characteristics of EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic masses were: sensitivity 95% (95% CI: 93.2-95.4), specificity 92% (95% CI: 86.6-95.7), positive predictive value 98% (95% CI: 97-99), negative predictive value 80% (95% CI: 74.9-82.7). The overall accuracy of EUS-FNA was 94.1% (95% CI: 92.0-94). Of the 414 true positive patients by EUS-FNA, 138 (33%) were explored. Of patients deemed operable by combined imaging, 42% had surgical resection. Eighty-two percent of true positive patients were ultimately found inoperable and received palliative therapy or chemotherapy. Of the 94 patients with true negative cytology based on extended follow-up, only 7 (7%) underwent surgical resection. Of those with false negative diagnoses (n = 24), 5 patients underwent exploration/resection based on detection of mass lesions by EUS. The remaining patients had unresectable disease. Mild self-limiting pancreatitis occurred in (0.91%).EUS-FNA is a safe and highly accurate method for tissue diagnosis in suspected pancreatic cancer. This approach allows for preoperative counseling of patients, minimizing surgeon's operative time in cases of unresectable disease, and avoids surgical biopsies in the majority of patients with inoperable disease. In addition, it allows for conservative management of patients with benign biopsies. We still, however, recommend exploration of patients with clinical scenario suspicious for pancreatic cancer, a mass found on EUS or CT, but inconclusive or negative cytology.Detection of liver metastases from pancreatic cancer using FDG PET.We evaluated the potential of the glucose analog [18F]fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) as a PET tracer for the hepatic staging in 168 patients designated for resective pancreatic surgery.Metastatic liver disease was confirmed or excluded during surgery or with CT follow-up for at least 6 mo. Proven metastases were then retrospectively identified on preoperative CT (gold standard). Hepatic PET scans of all patients were interpreted blindly. Any focal FDG uptake was considered malignant. Both proven hepatic metastases and suspicious hepatic PET lesions were then compared, lesion by lesion, with CT. Standardized uptake values (SUV) and tumor-to-liver ratios (T/L) were determined for the most intense lesion of each patient.Sensitivity of FDG PET was 68% (15 of 22 patients). The lesion detection rate was 97% (28 of 29 metastases) for lesions >1 cm and 43% (16 of 37 metastases) for lesions < or = 1 cm. Specificity was 95% (138 of 146 patients). Six of eight patients with false-positive results had marked intrahepatic cholestasis (versus 3 of 15 patients with true-positive lesions), one had an infrahepatic abscess and one had a right basal pulmonary metastasis. The SUV and T/L were 4.6+/-1.4 and 2.3+/-1.1, respectively, for malignant lesions and 4.1+/-1.5 and 1.9+/-0.3, respectively, for false-positive lesions and therefore are of limited value.FDG PET provides reliable hepatic staging for lesions >1 cm. False-positive results are associated with the presence of marked intrahepatic cholestasis. For lesions < or = 1 cm, FDG PET can define malignancy in 43% of suspicious CT lesions in the absence of dilated bile ducts.Optimal interpretation of FDG PET in the diagnosis, staging and management of pancreatic carcinoma.This study had two purposes: to optimize the semiquantitative interpretation of 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) PET scans in the diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma by analyzing different cutoff levels for the standardized uptake value (SUV), with and without correction for serum glucose level (SUV(gluc)); and to evaluate the usefulness of FDG PET when used in addition to CT for the staging and management of patients with pancreatic cancer.Sixty-five patients who presented with suspected pancreatic carcinoma underwent whole-body FDG PET in addition to CT imaging. The PET images were analyzed visually and semiquantitatively using the SUV and SUV(gluc). The final diagnosis was obtained by pathologic (n = 56) or clinical and radiologic follow-up (n = 9). The performance of CT and PET at different cutoff levels of SUV was determined, and the impact of FDG PET in addition to CT on patient management was reviewed retrospectively.Fifty-two patients had proven pancreatic carcinoma, whereas 13 had benign lesions, including chronic pancreatitis (n = 10), benign biliary stricture (n = 1), pancreatic complex cyst (n = 1) and no pancreatic pathology (n = 1). Areas under receiver operating characteristic curves were not significantly different for SUV and SUV(gluc). Using a cutoff level of 3.0 for the SUV, FDG PET had higher sensitivity and specificity than CT in correctly diagnosing pancreatic carcinoma (92% and 85% versus 65% and 61%). There were 2 false-positive PET (chronic pancreatitis, also false-positive with CT) and 4 false-negative PET (all with true-positive CT, abnormal but nondiagnostic) examinations. There were 5 false-positive CT (4 chronic pancreatitis and 1 pancreatic cyst) and 18 false-negative CT (all with true-positive FDG PET scans) examinations. FDG PET clarified indeterminate hepatic lesions or identified additional distant metastases (or both) in 7 patients compared with CT. Overall, FDG PET altered the management of 28 of 65 patients (43%).FDG PET is more accurate than CT in the detection of primary tumors and in the clarification and identification of hepatic and distant metastases. The optimal cutoff value of FDG uptake to differentiate benign from malignant pancreatic lesions was 2.0. Correction for serum glucose did not significantly improve the accuracy of FDG PET. Although FDG PET cannot replace CT in defining local tumor extension, the application of FDG PET in addition to CT alters the management in up to 43% of patients with suspected pancreatic cancer.Preoperative staging of cancer of the pancreas: value of MR angiography versus conventional angiography in detecting portal venous invasion.The purpose of this study was to compare contrast-enhanced MR angiography with conventional catheter angiography for detecting portal venous invasion in the preoperative staging of pancreatic cancer, using the surgical confirmation of vascular involvement as the standard of truth.MR and conventional angiography were performed in 20 patients with pancreatic carcinoma, with surgical confirmation in all cases. MR angiography was performed at 1.5 T, with coronal (2.9 mm) and axial (6.0 mm) contrast-enhanced breath-hold two-dimensional time-of-flight imaging. Data from each imaging technique were collected prospectively and analyzed in a blinded fashion by expert vascular radiologists. Vascular involvement in each patient and in each vessel (main portal vein, confluence, splenic vein, and superior mesenteric vein) determined whether the tumor was resectable (normal, abutment) or nonresectable (encased, occluded). Surgical confirmation of the vascular involvement of the portal venous structures was used as the standard of truth in all patients.Among the 20 patients, 11 tumors were surgically resectable and seven were nonresectable with performance of a palliative bypass. MR angiography and conventional angiography had an overall concordance in 65% of patients (13/20; seven resectable, four nonresectable, two false-negatives) on the basis of the vascular status in each patient of the portal venous structures and in 84% (47/56) of the individual vessels surgically confirmed. MR angiography correctly identified 11 of 11 resectable patients and five of nine nonresectable patients, with four false-negative cases. Conventional angiography correctly identified seven of 11 resectable patients and six of nine nonresectable patients, with three false-negative cases and four false-positive cases.The lack of false-positives by MR angiography suggests that MR imaging may provide a noninvasive screen for nonresectability on the basis of vascular involvement, with no patients with potentially resectable tumors being denied surgery by MR angiography in this cohort. However, the presence of false-negatives using MR angiography indicates the procedure would still not fully eliminate unnecessary laparotomies.Pancreatic adenocarcinoma: CT versus MR imaging in the evaluation of resectability--report of the Radiology Diagnostic Oncology Group.To compare findings with computed tomography (CT) and magnetic resonance (MR) imaging in pancreatic adenocarcinoma and to determine optimal pulse sequences for MR imaging.CT scans and MR images were compared of 189 adult patients with known or suspected adenocarcinoma of the pancreas. Levels of confidence were correlated with surgical and pathologic results.The accuracy of CT was 0.73 and of MR imaging was 0.70. The negative predictive value of CT was 0.28 and of MR imaging was 0.23. The positive predictive value of CT was 0.89 and of MR imaging was 0.88. Gradient-echo and T1-weighted spin-echo sequences ranked equally in evaluation of vascular invasion, T1-weighted spin-echo sequences were preferred for assessing lymphadenopathy, and T2-weighted spin-echo sequences were preferred for detecting hepatic metastases.Cross-sectional imaging modalities are useful in the identification of unresectable pancreatic carcinoma. CT is recommended for initial imaging assessment.Pancreatic cancer staging. Endoscopic ultrasonography criteria for vascular invasion.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is the most sensitive imaging test available for examining the pancreas and associated structures. Small (< 2 cm) pancreatic malignancies can be detected with accuracy rates of more than 90%. Several EUS criteria have been proposed for their ability to diagnose malignant venous invasion. Although obstruction of a mesenteric vein and the resulting venous collaterals is a specific sign of unresectability, it is a rather insensitive parameter. As an alternative, signs of venous wall invasion, such as "irregular wall" have been proposed as being sensitive (67%-100%) and specific (100%) for malignant invasion of mesenteric veins. EUS appears to be particularly sensitive for detecting invasion of the portal and splenic veins. In contrast, the superior mesentera veins are more difficult to image with EUS and the results of staging of pancreatic masses demonstrate poor sensitivity (12%-17%) for detecting vascular invasion of the superior mesenteric vein.Detection of pancreatic carcinoma and liver metastases with gadoxetic acid-enhanced MR imaging: comparison with contrast-enhanced multi-detector row CT.To intraindividually compare gadoxetic acid-enhanced magnetic resonance (MR) imaging with contrast material-enhanced multi-detector row computed tomography (CT) in detection of pancreatic carcinoma and liver metastases.The ethics committee approved this retrospective study with waiver of informed consent. This study included 100 patients (53 men, 47 women; mean age, 67.8 years) consisting of 54 patients with pathologically confirmed pancreatic carcinoma (mean size, 33 mm) and 46 without a pancreatic lesion. Sixty-two liver metastases (mean size, 10 mm) in 15 patients with pancreatic carcinoma were diagnosed at pathologic examination or multimodality assessment. Three readers blinded to the final diagnosis interpreted all MR (precontrast T1- and T2-weighted and gadoxetic acid-enhanced dynamic and hepatocyte phase MR images) and tetraphasic dynamic contrast-enhanced CT images and graded the presence (or absence) of pancreatic carcinoma and liver metastasis on patient-by-patient and lesion-by-lesion bases. Receiver operating characteristic analysis, McNemar test, and Fisher test were performed to compare the diagnostic performance of CT and MR imaging.No significant differences were observed between CT and MR images in depiction of pancreatic carcinoma. However, MR imaging had greater sensitivity in depicting liver metastasis than did CT for two of the three readers in the MR imaging-versus-CT analysis (85% vs 69%, P = .046) and for all three readers in the lesion-by-lesion analysis (92%-94% vs 74%-76%, P = .030-.044).Gadoxetic acid-enhanced MR imaging was equivalent to dynamic contrast-enhanced CT in depicting pancreatic carcinoma and had better sensitivity for depicting liver metastases, suggesting the usefulness of gadoxetic acid-enhanced MR imaging for evaluation of patients with pancreatic carcinoma.Endoscopic ultrasonography in diagnosis and staging of pancreatic and biliary tumors.Preoperative evaluation of pancreaticobiliary tumor using MR multi-imaging techniques.To evaluate the clinical value of MR multi-imaging techniques in diagnosing and preoperative assessment of pancreaticobiliary tumor.MR multi-imaging techniques, including MR cross-sectional imaging, MR cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) and 3D dynamic contrast-enhanced MR angiography (3D DCE MRA), were performed to make prospective diagnosis and preoperative evaluation in 28 patients with suspected pancreaticobiliary tumors. There were 17 cases of pancreatic adenocarcinoma, 8 cases of biliary system carcinoma and 3 cases of non-neoplastic lesions.Using MR multi-imaging techniques, the accuracy in diagnosing the patients with pancreaticobiliary tumors was 89.3% (25/28). The accuracy in detecting the range of tumor invasion was 80.3% (57/71). The sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, positive and negative predictive value of MR multi-imaging techniques in preoperative assessment of the resectability of pancreaticobiliary tumor were 83.3%, 89.5%, 88.0%, 71.4%, and 94.4%, respectively. There was well diagnostic consistency between MR multi-imaging techniques and CT (kappa = 0.64, P<0.01). The fusion image could be made from MRCP and 3D DCE MRA images.MR multi-imaging techniques can integrate the advantages of various MR images. The non-invasive "all-in-one" MR imaging protocol is the efficient method in diagnosing, staging and preoperative assessment of pancreaticobiliary tumor.[The value of 3-phase spiral CT and magnetic resonance tomography in preoperative diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma].The purpose of this study was to assess the role of spiral computed tomography (SCT) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in the preoperative work-up of patients with pancreatic carcinoma, regarding local resectability and vascular involvement.A total of 28 patients (19 men and 9 women; mean age 58 years) with known or highly suspected carcinoma of the pancreas were included in this study. All patients prospectively underwent MRI ( +/- gadolinium-DTPA ) and SCT (3-phase examination) as preoperative diagnostic imaging studies, and laparotomy was carried out within 7 days, irrespective of the MRI or SCT findings. SCT and MR studies were reviewed independently by two radiologists, without knowing the results of the surgical exploration. Standardized image analysis was correlated with findings at laparatomy.Laparotomy identified 10 patients to be suitable for surgical resection and 18 pancreatic carcinomas to be unresectable. In 17 of 18 non-resectable carcinomas MRI and SCT were able to obtain correct information about unresectability (sensitivity 94%), in 7 (MRI), resp. 8 (SCT) carcinomas were correctly considered to be resectable (sensitivity 70% of MRI and 80% for SCT). The presence of vascular involvement was depicted by SCT with a sensitivity of 82-100% and 62-100% by MRI. The specificity varied between 85-100% for SCT and 77-100% for MRI.Both MRI and SCT are good techniques for the preoperative work-up of pancreatic carcinomas in order to obtain a correct assessment of local resectability.Pancreatic adenocarcinoma: assessment of vascular invasion with high-field MR imaging and a phased-array coil.We performed this study to determine the value of MR imaging for assessing vascular invasion in preoperative staging of pancreatic carcinoma.In 73 consecutive patients with an established diagnosis of pancreatic duct adenocarcinoma, spin-echo T1-weighted and breath-hold multiplanar gradient-recalled (MPGR) images were obtained at 1.5 T with a phased-array coil before and after bolus injection of gadopentetate dimeglumine. Major peripancreatic vessels were evaluated for contiguity with tumor and tumor encasement. All patients subsequently underwent surgery. Results of unenhanced and enhanced MR imaging studies were compared with the histologic findings in the resected specimens of 49 tumors and with the surgical findings of 24 nonresected tumors.In 39 patients, tumor contiguity with adjacent vessels was found at pathologic examination. Of the remaining 34 patients, 10 had vascular encasement by tumor seen on pathologic examination of the resected specimen; the other 24 had unresectable tumors encasing adjacent vessels at surgical evaluation. In the assessment of vascular tumor contiguity, the accuracy was 85% for unenhanced spin-echo T1-weighted imaging, 87% for enhanced spin-echo T1-weighted imaging, 67% for unenhanced MPGR imaging, and 69% for enhanced MPGR imaging. In the assessment of vascular tumor encasement, the accuracy was 91% for unenhanced spin-echo T1-weighted imaging, 94% for enhanced spin-echo T1-weighted imaging, 74% for unenhanced MPGR imaging, and 76% for enhanced MPGR imaging.MR imaging is helpful for preoperative assessment of vascular involvement caused by pancreatic carcinoma. For this purpose, unenhanced and enhanced spin-echo T1-weighted images seem to be more accurate than images obtained with other pulse sequences.Impact of endoscopic ultrasound on the management and outcome of pancreatic carcinoma.Although endoscopic ultrasound and endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration have been shown to aid in the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic carcinoma, whether the general use of these new techniques impacts the overall management and survival of pancreatic cancer, is less clear.Clinical data on all patients diagnosed with pancreatic carcinoma were assessed for two equal time periods during which computerized tomography-guided fine needle aspiration and biopsy was used (1/93-5/95) and then during which endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration was used (8/95-12/97) for the primary diagnosis of these patients.Comparative data for the computerized tomography era versus the endosonography era showed that 1) pancreatic carcinomas diagnosed: 52 versus 84 patients (stage I-III at diagnosis: 33% vs 54%; p < 0.05); 2) diagnosis by aspiration or biopsy of a pancreatic mass, nodes, liver metastasis, or by operation: 46%, 0%, 19%, 29% versus 52%, 8% (p = 0.02 nodes plus pancreatic masses), 20%, 7% (p = 0.002); 3) pancreatic resections: 13% versus 14%; 4) median survival without liver metastases: 102 versus 205 days (p < 0.02, log-rank test). Endoscopic ultrasound detected carcinomas that were either not seen or only possibly seen by computed tomography in 34%.More patients (62%) were diagnosed with pancreatic carcinoma when using endoscopic ultrasound and 75% fewer required operations for diagnosis. The 3-month improvement in median survival is probably multifactorial but most likely represents lead bias because of the greater sensitivity of endoscopic ultrasound for pancreatic carcinoma. Using endoscopic ultrasound with endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration in patients with pancreatic carcinoma significantly affects their management and outcomes.[Clinical study of the imaging validity in detecting infiltration of the mesenteric-portal axis in pancreatic carcinoma].The authors examine the value of different imaging techniques (CT, MRI) in the diagnosis of the involvement of the mesenteric-portal vessels in the pancreatic cancer. In 20 jaundiced patients they obtained in all cases a correct diagnosis about the etiology of the jaundice. The correspondence of the preoperative imaging study with the involvement of the mesenteric-portal vessels was respectively 73% for the CT and 78% for the MRI. In all cases the intra-operative echography allowed a correct diagnosis of the vascular involvement.Multimodality staging optimizes resectability in patients with pancreatic and ampullary cancer.Few patients with pancreatic cancer have resectable disease at the time of diagnosis, and a variety of nonsurgical techniques are available to provide effective palliation of jaundice and pain. Accurate preoperative staging is essential to identify patients with unresectable disease, thereby minimizing unnecessary surgery. Currently used diagnostic tests include contrast-enhanced computerized tomography (CT), visceral angiography, endoscopic ultrasound, and laparoscopy, but their utility remains controversial. To evaluate the accuracy of these various diagnostic tests, 30 consecutive patients with histologically proven pancreatic or ampullary adenocarcinoma treated between 1992 and 1996 were evaluated. All 30 patients had contrast-enhanced CT and laparoscopy, 22 patients (73%) had visceral angiography, and 16 patients (53%) had endoscopic ultrasound. Individual and combined predictive values of resectability and unresectability as well as the sensitivities and specificities were determined for all diagnostic tests and compared with intraoperative findings. When CT, visceral angiography, and laparoscopy were combined, the predictive values of resectability and unresectability were 75 and 90 per cent, respectively, with a sensitivity of 75 per cent and a specificity of 90 per cent. Therefore, the combined use of selected diagnostic tests proved more effective than any single diagnostic test for accurately staging patients with pancreatic head and ampullary cancers and should be considered to minimize unnecessary surgery.The role of (18)fluoro-deoxyglucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography in resectable pancreatic cancer.The role of (18)fluoro-deoxyglucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography in pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma is debated. We retrospectively assessed the value of (18)fluoro-deoxyglucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography in addition to conventional imaging as a staging modality in pancreatic cancer.(18)Fluoro-deoxyglucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography was performed in 72 patients with resectable pancreatic carcinoma after multi-detector computed tomography positron emission tomography was considered positive for a maximum standardized uptake value >3.Overall, 21% of patients had a maximum standardized uptake value ≤ 3, and 60% of those had undergone neoadjuvant treatment (P=0.0001). Furthermore, 11% of patients were spared unwarranted surgery since positron emission tomography/computed tomography detected metastatic disease. All liver metastases were subsequently identified with contrast-enhanced ultrasound. Sensitivity and specificity of positron emission tomography/computed tomography for distant metastases were 78% and 100%. The median CA19.9 concentration was 48.8 U/mL for the entire cohort and 292 U/mL for metastatic patients (P=0.112).The widespread application of (18)fluoro-deoxyglucose positron emission tomography/computed tomography in patients with resectable pancreatic carcinoma seems not justified. It should be considered in selected patients at higher risk of metastatic disease (i.e. CA19.9>200 U/mL) after undergoing other imaging tests. Neoadjuvant treatment is significantly associated with low metabolic activity, limiting the value of positron emission tomography in this setting.Preoperative locoregional re-evaluation by endoscopic ultrasound in pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma after neoadjuvant chemoradiation.The accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) for the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma (PDA) has been confirmed. Chemo-radiotherpay (CRT) induces tumor changes which can limit the accuracy of EUS. The aim of our study was to analyze the efficacy of EUS following neoadjuvant CRT comparing findings with the pathology results.From November 1996 to October 2003, 45 patients with histologically proven and EUS-staged PDA were treated with neo-adjuvant CRT and radical surgery. All were restaged before surgery using both EUS and computed tomography. Fifteen patients were found to have developed distant metastases. Thirty patients finally underwent pancreaticoduodenectomy (N=24) or distal pancreatectomy (N=6).Following CRT, tumor stage was correctly assessed in 12 patients (40%). The most frequent misinterpretation was overestimation of tumor size (N=13, 43.3%). Locoregional vascular invasion of veins was suspected by EUS in 13 patients (43.3%) but surgical findings and the histological examination were both negative. Node status was correctly assessed in 27 patients (90%) but nodal involvement was found on the histological specimen in only 3 patients.Preoperative EUS after neoadjuvant CRT for PDA does not enable reliable definitive selection of patients for surgery, probably due to radiation-induced pancreatic changes.Positron emission tomography does not add to computed tomography for the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer.Positron emission tomography (PET) has been proposed for pancreatic cancer diagnosis and staging.112 patients with suspected pancreatic cancer underwent 18F-fluoro-2-deoxy-D-glucose gamma camera PET and computed tomography (CT), of whom 62 also had laparoscopic ultrasonography and 70 underwent abdominal exploration for potential resection. The final diagnosis was malignancy in 78 and benign disease in 34 patients (25 with chronic pancreatitis).The diagnostic sensitivity and specificity for PET were 73 and 60% compared to 89 and 65% for CT respectively (Cohen's kappa = 0.59). In 30 patients CT was equivocal with cancer in 14 and benign disease in 16. PET correctly diagnosed 13 of these patients (cancer in 6 and benign disease in 7), interpreted 4 as equivocal (cancer in 3 and benign disease in 1) but was incorrect in the remaining 13 patients (cancer in 5 and benign disease in 8). The sensitivity and specificity for detecting small volume metastatic disease were 20 and 94% for CT and 22 and 91% for PET, respectively.PET had a similar accuracy to that of CT for imaging pancreatic cancer but it did not provide any additional information in patients with equivocal CT findings and currently would seem of little benefit for the staging of pancreatic cancer.Vascular invasion in pancreatic cancer: evaluation of endoscopic ultrasonography, computed tomography, ultrasonography, and angiography.Current methods for detecting vascular invasion in pancreatic cancer can be inaccurate, invasive, and expensive. The aim of this study is to assess the value of current imaging modalities in determining vascular invasion by pancreatic cancer.The results of Endoscopic Ultrasonography (EUS), Computed Tomography (CT), Ultrasonography (US), and Angiography performed in 170 patients, suffering from pancreatic cancer, were retrospectively studied and correlated with intra-operative findings and surgical anatomopathological diagnosis after resection. We assessed sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and accuracy for detecting vascular invasion.EUS turned out to be the most reliable imaging technique for detecting vascular invasion in pancreatic cancer, with a sensitivity of 55%, specificity of 90%, positive predictive value of 61.1%, negative predictive value of 87.5%, and accuracy of 82.2%. CT results were 39.4%, 90%, 52%, 84.4%, and 79.1% for the respective categories, with however, better results with multislice CT. The US results were 3.7% for the sensitivity, 96.3% for the specificity, 25% for the positive predictive value, 75.2% for the negative predictive value, and 73.4% for the accuracy. For angiography, the sensitivity, the specificity, the positive predictive value, the negative predictive value, and the accuracy were 52.6%, 72.3%, 43.5%, 79.1%, and 66.7% respectively.In this study, EUS was the most valuable imaging modality in assessing vascular invasion (especially for venous invasion) for pancreatic cancer, with an accuracy of more than 80%. A further prospective study should be carried out to evaluate the combination of imaging modalities for the detection of vascular involvement, especially with multi-slice CT which almost reached the performances obtained by EUS.Impact of endoscopic ultrasound with fine-needle aspiration on the surgical management of pancreatic cancer.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) with EUS-guided fine-needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) enables one to visualize the pancreas and surrounding structures and can provide access for FNA of those structures that appear suspicious for tumor.From 1993 to 1995, 50 patients suspected of having pancreatic cancer underwent EUS/EUS-FNA and abdominal computed tomography (CT). Malignancy was found in 30 (60%) cases, which included 24 (48%) pancreatic adenocarcinomas.Endoscopic ultrasound/EUS-FNA identified 26 of the 30 malignancies (85%) and 21 of the 24 pancreatic adenocarcinomas (88%), with no false positives. Thirteen of the 24 pancreatic cancer patients had lymph nodes that were sampled with EUS/EUS-FNA. Seven of these 13 patients (62%) were found to have metastatic spread to lymph nodes. Operations were performed on 11 of the pancreatic cancer patients. Of these 11, the 5 that were predicted to be resectable by EUS/EUS-FNA underwent successful resection. Of the 6 predicted to be unresectable, 5 had palliative biliary bypasses, and 1 had a grossly positive margin of resection.Endoscopic ultrasound/EUS-FNA can identify patients for curative surgical resection. It can also preoperatively identify patients with regional nodal disease for inclusion in appropriately designed clinical trials.The role of endoscopy in the treatment, management, and personalization of pancreatic cancer.Preoperative staging and tumor resectability assessment of pancreatic cancer: prospective study comparing endoscopic ultrasonography, helical computed tomography, magnetic resonance imaging, and angiography.The objective of this study was to evaluate prospectively the efficacy of different strategies based on endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS), helical computed tomography (CT), magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), and angiography (A) in the staging and tumor resectability assessment of pancreatic cancer.All consecutive patients with pancreatic carcinoma judged fit for laparotomy were studied by EUS, CT, MRI, and A. Results of each of the imaging techniques regarding primary tumor, locoregional extension, lymph-node involvement, vascular invasion, distant metastases, tumor TNM stage, and tumor resectability were compared with the surgical findings. Univariate, logistic regression, decision, and cost minimization analyses were performed.Sixty-two patients with pancreatic cancer were included. Helical CT had the highest accuracy in assessing extent of primary tumor (73%), locoregional extension (74%), vascular invasion (83%), distant metastases (88%), tumor TNM stage (46%), and tumor resectability (83%), whereas EUS had the highest accuracy in assessing tumor size (r = 0.85) and lymph node involvement (65%). The decision analysis demonstrated that the best strategy to assess tumor resectability was based on CT or EUS as initial test, followed by the alternative technique in those potentially resectable cases. Cost minimization analysis favored the sequential strategy in which EUS was used as a confirmatory technique in those patients in whom helical CT suggested resectability of the tumor.Helical CT and EUS are the most useful individual imaging techniques in the staging of pancreatic cancer. In those cases with potentially resectable tumors a sequential approach consisting of helical CT as an initial test and EUS as a confirmatory technique seems to be the most reliable and cost minimization strategy.An MRI-driven practice: a new perspective on MRI for the evaluation of adenocarcinoma of the head of the pancreas.The purpose of the study was to describe the MRI-driven management of masses at the head of the pancreas.The main outcome measure was tumor resectability.A retrospective review of prospective radiographic diagnoses was undertaken.Between 2004 and 2008, we have treated 124 patients for a radiographic diagnosis of adenocarcinoma of the head of the pancreas. This diagnosis was correct in 96.0% of the time. MRI was 100% sensitive in determining resectability, 73.2-78.9% specific, and had an overall accuracy of 86.3-87.5%. MRI could detect venous and arterial involvement with 95% and 95.9% accuracy, respectively, and missed only six metastases.MRI is a useful tool in the preoperative imaging of pancreatic head lesions that is highly sensitive and very specific for resectable disease. Prospective trials of MRI in this setting are indicated.Preoperative assessment of blood vessel involvement in patients with pancreatic cancer.The major prerequisite for resection of a pancreatic tumor is non-involvement of large blood vessels. Preoperative assessment of blood vessel infiltration may prevent unnecessary surgery. The aim of our study was to investigate the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in diagnosis of pancreatic cancer and in preoperative staging. Thirteen patients (7 females, 6 males; mean age 64 years) with a pancreatic tumor, but no evidence of distant metastases, underwent EUS and computerized tomography (CT) in order to assess blood vessel involvement by the tumor. The results were compared with intraoperative findings in 12 patients and with postmortem findings in 1 patient. A tumor was demonstrated by EUS in 12 patients and was confirmed at surgery in all 12 patients. In one patient no tumor was demonstrated by EUS, although a tumor was visible by CT; no tumor was found at surgery. In two patients CT failed to demonstrate a pancreatic tumor that was demonstrated by EUS; at surgery a tumor was detected in both patients. EUS detected blood vessel involvement in seven patients, which was confirmed at surgery in six of them. In the other six patients surgery confirmed the EUS finding of no blood vessel involvement. CT detected blood vessel involvement in two patients only. The overall accuracy of EUS and CT for detecting the tumor was 100% and 77% respectively, and for blood vessel involvement 92% and 61% respectively. In conclusion, EUS is an accurate procedure for preoperative assessment of blood vessel involvement in patients with pancreatic cancer. This procedure may enable the selection of those patients who may benefit from surgery, and should be part of the evaluation of patients with pancreatic cancer who are candidates for curative surgery.The role of routine preoperative EUS when performed after contrast enhanced CT in the diagnostic work-up in patients suspected of pancreatic or periampullary cancer.In patients suspected of pancreatic or periampullary cancer, abdominal contrast-enhanced computed tomography (CT) is the standard diagnostic modality. A supplementary endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is often performed, although there is only limited evidence of its additional diagnostic value. The aim of the study is to evaluate the additional diagnostic value of EUS over CT in deciding on exploratory laparotomy in patients suspected of pancreatic or periampullary cancer.We retrospectively analyzed 86 consecutive patients who routinely underwent CT and EUS before exploratory laparotomy with or without pancreatoduodenectomy for suspected pancreatic or periampullary carcinoma between 2007 and 2010. Primary outcomes were visibility of a mass, resectability on CT/EUS and resection with curative intent.A mass was visible on CT in 72/86 (84%) patients. In these 72 patients, EUS demonstrated a mass in 64/72 (89%) patients. Resectability was accurately predicted by CT in 65/72 (90%) and by EUS in 58/72 (81%) patients. In 14/86 (16%) patients no mass was seen on CT. EUS showed a mass in 12/14 (86%) of these patients. A malignant lesion was histological proven in 11/12 (92%) of these patients. Overall, resectability was accurately predicted by CT and EUS in 90% (77/86) and 84% (72/86), respectively.In patients with a visible mass on CT, suspected for pancreatic or periampullary cancer, EUS has no additional diagnostic value, does not influence the decision to perform laparotomy and should therefore not be performed routinely. In patients without a visible mass on CT, EUS is useful to confirm the presence of a tumor.Selective use of endoscopic ultrasound in the evaluation of carcinomas of the pancreatic head.The aims of this study were to assess the role of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) in the evaluation of adenocarcinoma of the head of the pancreas in cases of diagnostic dilemma and to determine the strength of agreement between perceived pre-operative stage as determined by computerised tomography (CT) and EUS and histopathological stage.Patients undergoing pancreatic EUS were identified from a computerised radiology database. The strengths of agreement between the radiological and histopathological stages were determined by the weighted kappa (Kw) statistic.Fifty-eight patients were identified. Of 37 patients with a pancreatic head mass on prior imaging, 32 had a diagnosis of adenocarcinoma confirmed by EUS, as did 11 of 21 patients with suspicious pancreatic head lesions. Twenty-five of 43 patients were deemed to have resectable carcinomas, and 2 patients had resectable mucinous lesions. In comparing CT and EUS in the 25 patients undergoing resection, the Kw for T and N stages was 0.250 (p = 0.05) and -0.080 (p = 0.288), respectively, for CT, compared with 0.738 (p = 0.0001) and 0.606 (p = 0.0001), respectively, for EUS.EUS was effective in assessing the resectability of pancreatic head adenocarcinomas. Furthermore, EUS held a significant 3-fold advantage over CT with regard to T stage and an even higher significant advantage with regard to N stage.[Comparison of endoscopic ultrasonography with computer-assisted tomography in the determination of preoperative stage and resectability of pancreatic and ampullary cancers].To study and compare the accuracy and sensitivity of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and CT scaning in determination of preoperative stage and vascular invasion by pancreatic and ampullary cancers.Fourty-two pancreatic cancer patients and 18 ampullary cancer patients were studied. With patients prepared according to conventional endoscopy, Olympus EUM-30 scope 1 set with a side view and 360 degrees rotate and switchable scanning probe [ultrasound frequency (7.5/12 MHz)], was introduced to the descending duodenum through the esophagus. Gas within the duodenum and stomach was aspirated. Then, in order to to facilitate ultrasound transmission, 200 ml deaerated water was injected into the duodenum and 500 ml into the stomach to distend it. The structures of each part of pancreatic head and ampullary together with surrounding vessels were scanned. Then, the scope was withdrawn to the gastric antrum, body and fundus gradually, while the pancreatic body and tail were scanned.Between Apr. 1996 to May 2004, a total of 42 pancreatic cancer patients and 18 ampullary cancer patients were examined by EUS. Meanwhile, all these 58 patients received preoperative CT scaning. The results of stage and vascular invasion determined by EUS in this series were as following; pancreatic cancer group (n = 42): accuracy in T2-4 stage was 100.0% (5/5), 75.0% (9/12) and 48.0% (12/25), respectively; ampullary cancer group (n = 18): T1-4 stage was 75.0% (3/4), 66.7% (2/3), 75.0% (6/8) and 33.3% (1/3), respectively; the accuracy in N stage: P-group: 80.0% in N1 (4/5), 90.0% in N0 (9/10); A-group: 50.0% in N1 (3/6), 91.0% in N0 (10/11). The sensitivity, specificity of vascular invasion, resectability and unresectablilty determined by EUS and CT as compared with surgical findings during operation was 52.9% (9/17), 93.1% (27/29), 77.1% (27/35) and 81.8% (9/11) for EUS (n = 60), respectively; and 11.8% (2/17), 92.6% (25/27), 62.5% (25/40) and 50.0% (2/4) for CT (n = 58), respectively.Endoscopic ultrosonography being one of the best image examinations to determine the stage and vascular invasion for pancreatic and ampullary cancer paitients is able to detect small pancreatic or ampullary cancer less than 2.0 cm in diameter due to its high resolution; but can not detect the secondary multiple distal metastases such as spread into the liver, peritonium or hepatoduodenal ligament, etc. due to its ultrasound depth limitation.Outcomes after preoperative endoscopic ultrasonography and biopsy in patients undergoing distal pancreatectomy.This retrospective cohort study analyzes the potential risks associated with preoperative fine needle aspiration (FNA) biopsy guided by endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in patients undergoing distal pancreatectomy.Excluding 204 patients with acute or chronic pancreatitis and those with previous pancreatic resections, 230 consecutive patients with primary pancreatic neoplasms underwent elective distal pancreatectomy between 2002 and 2009. The most common indications were adenocarcinoma (28%), intraductal papillary mucinous neoplasm (IPMN; 20%), and endocrine neoplasms (17%). Two-way statistical comparisons were performed between patients who did (EUS(+)) or did not (EUS(-)) undergo preoperative EUS-FNA.Distal pancreatectomy was performed open in 118 patients (56%) and laparoscopically in 102 patients (44%). No differences were observed in age, sex, American Society of Anesthesiologists class, operative time, or blood loss between the EUS(+) (n = 179) and EUS(-) (n = 51) groups. Splenectomy was performed in 162 patients (70%) and was more common in the EUS(+) group. With the exception of adenocarcinoma (n = 57 [32%] EUS(+) vs n = 6 [12%] EUS(-); P < .01), the final pathologic diagnosis did not differ significantly between the EUS groups. Postoperative complications were more common in the EUS(+) patients with cystic neoplasms (43% vs 16% EUS(-); P = .04). EUS-FNA caused pancreatitis in 2 patients preoperatively. No differences in overall or recurrence-free survival were noted between cancer patients in the EUS groups. Patterns of tumor recurrence were not associated with EUS-FNA.Preoperative EUS-FNA is not associated with adverse perioperative or long-term outcomes in patients undergoing distal pancreatectomy for solid neoplasms of the pancreas. The potentially detrimental long-term impact of preoperative EUS-FNA in patients with resectable pancreatic adenocarcinoma was not observed, but will require additional study.[Preoperative diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer by endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS)--a comparative study with other diagnostic tools].Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS), ultrasonography (US), computed tomography (CT), and angiography (Angio) were performed in 26 patients with pancreatic cancer which were all resected. Preoperative findings of each diagnostic tools were compared with histological findings. In order to discuss the effectiveness of each body imagings, the preoperative staging of pancreatic cancer was evaluated in direct invasion to the anterior pancreatic capsule and stomach (S), direct invasion to the duodenum (D), direct invasion to the retroperitoneal adjacent vessels (Rp), and regional lymph node metastasis (N). The overall accuracy rate was 77% with EUS (50% with US, 38% with CT, 56% with Angio) in S, 81% with EUS (44% with US, 38% with CT, 63% with Angio) in D, 77% with EUS (58% with US, 42% with CT, 73% with Angio) in Rp, and 65% with EUS (58% with US, 38% with CT) in N. EUS revealed high accuracy rates because EUS images of the whole pancreas, surrounding organs and major vessels were clearly visualized through the gastroduodenal walls. Also, the accuracy rates of Angio in Rp and US in N were almost the same as those of EUS in Rp and N. However, it was difficult for every procedure to diagnose the retroperitoneal perineural invasion. From these results, EUS is one of the most beneficial procedures for detecting of the extent of cancer. EUS is expected to be popularized in the diagnosis and staging of the pancreatic cancer.MRI with mangafodipir trisodium in the detection and staging of pancreatic cancer.The purpose of this study was to compare prospectively computed tomography (CT) and magnetic resonance (MR) imaging before and after mangafodipir trisodium infusion for the detection and staging of focal pancreatic lesions. From November 1996 to October 1997, 43 consecutive patients suspected to have a focal pancreatic lesion were included in a phase III study. Triphasic helical CT was performed, as well as MRI at 1.5 T, as follows: axial T1-weighted (T1w) turbo spin echo (TSE), spectral presaturation with inversion recovery (SPIR) T1w TSE, T1w turbo field echo (TFE), and SPIR T2w TSE before and after mangafodipir trisodium (0.01 mmol/ml, 0.5 ml/kg) infusion. Imaging results were correlated with surgery, laparoscopy, laparoscopic ultrasound, and biopsy. Objective measurements were performed by measuring signal intensities (SIs) of lesion and parenchyma and calculating contrast indexes (CIs) and contrast-to-noise-ratios (CNRs) to assess the delineation of the tumor. SIs were correlated with four phantom standards with a known SI. Thirty-eight pancreatic adenocarcinomas were present, as well as one cystadenoma, two papillomas, and two cases of focal pancreatitis. SI measurements revealed significant increases in CIs for the lesion compared with the parenchyma in T1w TSE (69.7 vs 152.7; P = 0. 0003) and T1w TFE (107.8 vs 194.2; P = 0.0002). These series also revealed significant increases in CNRs (for T1w TSE: 9.7 vs 13.0; P = 0.0407 and for T1w TFE: 14.5 vs 26.1; P = 0.0001). In the other series, there was no significant increase. CT detected 38 lesions, MRI without mangafodipir trisodium detected 39 lesions, and MRI with mangafodipir trisodium detected 40 lesions, giving detection accuracy rates of 88%, 91%, and 93%, respectively. Staging accuracy rates for vascular ingrowth were 81%, 75%, and 81%, respectively. Overall staging accuracy rates were 57%, 54%, and 54%, respectively, mostly due to undetected small metastases in the peritoneum, omentum, or liver (< 1 cm). This study indicates that a) MRI after mangafodipir trisodium gives a better delineation of the tumor in T1w series, but b) does not significantly improve the detection rate and staging accuracy of focal pancreatic lesions over MRI without this contrast medium.EUS diagnosis of vascular invasion in pancreatic cancer: surgical and histologic correlates.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) has been compared to intraoperative surgical palpation for diagnosis of vascular invasion by pancreatic cancer. This study compares EUS with vascular resection and histologic evidence of vascular invasion in resected pancreatic masses.All patients with solid pancreatic masses who underwent both preoperative EUS and surgery at 1 hospital over a 7 year period were identified. The relationship of pancreatic masses to adjacent vessels was prospectively assessed by EUS. EUS findings were compared to surgical and pathology gold standards. "Vascular adherence" was defined as tumor adherence requiring vascular resection during surgery, and "vascular invasion" as histologic invasion of vessel wall by tumor.30 of 68 patients were resectable. Among these 30, vascular adherence was present in 8, including 18% of patients with an intact echoplane between tumor and adjacent vessels at EUS, 29% of those with loss of echoplane alone, and 50% of those with additional EUS features of vascular involvement. Vascular invasion was present in 4, including 12% of patients with an intact echoplane, 0% of those with loss of echoplane alone, and 33% of those with additional EUS features. Sensitivity, specificity, PPV, and NPV of EUS were 63%, 64%, 43% and 80% for vascular adherence and 50% 58%, 28% and 82% for vascular invasion. NPV rose to 90% for vascular adherence if only the portal confluence vessels were considered.EUS has poor sensitivity, specificity, and positive predictive value for diagnosis of venous involvement by pancreatic cancer.[The role of magnetic resonance imaging in the preoperative evaluation of the peripancreatic vasculature in pancreas carcinoma].To evaluate the accuracy of magnetic resonance angiography (MRA) to predict vascular involvement in pancreas carcinoma.This prospective trial included 42 patients with suspected pancreas carcinoma. All patients underwent MRA, different tomographic sequences (MRI) and surgery. Peripancreatic vessels were analyzed for vascular involvement, with the tumor infiltration graded on a scale of 0 to 4 (grade 0 - 4). The imaging findings were correlated with surgery and histopathology.The sensitivity of MRA to predict vascular involvement was 61 % (19 of 31 evaluated vessels) and the specificity 97 % (148 of 153). Sensitivity and specificity for axial MRI were both 94 % (29 of 31 and 144 of 153 evaluated vessels). The difference in the sensitivities of MRA and MRI was statistically significant (p < 0.01). Vascular involvement was correctly graded in 58 % (18 of 31) by MRA and in 74 % (23 of 31) by MRI.MRA alone is not sufficient to diagnose vascular involvement in pancreas carcinoma, but provides an adequate overview of the vascular anatomy. A combined protocol of MRA and MRI is needed for an acceptable evaluation of the peripancreatic vessels.Staging of pancreatic and ampullary cancer by endoscopy.Is endoscopic ultrasonography superior to multidetector CT for assessing pancreatic cancer?Positron emission tomography (PET) has limited utility in the staging of pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Positron emission tomography (PET) as an adjunct to conventional imaging in the staging of pancreatic adenocarcinoma is controversial. Herein, we assess the utility of PET in identifying metastatic disease and evaluate the prognostic potential of standard uptake value (SUV).Imaging and follow-up data for patients diagnosed with pancreatic adenocarcinoma were reviewed retrospectively. Resectability was assessed based on established criteria, and sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of PET were compared to those of conventional imaging modalities.For 123 patients evaluated 2005-2011, PET and CT/MRI were concordant in 108 (88 %) cases; however, PET identified occult metastatic lesions in seven (5.6 %). False-positive PETs delayed surgery for three (8.3 %) patients. In a cohort free of metastatic disease in 78.9 % of cases, the sensitivity and specificity of PET for metastases were 89.3 and 85.1 %, respectively, compared with 62.5 and 93.5 % for CT and 61.5 and 100.0 % for MRI. Positive predictive value and negative predictive value of PET were 64.1 and 96.4 %, respectively, compared with 75.0 and 88.9 % for CT and 100.0 and 91.9 % for MRI. Average difference in maximum SUV of resectable and unresectable lesions was not statistically significant (5.65 vs. 6.5, p = 0.224) nor was maximum SUV a statistically significant predictor of survival (p = 0.18).PET is more sensitive in identifying metastatic lesions than CT or MRI; however, it has a lower specificity, lower positive predictive value, and in some cases, can delay definitive surgical management. Therefore, PET has limited utility as an adjunctive modality in staging of pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Comparison between endoscopic ultrasound and magnetic resonance imaging for the staging of pancreatic cancer.Preoperative staging of pancreatic cancer is crucial for proper therapy. Through this study, we aimed to compare the ability of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) to effectively detect and stage pancreatic cancer.One hundred twenty-seven patients undergoing EUS-fine-needle aspiration and MRI for the workup of pancreatic cancer were captured in a prospective database for comparison. The final surgical stage was recorded in patients who went to surgery.Of 127 patients, 48 were surgically explored, and of these, 22 (46%) underwent pancreaticoduodenectomy. Agreement in the patients' staging between EUS and MRI was 94 (74%) of 127. Magnetic resonance imaging was more likely to report metastatic disease or arterial involvement. The overall correlation between EUS and MRI was marginal (κ = 0.42; 95% CI, 0.26-0.58). Of the 48 surgically explored patients, 12 (25%) were understaged by MRI, 13 (27%) were understaged by EUS, and 1 (2%) were overstaged. Endoscopic US and MRI had a sensitivity of 34 (97.2%) of 35 for stage II tumors and 35 (100%) of 35 for lower-stage tumors, respectively.Endoscopic US and MRI had marginal correlation for staging, especially the more advanced tumors. Although EUS has the added advantage of tissue acquisition for confirmation, the tumors understaged by both the modalities were different. Therefore, both tests should be performed for accurate staging.Endoscopic ultrasound staging and guided fine needle aspiration biopsy in patients with resectable pancreatic malignancies: a single-center prospective experience.Endoscopic ultrasound staging and guided fine needle aspiration biopsy (EUS-FNA) is a highly accurate diagnostic method, useful in characterizing pancreatic lesions, obtaining definitive tissue diagnosis in patients with suspected pancreatic lesions, and providing accurate locoregional staging that enhances diagnostic certainty and evaluation of appropriateness of surgical intervention. The aims of this study were to evaluate the preoperative contribution of EUS staging and EUS-FNA in patients with suspected resectable pancreatic malignancies.A prospective study was conducted in a tertiary referral center. During a 54-month period, a total of 103 consecutive patients were prospectively evaluated with EUS and EUS-FNA. Enrolled in the study were patients with resectable pancreatic lesions, who underwent surgery.The overall operating characteristics of EUSFNA were sensitivity 96.7%, specificity 90.0%, positive predictive value 98.9%, negative predictive value 75.0%, and diagnostic accuracy 96.1%.EUS and EUS-FNA have a high accuracy and positive predictive value in the preoperative determination of resectability in pancreatic cancer.Endoscopic ultrasound for diagnosis and staging of pancreatic tumors.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is proving to be a useful tool for evaluation of clinically suspected pancreatic masses unsatisfactorily evaluated by other means of imaging. We reviewed the records of 19 patients who had CT and EUS performed for clinically suspected pancreatic masses. Each patient had subsequent surgical exploration. Nineteen patients (11 females and 8 males) presenting with symptoms (11 with obstructive jaundice, 6 with abdominal pain and weight loss) or incidental CT findings suspicious for pancreatic carcinoma underwent EUS for further pancreatic evaluation. All of these patients had exploratory laparotomies, with 13 pancreaticoduodenectomies, 3 distal pancreatectomies and splenectomies, 1 bypass procedure, 1 open pancreatic and hepatic biopsy showing metastatic disease, and 1 open exploration with negative fine-needle aspiration biopsy. EUS correctly identified pancreatic neoplasms in 17 of 19 cases, with two false positives. The tumors included 15 adenocarcinomas, 1 microcystic adenoma, and 1 lymphoma. Node status was correctly predicted in 9 of 12 specimens. Nine of 12 tumors had accurate tumor staging by EUS. Absence of vascular invasion was accurately predicted in 13 of 14 cases. Two patients had metastatic disease discovered at laparotomy. All 19 patients had preoperative abdominal CT scans, with six of these negative for pancreatic masses. EUS is more sensitive than CT in detecting pancreatic masses and is more accurate than CT in locally staging pancreatic tumors. This higher sensitivity is important because those patients with earlier stage tumors are the most likely to benefit from resection.Radial endoscopic ultrasonography in the preoperative staging of pancreatic cancer.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is a diagnostic method that aims to detect and stage tumors of the pancreas more accurately. It has a high predictive role regarding tumor resectability.The present paper aims to assess the diagnostic accuracy of radial EUS in the staging of pancreatic cancer as well as the role of EUS to predict tumor resectability.30 patients (22 males, 8 females, mean age 61 +/- 12 years) with pancreatic masses staged by both radial EUS and surgery (17 patients with intraoperative exploration and 13 with pathological examination of surgical specimens) and with histologically proved adenocarcinoma were included in the study. Surgical examination was indicated in patients with pancreatic masses evidenced by imaging methods other than EUS, without distant metastases proved preoperatively, and without taking into consideration the staging obtained by EUS. Resectability criteria for pancreatic tumors as assessed by EUS were invasion of superior mesenteric artery or invasion of celiac trunk.The accuracy of EUS T staging was 86.6%, that of N staging was 93.3% while that of the vascular invasion was 80%. The accuracy of EUS for predicting tumor stage had a direct impact on the assessment of tumor resectability (83.3%, CI 95%: 81.5- 85.2). It had a sensitivity of 100%, specificity of 75%, PPV of 91.6% and NPV of 100%.The radial EUS of the pancreas is an accurate method for tumor staging. For establishing tumor resectability, association with other imaging methods is advisable for arterial assessment.Ultrafast magnetic resonance imaging improves the staging of pancreatic tumors.This prospective study was undertaken to evaluate the accuracy of a noninvasive "all-in-one" staging method in predicting surgical resectability in patients with pancreatic or periampullary tumors.Despite progress in imaging techniques, accurate staging and correct prediction of resectability remains one of the chief problems in the management of pancreatic tumors. Staging algorithms designed to separate operable from inoperable patients to save the latter an unnecessary laparotomy are becoming increasingly complex, expensive, time-consuming, invasive, and not without risks for the patient.Between August 1996 and February 1997, 58 consecutive patients referred for operation of a pancreatic or periampullary tumor were examined clinically and by 5 staging methods: 1) percutaneous ultrasonography (US); 2) ultrafast magnetic resonance imaging (UMRI); 3) dual-phase helical computed tomography (CT); 4) selective visceral angiography; and 5) endoscopic cholangiopancreatography (ERCP). The assessment of resectability by each procedure was verified by surgical exploration and histologic examination.The study comprised 40 male and 18 female patients with a median age of 63 years. Thirty-five lesions were located in the pancreatic head (60%), 11 in the body (19%), and 1 in the tail of the gland (2%); there were 9 tumors of the ampulla (16%) and 2 of the distal common duct (3%). All five staging methods were completed in 36 patients. For reasons ranging from metallic implants to contrast medium allergy or because investigations already had been performed elsewhere, US was completed in 57 (98%), UMRI in 54 (93%), CT in 49 (84%), angiography in 48 (83%), and ERCP in 49 (84%) of these 58 patients. Signs of unresectability found were vascular involvement in 22 (38%), extrapancreatic tumor spread in 16 (26%), liver metastases in 10 (17%), lymph node involvement in 6 (10%), and peritoneal nodules in only 2 patients (3%). These findings were collated with those of surgical exploration in 47 patients (81 %) and percutaneous biopsy in 5 (9%); such invasive verification was deemed unnecessary and therefore unethical in 6 clearly inoperable patients (10%). In assessing the four main signs of unresectability (extrapancreatic tumor spread, liver metastases, lymph node involvement, and vascular invasion), the overall accuracy of UMRI was 95.7%, 93.5%, 80.4%, as compared to 85.1%, 87.2%, 76.6% for US and 74.4%, 87.2%, 69.2% for CT. In assessing vascular invasion, the sensitivity, specificity, and overall accuracy of angiography were 42.9%, 100%, and 68.8%, respectively. There were 3 complications (12.5%) after 24 resections, 5 in 17 palliative procedures, and none after 6 explorations only. The hospital stay was 14 days after resection, 13 after palliative bypass, and 6 after exploration alone. There was no operative or hospital mortality in these 58 cases.Although it is by no means 100% accurate, UMRI is equal or even superior to all other staging methods. It probably will replace most of these, because it provides an "all-in-one" investigation avoiding endoscopy, vascular cannulation, allergic reactions, and x-radiation. But because even UMRI is not perfect, the final verdict on resectability of a tumor still will depend on surgical exploration in some cases.The accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound, endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography, computed tomography, and transabdominal ultrasound in the detection and staging of primary ampullary tumors.To compare the accuracy between EUS (endoscopic ultrasound), ERCP (endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography), CT (computed tomography), and transabdominal US (ultrasound) in the detection and staging of primary ampullary tumors. We will also try to discuss the influence of endobiliary stent on EUS in staging ampullary tumors.Twenty-one patients with ampullary tumors were evaluated by EUS, ERCP, CT, and US before operation. The accuracy was assessed with TNM staging and compared with the surgical-pathological findings.EUS was superior to CT and US in detecting ampullary tumors, but EUS and ERCP are of similar sensitivity (EUS 95%, ERCP 95%, CT 19%, US 5%). EUS was superior to CT and US in T staging (EUS 75%, CT 5%, US 0%) and detecting lymph node metastasis (EUS 50%, CT 33%, US 0%) of ampullary tumors. The accuracy of EUS in T and N staging of ampullary tumors tended to be decreased in the presence of endobiliary stent (stenting: T 71%, N 75%; nonstenting T 83%, N 100%), but there was no statistical significance.EUS was superior to CT and US in assessing primary ampullary tumors, but it was not significantly superior to ERCP in detecting ampullary tumors. The presence of endobiliary stent may decrease the accuracy of EUS in staging ampullary tumors.[Endoscopic ultrasonography in determining resectability of the pancreatic adenocarcinoma].The publication presents the results of the examination and treatment of 82 patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma. The main objective of the work is the evaluation of endosonography diagnostic significance in identifying tumor vascular invasion and determining resectability of the tumor. The paper describes an EUS methodology, type of echoendoscopes and ultrasound criteria for tumor invasion to the blood vessels. Vessel invasion during endosonography was suspected in 48 (58.5%) cases, according to surgery data, tumor invasion into upper abdomen vessels was detected in 51 patients (62.2%). Sensitivity of endosonography in detecting vessel invasion was 90.2%, specificity--93.5%, accuracy--91.5%. Endosonography being in trend of present day ideas about the criteria of pancreatic cancer resectability is the leading method in the selection of patients to surgery.Preoperative evaluation of pancreatic cancer: comparison of gadolinium-enhanced dynamic MRI with MR cholangiopancreatography versus MDCT.To determine the accuracy of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) including dynamic imaging using three-dimensional gradient-echo (3D-GRE) sequences and MR cholangiopancreatograpy (MRCP) compared with that of multidetector row CT (MDCT) with regard to resectability in pancreas cancer.From February 2004 to July 2008, 54 patients (32 men, 22 women: age range, 28-83 years; mean age, 63.1 years old) with surgically proven pancreatic carcinoma, who had undergone preoperative gadolinium-enhanced 3D-GRE MRI with MRCP and triple-phase MDCT, were included in this retrospective study. Two, clinically experienced attending radiologists independently reviewed the two image sets. These readers evaluated the tumor conspicuity, presence of vascular invasion, choledochal and duodenal invasion, lymph node metastases, distant metastasis, and tumor resectability. The results were compared with the surgical and histopathologic findings using receiver operating characteristic analysis (Az) and kappa statistics.Curative resections were performed on 42 patients. Regarding the tumor conspicuity, MRI had a significantly higher Az value compared with MDCT according to both reviewers (P < 0.05). The accuracy of resectability was Az = 0.753 and 0.768 on MRI and Az = 0.829 and 0.762 on MDCT for each reviewer, and the difference in the accuracy of resectability was not significant between MRI and MDCT for either reviewer (P > 0.05). Two imaging sets showed a similar diagnostic performance in the evaluation of vascular involvement, lymph node metastasis, and distant metastasis.Dynamic 3D-GRE MRI with MRCP shows superior tumor conspicuity and similar diagnostic performance compared with MDCT in evaluating the resectability of pancreatic cancer.[Endoscopic ultrasonography in pancreatic carcinoma].Even though pancreatic cancer is not such a common diagnosis, its treatment is very expensive and it has a great economic impact to the health system. 5-year survival rates after excessive surgical treatment is only 5%, which imposes more careful selection of patients that have to be surgically treated. According to experience from some medical centers all over the world, EUS is considered as a high sensitive diagnostic method for establishing a diagnosis of pancreatic cancer and evaluation of TNM staging. The main purpose of this survey is to present our experience in using of EUS as a diagnostic method in establishing a diagnosis of pancreatic cancer, as well as to evaluate how reliable this method is in preoperative evaluation if tumor could be successfully resected. We examined the group of 63 patients with pancreatic cancer, which were surgically explored after EUS examination. We wanted to compare TNM status before and after the surgical treatment. All patients were examined by Olympus equipment for endoscopic ultrasound with radial probe working with the frequency of 7,5 and 12 MHz at the Department for Endoscopic Ultrasound of the Clinic for Gastroenterology and Hepatology, Clinical Center of Serbia. Evaluation of pancreatic tumor extension to local organs (pancreas, duodenum, choledochus, stomach, colon and large veins) was performed for all patients. All regional lymph nodes were also explored. Due to low penetration ability of the probe working with the frequency of 7.5 MHz, EUS is not a suitable method for evaluation of M stage (figure 8,9). Patients were divided in different groups, specified by TNM status. For 10 patients resection was estimated as a probably successful solution, but only 8 of them was surgically treated. According to this, our estimation was 79.7% accurate, which is in accordance to results obtained from other medical centers all over the world.Pancreatic adenocarcinoma: MDCT versus MRI in the detection and assessment of locoregional extension.To compare dynamic-contrast enhanced multirow detector computed tomography (MDCT) including multiplanar reformatted images (MPR) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) including magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography images for the detection and assessment of locoregional extension of pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Twenty-four patients with and 21 patients without pancreatic adenocarcinoma underwent triple-phase MDCT and MRI. Three radiologists independently attempted to detect pancreatic adenocarcinoma and assess locoregional extension in 3 sessions. First session involved MDCT images. In the second session, radiologists had access to coronal and sagittal MPR images together with the axial images (MDCT + MPR). Third session involved MR images. Results were compared with surgical findings using receiver operating characteristic analysis and kappa statistics.Regarding tumor detection, MDCT + MPR had a significantly higher value for areas under the curve (0.96 +/- 0.02) at receiver operating characteristic analysis compared with those of MRI (0.90 +/- 0.03) and MDCT (0.85 +/- 0.04). MDCT + MPR had the highest mean sensitivity (96%), and MRI had the highest mean specificity (98%). For locoregional extension, MDCT + MPR showed the highest kappa values of the study for all factors evaluated (range, 0.63-0.86).In conclusion, multiphasic MDCT imaging with MPR images was superior to multiphasic MDCT imaging without MPR images and to comprehensive MRI employing 2-D sequences and magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography for both the detection and assessment of locoregional extension of pancreatic adenocarcinomas. MRI might be used for further lesion characterization regarding its high specificity.Preoperative assessment of pancreatic malignancy using endoscopic ultrasound.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) has been regarded as the most accurate modality for locoregional staging of pancreatic malignancy. However, several recent studies have questioned this. The current study assessed the accuracy of EUS in determining preoperative resectability of pancreatic neoplasia.A retrospective review was performed of patients with pancreatic malignancy who had preoperative EUS and underwent surgery. EUS-predicted resectability was compared with surgical resectability. Where available, accuracies of vascular and nodal staging were also assessed.Forty-five patients were identified (mean age 60 years, age range = 36-79 years). All patients underwent surgical exploration; vascular staging was available in 32 cases and 17 cases underwent surgical resection. The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of EUS in determining unresectability were 66%, 100%, and 78% respectively. Overall EUS stage concurred with surgical stage in 56%, greater than surgical stage in 4%, and less than surgical stage in 40%. Vascular staging on EUS had a sensitivity of 69% and a specificity of 100%. Accuracy of nodal staging was 71%.EUS had a high specificity for assessing unresectable pancreatic malignancy. This technique should be used to avoid unnecessary surgical exploration of incurable lesions. However, EUS had only a moderate sensitivity, and a proportion of patients staged preoperatively as having resectable disease will not be surgically resectable.The use of endoscopic ultrasonography in the diagnosis and staging of carcinoma of the papilla of Vater.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) was evaluated in the diagnosis of carcinoma of the papilla of Vater. Thirteen cases of carcinoma of the papilla examined by EUS were investigated with the aim of assessing the detection capability of EUS in comparison with other diagnostic tools, and its usefulness in diagnosing the extent of the tumor. The EUS image of the normal papilla of Vater presents as a round protruded region with the layered structure of the duodenal papilla along with images of periampullary organs. All but one of 13 tumors of the duodenal papilla presented as a hypoechoic solid mass at EUS. On the basis of an analysis of the layered structure of the papilla of Vater and/or the duodenal wall, EUS images of 12 cases of ampullary carcinoma confirmed histologically were analysed. The EUS images of the tumors of the duodenal papilla corresponded well with the histological findings. When the extent of carcinoma was classified in 4 stages by EUS, the accuracy rate was 83%. EUS is one of the most promising procedures for determining the extent of tumors of the duodenal papilla.Endosonography is superior to angiography in the preoperative assessment of vascular involvement among patients with pancreatic carcinoma.Surgical exploration in patients with pancreatic carcinoma without adequate preoperative attempts to determine resectability results in resection in only a minority of patients. Besides distant metastases, involvement of the major vessels is the most important parameter for determining resectability in patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma. Angiography has been an integral part of pancreatic cancer staging. Lately, endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) has emerged as a more accurate tool in the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer. We hypothesize that EUS is more accurate than selective venous angiography (SVA) for assessing resectability of pancreatic adenocarcinoma based on preoperative evaluation of vascular involvement. Twenty-one patients who met the inclusion criteria were prospectively evaluated with both EUS and SVA before undergoing surgical exploration for attempted curative resection. Vascular involvement was determined by EUS and SVA using previously described criteria. The sensitivity, specificity, and overall accuracy of EUS and SVA in assessing vascular involvement were compared, using surgical exploration as the gold standard. Endoscopic ultrasound had a higher sensitivity than SVA for detecting vascular involvement (86% vs. 21%, respectively; p = 0.0018). The specificity and accuracy of EUS for detecting vascular involvement was 71% and 81%, respectively. In contrast, the specificity and accuracy of SVA for detecting vascular involvement was 71% and 38%, respectively. Endoscopic ultrasound is significantly more sensitive than angiography for detecting vascu lar involvement in patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma and, thus, may improve patient selection for attempted curative resection.Prospective evaluation of pancreatic tumors: accuracy of MR imaging with MR cholangiopancreatography and MR angiography.To prospectively assess accuracy of magnetic resonance (MR) imaging, MR cholangiopancreatography (MRCP), and MR angiography in patients suspected of having pancreatic tumors.Sixty-six patients suspected of having pancreatic tumors underwent MR imaging (unenhanced and contrast material-enhanced MR, MRCP, and contrast-enhanced MR angiography). Two blinded readers prospectively analyzed the images by consensus, and results were correlated with surgery, biopsy, or follow-up findings. Results were tabulated in two-by-two tables.MR assessment of pancreatic lesion status (differentiation of benign vs malignant) resulted in 60 correct diagnoses (accuracy, 91%), and six (10%) false diagnoses. Among histologically proved malignant tumors, MR imaging yielded correct diagnoses in 42 of 44 patients (sensitivity, 95%; 95% CI: 85%, 99%), whereas 18 of 22 patients with benign findings were classified correctly. At MR imaging, findings in four patients with chronic pancreatitis were wrongly categorized as malignant tumors (specificity, 82%; 95% CI: 60%, 95%), and in one patient, a distal common bile duct carcinoma was not detected. In no patient with pancreatic adenocarcinoma was this tumor misdiagnosed as benign. In patients with malignant tumors who underwent resection, local-regional tumor growth and vascular infiltration were accurately classified in 89% and 94%, respectively. MR imaging depicted histologically proved synchronous hepatic metastases in 82%. The positive and negative predictive values for cancer nonresectability were 90% and 83%, respectively, and the accuracy, sensitivity, and specificity were 85%, 69%, and 95%, respectively.Unenhanced and contrast-enhanced MR imaging with MRCP and MR angiography offers potential as a noninvasive tool for assessment of patients suspected of having pancreatic tumors.Is a preoperative multidiagnostic approach to predict surgical resectability of periampullary tumors still effective?Multimodality staging is recommended in patients with periampullary tumors to optimize preoperative determination of resectability. We investigated the potency of currently used diagnostic procedures in order to determine resectability.Ninety-five consecutive patients with periampullary tumors prehospitally staged resectable underwent preoperative diagnostic tests: helical-computed tomography (CT) with maximum intensity projection of arterial vessels (MIP), magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), magnetic resonance cholangiopancreaticography (MRCP), endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS), endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreaticography (ERCP), digital subtraction angiography (DSA), and positron emission tomography (PET). Diagnoses were verified by surgery and histopathology.In 45 patients with benign and 50 patients with malignant periampullary tumors sensitivity for tumor diagnosis was 89% to 96% in CT, MRI, EUS, and PET. Small tumors were best diagnosed by EUS (100%). Diagnosis of malignancy was made with 85% (EUS), 83% (CT), 82% (PET), and 72% (MRI) accuracy. Arterial vessel infiltration was best predicted by CT/MIP with an accuracy of 85%. For venous vessel infiltration MRI reached 85% accuracy. Accuracy rates for local nonresectability were 93% (EUS), 92% (MRI), and 90% (CT). Two and 4 of 8 patients with distant metastases were identified by CT and PET, respectively. The correct diagnosis of malignancy and determination of resectability was made by CT in 71% and by MRI in 70%. Biliary stenting reduced accuracy of CT diagnosis of malignancy from 88% to 73%.CT obtained before stenting was the single most useful test, providing correct diagnosis in 88% and resectability in 71% of patients. If no tumor is depicted in CT, EUS should be added. Uncertain venous vessel infiltration can be verified by MRI or EUS. Angiography should no longer be a routine diagnostic procedure. Equivocal tumors or possible metastasis may be further examined with PET.The value of positron emission tomography/computed tomography for evaluating metastatic disease in patients with pancreatic cancer.Routine application of positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) for pancreatic cancer staging remains a controversial approach. The purpose of this study was to reassess the clinical impact of PET/CT for the detection of distant metastasis of pancreatic cancer.From January 2006 to June 2009, 125 patients with histologically proven pancreatic cancer that had undergone PET/CT at our hospital were retrospectively reviewed. To evaluate the clinical efficacy of PET/CT on the management plan, the post-PET/CT management plans were compared with the pre-PET/CT management plans.After the conventional staging workup, we determined that 76 patients (60.8%) had resectable lesions, whereas 48 patients had unresectable lesions. One patient underwent explorative laparotomy due to equivocal resectability. Positron emission tomography/computed tomography diagnosed distant metastasis in only 2 (2.6%) of the 76 patients with resectable lesions, and these patients did not undergo unnecessary surgical treatment. Complete resection was not performed in 8 of the 74 operative patients because they had distant metastasis detected during the operative procedure. Positron emission tomography/computed tomography diagnosed distant metastasis in 32 of the 44 patients with metastatic lesions that were histologically shown to have sensitivity of 72.7%.Positron emission tomography/computed tomography has a limited role in the evaluation of metastatic disease from pancreatic cancer.The clinical utility of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine-needle aspiration in the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic carcinoma.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) guided fine-needle aspiration (FNA) of pancreatic lesions is being increasingly used. Our aim was to determine the safety, accuracy, and clinical utility of EUS-guided FNA in both the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer.Forty-four patients (24 men/20 women) had EUS-guided FNA of pancreatic lesions (39 head/neck, 5 body, 3 tail) and/or associated lymph nodes. The mean age was 61 (range, 28 to 88 years). The indication for EUS-guided FNA was a pancreatic lesion seen initially on CT (39%), ERCP (43%), or EUS (18%). Follow-up data were collected on all patients for mean of 14.5 months (range 1 to 33 months).CT detected only 15 of 61 (25%) focal lesions seen by EUS, Adequate specimens were obtained by EUS-guided FNA in 44 of 47 (94%) pancreatic lesions and 14 of 14 (100%) associated lymph nodes (overall adequacy was 95%). Of the 46 lesions in which specimens were adequate and a final diagnosis was available (32 malignant, 14 benign), EUS-guided FNA had a sensitivity of 92%, specificity of 100%, and diagnostic accuracy of 95% for pancreatic lesions and 83%, 100%, and 88% for lymph nodes, respectively. Six percent of pancreatic cases had inadequate specimens and, if included, lowered the sensitivity to 83%, specificity to 80%, and diagnostic accuracy to 88% for pancreatic lesions. In 3 patients with enlarged celiac nodes on EUS, EUS-guided FNA was able to make a tissue diagnosis of metastasis, which changed the preoperative staging and precluded surgery. EUS in combination with EUS-guided FNA precluded surgery in 12 of 44 (27%) and may have precluded surgery in an additional 6 of 44 (14%). EUS-guided FNA avoided the need for further diagnostic tests, thus expediting therapy in a total of 25 (57%) patients and influenced clinical decisions in 30 of 44 (68%) patients. The estimated cost savings based on surgeries avoided was approximately $3300 per patient. There was only one complication (2%), a post-FNA fever.EUS-guided FNA of the pancreas appears to be a safe and effective method that increases both the diagnostic and staging capability of EUS in pancreatic cancer. The clinical impact of EUS-guided FNA includes avoiding surgery and additional imaging studies with a substantial cost savings.Magnetic resonance angiography in the resectability assessment of suspected pancreatic tumours.The aim of this prospective study was to evaluate MRI, including MR angiography (MRA), in the preoperative assessment of the resectability of suspected malignancy of the pancreas. A total of 17 patients with suspected pancreatic carcinoma and planned surgery were investigated with conventional angiography, ultrasonography with Doppler technique, MRI and MRA. The MRA protocol included both 2D inflow angiography and 3D phase-contrast angiography. Surgery was carried out in 13 patients. The image quality of MRA was judged satisfactory in all cases. The findings with respect to vascular involvement agreed between the radiological methods in all but 3 cases. When the findings were correlated with the final diagnosis, one false-negative case was found for each of the three methods. The results suggest that MRI with MRA, including both the phase-contrast and inflow techniques, has a similar diagnostic value to that of conventional angiography and ultrasonography in the preoperative assessment of the portal venous system in patients with pancreatic carcinoma. Further studies are needed to establish the optimal diagnostic procedure.Endoscopic ultrasonography versus helical CT in diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer.Compare the performances of EUS to helical CT in the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Forty two consecutive patients (mean age 63 years; 25 men, 17 women) who had surgical exploration and histologically proved pancreatic cancer were retrospectively included. All our patients underwent with endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and helical computed tomography (helical CT). Data analysis compared helical CT, EUS with the surgical data with or without histological study in diagnosis, staging and resectability of pancreatic cancer. Surgical findings were used as gold standard.For positive diagnosis EUS was more sensitive 100% (CI:93-100) than helical CT 88% (CI:77-95). But helical CT was more specific 89% (CI:64-98) than EUS 83% (CI:58-96) for small tumors whose diameter is below 2.5 cm in witch EUS was more sensitive in their detection (100% versus 83%). In evaluating venous involvement EUS was more sensitive than helical CT (96% versus 50%; p<0.05), while CT was more specific (81% versus 75%; p<0.05). Regarding lymph nodes invasion, the two imaging technique had the same sensibility (56%) with better specificity for helical CT (83% versus 75%; p<0.05). The accuracy of EUS in identifying the T and N stages were 80% and 67% respectively, while helical CT have an accuracy of 50% and 71% respectively. EUS and helical CT correctly identified all resectable tumors while EUS was more accurate than helical CT in detecting non resectable tumors 94% versus 69%.EUS remains superior to helical CT in positive diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma especially for small tumors and also for the diagnosis of venous invasion and in identifying non resectable tumors. The two techniques have the same accuracy in the detection of lymph node involvement.The use of EUS to diagnose malignant portal venous system invasion by pancreatic cancer.CT scanning and mesenteric angiography are insensitive tests diagnosing vascular invasion by pancreatic cancer. Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) has been proposed as an alternative. The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of specific EUS criteria for diagnosing malignant invasion of the branches of the portal venous system have not been determined.This is a prospective blinded evaluation of EUS and angiography to diagnose malignant invasion of the portal venous system by pancreatic cancer in 45 patients, 28 of whom underwent surgery. Surgical staging was used as the gold standard for determining the accuracy of EUS and angiography.Four EUS criteria were studied and the overall accuracy rates were as follows: irregular venous wall (87%), loss of interface (78%), proximity of mass (73%), and size (39%). Although "irregular venous wall" was the most accurate, it suffered from a low sensitivity rate (47%) because of its relative inability to detect superior mesenteric vein invasion (sensitivity of 17%). The angiographic criteria had accuracy rates of 73% to 90% with low sensitivity rates (20% to 77%). The clean resection rate was 86% when all tests were used, 78% if EUS was used without angiography, and 60% if only angiography was used.EUS is highly sensitive for detecting portal and splenic vein invasion by pancreatic cancer, but may be insensitive for superior mesenteric vein involvement.18F-FDG positron emission tomography CT (FDG PET-CT) in the management of pancreatic cancer: initial experience in 12 patients.Staging and restaging of pancreatic malignancy can be demanding. Often, there are liver lesions seen on diagnostic CT suspicious for secondary deposits. Positron emission tomography (PET)-CT may have a great potential in confirming or ruling out actual malignancy in those areas.We prospectively studied 12 pancreatic adenocarcinoma patients, who had undergone PET-CT imaging as part of their staging or restaging process. Imaging was performed after intravenous administration of 10 mCi F-18 FDG. Results were compared with CT, histopathological findings and/or clinical follow up.PET-CT correctly identified 11 lesions and ruled the absence of disease in 4 out of 4 patients (PPV 92%, NPV of 100%, and accuracy 94%), compared to CT which had (PPV 79%, NPV 50% and accuracy 75%). CT identified 4 metastatic liver lesions in 12 patients of which 3 were actually benign processes.FDG-PET detects pancreatic malignancy and metastatic disease with higher accuracy than conventional CT. The ability of PET-CT to rule out or correctly identify metastases greatly enhances the physician's decision-making process to choose the right therapeutic intervention.[Resectability of pancreatic head adenocarcinoma].[MRI in the evaluation of peripancreatic vessel invasion and resectability of pancreatic carcinoma].To investigate the role of MRI in evaluating the peripancreatic vessel invasion and resectability of pancreatic carcinoma based on the comparison of MRI image with surgical exploration, and try to establish the criteria for assessment of the sensitivity, specificity and accuracy of resectability.Forty-one pancreatic carcinoma patients confirmed by pathology received preoperative plain and contrast enhanced MRI scan, and 37 of them had additional coronal MRA scan. Peripancreatic vessel invasion was preoperatively assessed based on MRI features, and the vessel invasion degree from the uninvolved to the severely involved was divided into 6 grades represented by 1, 2a, 2b, 3a, 3b and 4, respectively. Compared with the findings during the surgery, the sensitivity and specificity of each vessel invasion grade were studied and the receiver operator characteristic curve (ROC) was drawn. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and accuracy of resectability evaluation based on 2 and 2a degree were calculated respectively. The resectability of involved arteries and veins of grade 2 were also analyzed.Of the 41 patients, 22 had resectable tumor, with 20 curative resection and 2 palliative. Compared with the findings during surgery, seven vessels including three arteries and four veins were not correctly interpreted by MRI. If grade 1,2a,2b,3a and 3b was used as the resectable standard,respectively, the sensitivity to predict the unresectbility was 78.3%, 84.8%, 67.4%, 56.5% and 47.8%, respectively. Receiver operator characteristic curve demonstrated that grade 2a was the optimal critical point. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value and accuracy of grade 2a in predicting the unresectbility were 84.8%, 98.5%, 92.9%, 96.6% and 95.9%.Our data showed that grade 2a (tumor involvement < 2 cm long and < 1/2 circumference of the vessel) may be more sensitive and accurate in predicting the resectability, which may be considered as the line of demarcation between the respectable and unresectable cases in clinical practice.Pancreatic carcinoma: MR, MR angiography and dynamic helical CT in the evaluation of vascular invasion.To assess the value of MR angiography in combination with contrast-enhanced MR imaging, and to compare MR imaging including MR angiography with dynamic contrast-enhanced dual phase helical CT in the preoperative assessment of vascular invasion in patients with suspected pancreatic carcinoma.MR imaging only, MR imaging including MR angiography and dynamic contrast-enhanced dual phase helical CT images of 48 patients who were operated due to suspicion of pancreas cancer were correlated with the surgery results in terms of vascular invasion. Pathologic diagnosis were pancreatic adenocarcinoma in 31 patients of which nine had surgically confirmed vascular invasion. Sensitivity, specificity, predictive values (including 95% confidence intervals) and accuracy of MR imaging only, MR imaging including MR angiography and helical CT were calculated.Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values and accuracy were 56, 100, 100, 85, 87%; 67, 100, 100, 88, 90% and 67, 100, 100, 88, 90%, respectively, for MR imaging only, MR imaging including MR angiography and helical CT in the adenocarcinoma group. The corresponding figures in the overall study group were 56, 97, 83, 90, 90%; 67, 97, 86, 93, 92% and 67, 97, 86, 93, 92%. Confidence intervals (95%) showed that the differences in the diagnostic efficacy of the techniques were not statistically significant in the overall study group, but the confidence intervals were undefined in the adenocarcinoma group due to the small sample size.Diagnostic efficacy of MR imaging when combined with MR angiography is equal to that of dynamic contrast-enhanced dual phase helical CT in the assessment of vascular invasion of pancreatic tumors.Defining a role for endoscopic ultrasound in staging periampullary tumors.The goal of the preoperative workup in patients with suspected periampullary carcinoma is to establish the diagnosis with a high degree of certainty. In this study we compared endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and computed tomography (CT) scans for the detection of tumor, lymph node metastasis, and vascular invasion in patients with suspected periampullary carcinoma in order to define a role for EUS in the preoperative staging of these patients.Thirty-seven consecutive patients received EUS and CT scanning followed by operation for presumed periampullary carcinoma during a 30-month period. Both imaging modalities were reviewed in a blinded fashion and the results compared with pathology and operative reports on all patients.Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value for tumor detection by EUS were 97%, 33%, 94%, and 50%, respectively, compared with 82%, 66%, 97%, and 25% for CT scan. For lymph nodes the values were 21%, 80%, 57%, and 44%, respectively, for EUS compared with 42%, 73%, 67%, and 50% for CT. For vascular invasion, the values were 20%, 100%, 100%, and 89%, respectively, for EUS, compared with 80%, 87%, 44%, and 96% for CT.CT is the initial study of choice in patients with suspected periampullary tumors. EUS is superior for detecting tumor and for predicting vascular invasion. Therefore, EUS should be used for patients in whom CT does not detect a mass and for those with an identifiable mass on CT in whom vascular invasion cannot be ruled out.Endoscopic ultrasonography in staging local resectability of pancreatic and periampullary malignancy.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) was performed before surgery in 14 patients with pancreatic cancer and in 9 patients with periampullary carcinoma. EUS enabled accurate determination of the extent of the lesions and the presence of suspicious lymph node enlargements. Carcinoma deeply infiltrating into the surrounding structures and major blood vessels was strongly indicative of local non-resectability. In contrast, clearly defined well-circumscribed hypoechoic tumours with no evidence of distant lymph node involvement were compatible with local resectability. The presence of multiple enlarged lymph nodes with irregular echo pattern adjacent to the major blood vessels (hepatic artery, coeliac trunk, aorta) surrounding locally resectable tumours was indicative of the palliative nature of the resection. Technical improvement, in particular the possibility of guided cytological aspiration, may further enhance the diagnostic value of this new imaging technique.[Benefit of PET/CT in the preoperative staging in pancreatic carcinomas].Prognosis of patients with pancreatic cancer is poor. Median survival from diagnosis without determining surgical treatment is 3-11 months, after surgical treatment between 13-20 months according to various studies. 5-year survival rate is below 5%. The only chance of cure remains a radical surgical resection. Early diagnosis and determining resectability of tumour is the most important objective in patients with pancreatic cancer. Aim of this work is to evaluate the benefits and define the role of 18F-FDG PET/CT in preoperative staging.195 patients (103 men, 92 women, mean age 66.7 year, range 32-88 years) with suspected pancreatic lesions underwent enhanced 18F-FDG PET/CT in the preoperative staging in addition to standard investigative methods (ultrasonography, contrast enhanced CT, EUS, EUS FNA). All PET/CT findings were compared with standard methods (CT, EUS, EUS FNA), with peroperative findings and definitive histology in surgical patients as the reference standards. Interpretation of the extent of the tumor defined by TNM classification. Limitations of the local resectability was advanced local stage (T4) and presence of distant metastases (M1).In 195 patients with suspected pancreatic lesions was pre-operatively performed PET/CT in the period 1/2007-3/2009. 153 patients with pancreatic cancer, of which 72 was not suitable for radical surgery because of local inoperability or a generalization of the disease. The sensitivity of PET/CT in the capture of primary lesions was 92.2%, specificity 90.5%. False negative findings in 12 patients, false-positive results occurred in 4 cases, positive predictive value (PPV) 97.2%, negative predictive value (NPV) 76.0%. In the assessment of regional lymph nodes sensitivity was 51.9%, specificity 58.3%, PPV 58.3%,NPV 51.9%. In detection of distant metastases PET/CT reached sensitivity 82.8%, specificity 97.8%, PPV 96.9%, NPV 87.0%. PET/CT found distant metastases in 12 patients, which standard methods failed to detect. Surgery was cancelled in 15 patients (15.6%) with potentially resectable tumour based on the performance of PET/CT findings and the management of treatment was changed.PET/CT is highly sensitive and specific method suitable for preoperative staging of pancreatic cancer. It improves the selection of patients for surgery, who can benefit from and reduces the number of incorrectly indicated operations.[Prospective evaluation of the clinical significance of ultrasonography, helical computed tomography, magnetic resonance imaging and endoscopic ultrasonography in the assessment of vascular invasion and lymph node metastasis of pancreatic carcinoma].To evaluate prospectively the efficacy of ultrasonography (US), helical computed tomography (HCT), endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in the assessment of vascular invasion and lymph node metastasis in pancreatic carcinoma.Consecutive 68 patients with pancreatic carcinoma were studied. Results of each imaging techniques regarding vascular invasion and lymph node metastasis were compared with the surgical and pathological findings.(1) US findings were confirmed moderately in accordance with surgical and pathological results in the evaluation of inferior cava vein, splenic artery and vein invasion of pancreatic carcinoma. HCT findings of evaluating superior mesenteric vein, portal vein, splenic vein were confirmed greatly in accordance with surgical and pathological results. The results of evaluating superior mesenteric artery, inferior cava vein, splenic artery, common hepatic artery, proper hepatic artery, celiac trunk, abdominal aorta were confirmed moderately in accordance with surgical and pathological results. MRI findings of evaluating superior mesenteric artery and vein, portal artery and vein were moderately in accordance with surgical and pathological results. EUS findings of evaluating splenic vein were confirmed greatly in accordance with surgical and pathological results, and moderately in accordance with surgical and pathological results in the evaluation of superior mesenteric vein. (2) EUS had the highest sensitivity (75.0%), accuracy (87.5%), and negative predictive values (91.7%) in the evaluation of lymph node metastasis. The sensitivity of HCT and MRI were 37.5% and 35.3%, which were significantly lower than that of EUS. The sensitivity of US was 18.7%, which was the lowest of all. In addition, the multivariate logistic regression analysis confirmed that EUS had an independent predictive value (OR: 34.50, 95%CI: 6.54 - 182.09).Helical CT should be considered the most precise technique to evaluate vascular invasion. EUS had an independent predictive value with respect to tumor metastasis to regional lymph nodes.Gadobenate dimeglumine-enhanced 3.0-T MR imaging versus multiphasic 64-detector row CT: prospective evaluation in patients suspected of having pancreatic cancer.To compare the diagnostic performance (detection, local staging) of multiphasic 64-detector row computed tomography (CT) with that of gadobenate dimeglumine-enhanced 3.0-T magnetic resonance (MR) imaging in patients suspected of having pancreatic cancer.The institutional review board approved this prospective study, and all patients provided written informed consent. Multidetector CT and MR imaging were performed in 89 patients (48 women aged 46-89 years [mean, 65.6 years] and 41 men aged 46-86 years [mean, 65.3 years]) suspected of having pancreatic cancer on the basis of findings from clinical examination or previous imaging studies. Two readers independently assessed the images to characterize lesions and determine the presence of focal masses, vascular invasion, distant metastases, and resectability. Findings from surgery, biopsy, endosonography, or follow-up imaging were used as the standard of reference. Logistic regression, the McNemar test, and κ values were used for statistical analysis.Focal pancreatic masses were present in 63 patients; 43 patients had adenocarcinoma. For reader 1, the sensitivities and specificities in the detection of pancreatic adenocarcinoma were 98% (42 of 43 patients) and 96% (44 of 46 patients), respectively, for CT and 98% (42 of 43 patients) and 96% (44 of 46 patients) for MR imaging. For reader 2, the sensitivities and specificities were 93% (40 of 43 patients) and 96% (44 of 46 patients), respectively, for CT and 95% (41 of 43 patients) and 96% (44 of 46 patients) for MR imaging. Vessel infiltration was determined in 22 patients who underwent surgery, and reader 1 obtained sensitivities and specificities of 90% (nine of 10 vessels) and 98% (119 of 122 vessels), respectively, for CT and 80% (eight of 10 vessels) and 96% (117 of 122 vessels) for MR imaging; for reader 2, those values were 70% (seven of 10 vessels) and 98% (120 of 122 vessels) for CT and 50% (five of 10 vessels) and 98% (120 of 122 vessels) for MR imaging. Both readers correctly assessed resectability in 87% (13 of 15 patients) of cases with CT and 93% (14 of 15 patients) of cases with MR imaging. Nonresectability was assessed correctly with CT in 75% (six of eight patients) of cases by reader 1 and 63% (five of eight patients) of cases by reader 2; nonresectability was correctly assessed with MR imaging in 75% (six of eight patients) of cases by reader 1 and 50% (four of eight patients) of cases by reader 2. None of the differences between modalities and readers were statistically significant (P > .05).Both CT and MR imaging are equally suited for detecting and staging pancreatic cancer.http://radiology.rsna.org/lookup/suppl/doi:10.1148/radiol.11101189/-/DC1.Local extension of pancreatic carcinoma: assessment with thin-section helical CT versus with breath-hold fast MR imaging--ROC analysis.To compare contrast material-enhanced thin-section helical CT with breath-hold contrast-enhanced MR imaging for sensitivity in the detection of pancreatic adenocarcinoma and for accuracy in local tumor staging.Fifty-seven patients (37 men, 20 women aged 42-28 years) suspected of having pancreatic adenocarcinoma were examined. The final diagnosis was confirmed at surgery to be pancreatic cancer in 31 patients; the other 26 patients were deemed not to have pancreatic cancer. All patients underwent both CT and MR imaging (turbo spin-echo and fast low-angle shot) studies. Image quality and pancreatic enhancement were subjectively evaluated. All CT scans and MR images were assessed by two independent observers by using a five-point scale for the detection of tumor and of invasion into the peripancreatic tissue, portal vein, and/or peripancreatic artery. Receiver operating characteristic curves for CT and MR imaging were analyzed.At visual analysis, pancreatic enhancement at CT and at MR imaging was comparable, but depiction of vessels was superior at helical CT. Detectability of tumor was comparable. Helical CT was significantly superior to MR imaging in diagnostic imaging of invasion into the peripancreatic tissue, portal vein, and/or peripancreatic artery (P < .01).Thin-section dynamic CT is more sensitive than MR imaging for detection of peripancreatic and vascular invasion in patients with pancreatic cancer.Ampullopancreatic carcinoma: preoperative TNM classification with endosonography.Endosonography (ES) was used for the preoperative TNM (1987) staging of tumors in 43 patients with pancreatic cancer and 24 patients with ampullary carcinomas. These results were correlated with the histologic findings of resected specimens. Early-stage tumors could be distinguished from advanced stages of cancer with ES. Detailed images of ductular and parenchymal abnormalities allowed distinction between pancreatic and ampullary carcinomas based on anatomic location. The overall accuracy of ES in the assessment of tumor classification in pancreatic and ampullary carcinoma was 92% and 88%, respectively. In diagnosing regional lymph nodes in pancreatic and ampullary tumors the accuracy of ES was 74% and 54%, respectively. For diagnosing metastatic lymph nodes in pancreatic and ampullary carcinoma the accuracy of ES was 91% and 80%, respectively. The prevalence of lymph node metastases in T1 pancreatic cancers and T1 ampullary carcinomas was 40% and 0%, respectively. Discrimination between inflammation and metastases was difficult with ES. ES was not accurate in assessing distant metastases because of the limited penetration depth of ultrasound.Comparison of multislice computed tomography and endoscopic ultrasonography with operative and histological findings in suspected pancreatic and periampullary malignancy.This study compared multislice computed tomography (MSCT) with endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic and periampullary malignancy.Data were collected prospectively on patients having MSCT and EUS for suspected pancreatic and periampullary malignancy.Eighty-four patients had MSCT and EUS, of whom 35 underwent operative assessment (29 resections). In assessing malignancy, there was no significant difference between MSCT and EUS, and agreement was good (82 per cent, kappa = 0.49); the sensitivity and specificity of MSCT were 97 and 87 per cent, compared with 95 and 52 per cent respectively for EUS (P = 0.264). For portal vein/superior mesenteric vein invasion, MSCT was superior (P = 0.017) and agreement was moderate (72 per cent, kappa = 0.42); the sensitivity and specificity were 88 and 92 per cent for MSCT, and 50 and 83 per cent for EUS. For resectability, there was no significant difference and agreement was good (78 per cent, kappa = 0.51). EUS had an impact on the management of 14 patients in whom MSCT suggested benign disease or equivocal resectability.MSCT is the imaging method of choice for pancreatic and periampullary tumours. Routine EUS should be reserved for those with borderline resectability on MSCT.[18 F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography for characterization and initial staging of pancreatic tumors].To evaluate positron emission tomography (PET) with (18)F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) for characterizing and initial staging of pancreatic tumors and to determine its impact on therapeutic strategy.This study included 24 patients with pancreatic tumor who underwent PET before treatment. Twenty-two patients had a malignant tumor and two had a benign tumor. The PET scan was performed after intravenous injection of FDG with a gamma camera. PET findings were compared with histology of the pancreatic tumor (n=24), liver metastases (n=5), peritoneal metastases (n=5), and lymph node metastases (n=5). Absence of metastasis or lymph node involvement was determined by surgery or by CT scan, ultrasonography, magnetic resonance imaging and at least two months follow-up.The sensitivity of the PET scans to identify pancreatic carcinoma was 64% (95% confidence interval 44-84%). PET scans could not be interpreted for lymph node involvement adjacent to the tumor. For liver metastases, the PET scan was positive in 3 out of 5 patients. For peritoneal metastases, the PET scan was positive in 4 out of 5 patients but was doubtful in one. There were two false positives. Among the 4 cystic tumors, the PET scan was positive for 2 malignant tumors and negative for 2 benign tumors. Surgical strategy was modified in only one of the 24 patients on the basis of PET findings.The sensitivity of PET for the diagnosis of primary malignant pancreatic tumor was found to be low. The contribution of FDG-PET to the surgical decision appears to be limited to the detection of metastases or lymph node involvement distant from the tumor, contraindicating surgery. Nevertheless, the sensitivity of FDG-PET is lower than that of laparoscopy for peritoneal metastases. Indications for PET should be included in an evaluation of therapeutic decision making and cost analysis.Improved detection of hepatic metastases from pancreatic cancer using periodically rotated overlapping parallel lines with enhanced reconstruction (PROPELLER) technique after SPIO administration.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the detection of hepatic metastases from the pancreatic cancer using different MR imaging methods, including superparamagnetic iron oxide (SPIO)-enhanced fat-saturated T2-weighted imaging with periodically rotated overlapping parallel lines with enhanced reconstruction (PROPELLER) technique.The institutional review board approved this prospective study. Eighty-two patients (mean age, 55 years) underwent different MR imaging with a 1.5-T scanner. Diagnostic performance with receiver operating characteristics (ROC) curves and sensitivity were evaluated for the following image sets: (A) unenhanced images (T1-weighted in-phase and opposed-phase gradient-echo [GRE] images, and fat-saturated T2-weighted turbo spin-echo [TSE] images) that were included in the subsequent image sets, (B) diffusion-weighted images, (C) SPIO-enhanced fat-saturated T2-weighted TSE images with prospective acquisition correction (PACE), (D) SPIO-enhanced T2*-weighted GRE images, and (E) SPIO-enhanced fat-saturated T2-weighted TSE images acquired with PROPELLER and PACE.The areas under the ROC curves were 0.58 +/- 0.05 (mean +/- standard errors), 0.81 +/- 0.04, 0.70 +/- 0.05, 0.80 +/- 0.04, and 0.90 +/- 0.03, and sensitivity was 0.47, 0.69, 0.56, 0.66, and 0.77 for image sets (A) to (E), respectively, for all lesions. Image set (E) had significantly larger area under the ROC curve for detection of hepatic lesions and higher sensitivity than others.SPIO-enhanced fat-saturated T2-weighted MR imaging with the PROPELLER technique is more effective for detecting hepatic metastases of pancreatic cancer than diffusion-weighted MR imaging, SPIO-enhanced fat-saturated T2WI without the PROPELLER technique, or SPIO-enhanced T2*-weighted GRE imaging.Prediction of vascular involvement and resectability by multidetector-row CT versus MR imaging with MR angiography in patients who underwent surgery for resection of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma.To compare the diagnostic value of dual-phase multidetector-row CT (MDCT) and MR imaging with dual-phase three-dimensional MR angiography (MRA) in the prediction of vascular involvement and resectability of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma.116 patients with proven pancreatic adenocarcinoma underwent both MDCT and combined MR imaging prior to surgery. Of 116 patients, 56 who underwent surgery were included. Two radiologists independently attempt to assess detectability, vascular involvement and resectability of pancreatic adenocarcinoma on both images. Results were compared with surgical findings and statistical analysis was performed.MDCT detected pancreatic mass in 45 of 56 patients (80.3%) and MR imaging in 44 patients (78.6%). In assessment of vascular involvement, sensitivities and specificities of MDCT were 61% and 96% on a vessel-by-vessel basis, respectively. Those of MR imaging were 57% and 98%, respectively. In determining resectability, sensitivities and specificities of MDCT were 90% and 65%, respectively. Those of MR imaging were 90% and 41%, respectively. There was no statistical difference in detecting tumor, assessing vascular involvement and determining resectability between MDCT and MR imaging (p=0.5).MDCT and MR imaging with MRA demonstrated an equal ability in detection, predicting vascular involvement, and determining resectability for a pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma.Preoperative local MRI-staging of patients with a suspected pancreatic mass.The aim of this study was to define the value of MRI of the pancreas for preoperative local staging of patients with a suspected pancreatic mass. Ninety-four patients (41 women, 53 men; age range 32-87 years) with a suspected pancreatic tumor underwent preoperative staging with MRI on a 1.5-T system. The MRI protocol included breath-hold MR cholangiopancreatography in turbo spin-echo technique, biphasic contrast-enhanced 3D MR angiography, and MRI of the upper abdomen with breath-hold T2-weighted half-Fourier acquired single-shot turbo spin-echo and T1-weighted fast-low-angle-shot (pre- and postcontrast) sequences. Data were collected prospectively and analyzed by two radiologists in agreement modality. Evaluation criteria were vascular involvement, resectability, and a characterization benign vs malignant. Results were compared to histopathology in 78 patients. Sixteen patients were followed-up. In 74 of 94 patients a solid tumor or an inflammation of the pancreas ( n=62) or the papilla ( n=12) was detected. In this group, MRI had a sensitivity of 98%, a specificity of 92%, and an accuracy of 96% in the characterization of malignant tumors. Regarding only the solid tumors, the positive predictive value of MRI was 87% with respect to resectability. Other pathologic findings included adenoma or inflammation of the duodenum ( n=5), carcinoma or benign stenosis of the choledochus duct ( n=7) and carcinoma of the gall bladder ( n=2). In 6 patients MRI did not depict any pathologic findings, and follow-up confirmed this interpretation. Magnetic resonance imaging allows a local preoperative staging in patients with suspected pancreatic tumor. Limitations, however, concern to the diagnostics of peritoneal and/or liver metastases.Vascular invasion in pancreatic cancer: predictive values for endoscopic ultrasound and computed tomography imaging.To evaluate the accuracy of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) to determine vascular invasion in patients with pancreatic cancer.Data were obtained prospectively from patients with a pancreatic lesion who underwent EUS, computed tomographic (CT) imaging, and surgery from March 2005 to March 2010.Fifty patients were included with a mean ± SD age 61 ± 11.5 years; 27 (54%) were women. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value for EUS were the following: 61.1 (95% CI, 38.6-79.7), 90.3 (95% CI, 75.1-96.7), 78.6 (95% CI, 52.4-92.4), and 80 (95% CI, 64.1-90), respectively. The area under the curve for EUS and that for CT were 0.80 (95% CI, 0.68-0.92) and 0.74 (95% CI, 0.61-0.86), respectively. The positive predictive value for arterial invasion was 100% (95% CI, 61-100) for EUS and 60% (95% CI, 31.3-83.2) for CT. There were no complications associated with the EUS or the CT.Endoscopic US is a very good option to detect vascular invasion in patients with pancreatic cancer and is especially sensitive for arterial invasion. When it is available, we recommend that it be performed in addition to CT staging.Comparison of diffusion-weighted MR imaging and multidetector-row CT in the detection of liver metastases in patients operated for pancreatic cancer.The purpose of this study is to determine the value of diffusion-weighted MR imaging (DWI) in the detection of liver metastases in patients with pancreatic tumors when compared to multidetector-row CT (MDCT).DWI and MDCT were performed in 31 consecutive patients with newly diagnosed, potentially resectable pancreatic tumors. CT images were obtained in the arterial and the portal venous phase. For DWI, a respiratory-triggered single-shot echo-planar imaging sequence (b values: 0, 300, and 600 s/mm(2)) was acquired. Images were analyzed in consensus by two radiologists blinded to the clinical data. Imaging results were correlated with intraoperative surgical and ultrasound findings as well as with results of histopathologic analysis and imaging follow-up.Sensitivity and specificity in detecting liver metastases were 53.3% and 77.8% for MDCT and 86.7% and 97.5% for DWI, respectively. In our study population DWI would have changed the therapeutic management in 4 out of 31 patients (12.9%) when compared to MDCT.In the present pilot study, DWI performed significantly better than MDCT in the detection of liver metastases in patients with pancreatic tumors. Therefore, DWI may help to optimize therapeutic management in those patients in the future.Cross-modality PET/CT and contrast-enhanced CT imaging for pancreatic cancer.To explore the diagnostic value of the cross-modality fusion images provided by positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) and contrast-enhanced CT (CECT) for pancreatic cancer (PC).Data from 70 patients with pancreatic lesions who underwent CECT and PET/CT examinations at our hospital from August 2010 to October 2012 were analyzed. PET/CECT for the cross-modality image fusion was obtained using TureD software. The diagnostic efficiencies of PET/CT, CECT and PET/CECT were calculated and compared with each other using a χ(2) test. P < 0.05 was considered to indicate statistical significance.Of the total 70 patients, 50 had PC and 20 had benign lesions. The differences in the sensitivity, negative predictive value (NPV), and accuracy between CECT and PET/CECT in detecting PC were statistically significant (P < 0.05 for each). In 15 of the 31 patients with PC who underwent a surgical operation, peripancreatic vessel invasion was verified. The differences in the sensitivity, positive predictive value, NPV, and accuracy of CECT vs PET/CT and PET/CECT vs PET/CT in diagnosing peripancreatic vessel invasion were statistically significant (P < 0.05 for each). In 19 of the 31 patients with PC who underwent a surgical operation, regional lymph node metastasis was verified by postsurgical histology. There was no statistically significant difference among the three methods in detecting regional lymph node metastasis (P > 0.05 for each). In 17 of the 50 patients with PC confirmed by histology or clinical follow-up, distant metastasis was confirmed. The differences in the sensitivity and NPV between CECT and PET/CECT in detecting distant metastasis were statistically significant (P < 0.05 for each).Cross-modality image fusion of PET/CT and CECT is a convenient and effective method that can be used to diagnose and stage PC, compensating for the defects of PET/CT and CECT when they are conducted individually.Is endosonography an effective method for detection and local staging of the ampullary carcinoma? A prospective study.The relatively rare carcinoma of the ampulla of Vater is a neoplasia with a good prognosis compared to pancreatic cancer. Preoperative staging is important in planning the most suitable surgical intervention.To prospectively evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of Endoscopic Ultrasonography (EUS) in comparison with conventional US and CT scan, in staging of patients with ampullary carcinoma.20 patients (7 women and 13 men) with histologically proven carcinoma of the ampulla of Vater were assessed by EUS, CT scan and US. Results were compared to surgical findings.Endoscopic biopsies were diagnostic in 76% of the patients. Detection of ampullary cancer with US and CT scan was 15% and 20% respectively. Only indirect signs of the disease were identified in the majority of cases using these methods. Overall accuracy of EUS in detection of ampullary tumours was 100%. The EUS was significantly (p < 0.001) superior than US and CT scan in ampullary carcinoma detection. Tumour size, tumour extension and the existence of metastatic lymph nodes were also identified and EUS proved to be very useful for the preoperative classification both for the T and the N components of the TNM staging of this neoplasia. The diagnostic accuracy for tumour extension (T) was 82% and for detection of metastatic lymph nodes (N) was 71%.EUS is more accurate in detecting ampullary cancer than US and CT scan. Tumor extension and locally metastatic lymph nodes are more accurately assessed by means of EUS than with other imaging methods.[Comparison of MRI manifestations and histopathologic findings in pancreatic head carcinoma in vivo ex vivo].To prospectively analyze the correlation of MRI image characteristics with histopathological findings in pancreatic head carcinoma in vivo and ex vivo.Sixteen patients with pancreatic head carcinoma were examined by 1.5T MRI. MR sequences included pre-and post-contrast dynamic 2D FLASH T1WI, TSE T2WI + fat suppressed (FS). All fresh specimens were scanned again within an hour after resection during the Whipple procedure, and were then cut into slices along the direction of MRI scan. The MRI image characteristics were compared with gross and histopathologic findings of the specimens.The tumor size ranged from 1.5 cm x 2.0 cm to 4.8 cm x 4.2 cm with a mean value of 3.6 cm x 3.1 cm. The MRI findings in vivo showed hypointensity in 14 lesions and isointensity in 2, and on 2D FLASH T1WI and TSE T2WI, all lesions displayed mixed intensity except 3 lesions with iso-intensity. During post-contrast dynamic pancreatic parenchymal phase, 15 lesions showed mild enhancement and 11 lesions had ring enhancement sign. Nine lesions displayed progressive irregular moderate enhancement during post-contrast dynamic hepatic phase. Four lesions showed enhancement with iso- and hyperintensity in post-contrast dynamic delayed phase. The MRI findings demonstrated that all lesions ex vivo had hypointensity on 2D FLASH T1 WI and mixed intensity on TSE T2WI + FS. Tumor tissues mainly displayed hypointensity, and the area containing tumor and inflammatory tissue showed iso-intensity on 2D FLASH T1WI. On T2WI + FS, the fibrosis proportion displayed hypo or isointensity, while the tumor and chronic inflammatory tissue demonstrated slight hyperintensity, and the zones of mucous degeneration or pancreatic ductal dilatation displayed hyper-intensity. The ring enhancement of tumor was caused by multiple factors and no obvious enhancement within tumor and fibrosis area were observed during post-contrast dynamic pancreatic parenchymal phase. Progressive irregular enhancement originated from desmoplastic reaction within the tumor during post-contrast dynamic hepatic phase and delayed phase, respectively.Pancreatic head carcinomas contain various kinds of tissues. MRI can reveal these pathologic characteristics. No obvious hemorrhage and necrosis within the tumor were observed in this series.Contrast-enhanced 18F-FDG PET/CT: 1-stop-shop imaging for assessing the resectability of pancreatic cancer.Patients with pancreatic cancer continue to have a poor prognosis, with a 5-y survival rate of less than 5%. Surgery is the only treatment that offers a potential cure. Determining resectability is the principal goal of staging in pancreatic cancer patients. Our objective was to evaluate the value of combined contrast-enhanced (18)F-FDG PET/CT in assessing the resectability of pancreatic cancer and to compare enhanced PET/CT with the performance of PET alone and unenhanced PET/CT.Fifty patients (25 women and 25 men; mean age, 64.3 y; range, 39-84 y) with biopsy-proven pancreatic adenocarcinoma underwent enhanced (18)F-FDG PET/CT for the evaluation of resectability. Criteria for unresectability were distant metastases, peritoneal carcinomatosis, arterial infiltration, or invasion of neighboring organs other than the duodenum. The performance of enhanced PET/CT regarding resectability was compared with that of PET alone and unenhanced PET/CT. Histology, intraoperative findings, and follow-up CT with clinical investigations were used as the reference standard.According to the reference standard, 27 patients had disease that was not resectable because of distant metastases (n=17), peritoneal carcinomatosis (n=5), or local infiltration (n=5). In the assessment of resectability, PET alone had a sensitivity of 100%, specificity of 44%, accuracy of 70%, positive predictive value of 61%, and negative predictive value of 100%; unenhanced PET/CT had respective values of 100%, 56%, 76%, 66%, and 100%; and enhanced PET/CT, 96%, 82%, 88%, 82%, and 96%. In 5 patients, unresectability was missed by all imaging methods and was diagnosed intraoperatively. Enhanced PET/CT was significantly superior to PET alone (P=0.035), and there was a trend for enhanced PET/CT to be superior to unenhanced PET/CT (P=0.070).The use of enhanced PET/CT as a 1-stop-shop imaging protocol for assessing the resectability of pancreatic cancer is feasible and accurate. Enhanced PET/CT is significantly superior to PET alone.Role of 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography imaging in surgery for pancreatic cancer.To evaluate the role of positron emission tomography using 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG-PET) in the surgical management of patients with pancreatic cancer, including the diagnosis, staging, and selection of patients for the subsequent surgical treatment.This study involved 53 patients with proven primary pancreatic cancer. The sensitivity of diagnosing the primary cancer was examined for FDG-PET, CT, cytological examination of the bile or pancreatic juice, and the serum levels of carcinoembrionic antigens (CEA) and carbohydrate antigen 19-9 (CA19-9). Next, the accuracy of staging was compared between FDG-PET and CT. Finally, FDG-PET was analyzed semiquantitatively using the standard uptake value (SUV). The impact of the SUV on patient management was evaluated by examining the correlations between the SUV and the histological findings of cancer.The sensitivity of FDG-PET, CT, cytological examination of the bile or pancreatic juice, and the serum levels of CEA and CA19-9 were 92.5%, 88.7%, 46.4%, 37.7% and 69.8%, respectively. In staging, FDG-PET was superior to CT only in diagnosing distant disease (bone metastasis). For local staging, the sensitivity of CT was better than that of FDG-PET. The SUV did not correlate with the pTNM stage, grades, invasions to the vessels and nerve, or with the size of the tumor. However, there was a statistically significant difference (4.6 +/- 2.9 vs 7.8 +/- 4.5, P = 0.024) in the SUV between patients with respectable and unresectable disease.FDG-PET is thus considered to be useful in the diagnosis of pancreatic cancer. However, regarding the staging of the disease, FDG-PET is not considered to be a sufficiently accurate diagnostic modality. Although the SUV does not correlate with the patho-histological prognostic factors, it may be useful in selecting patients who should undergo subsequent surgical treatment.Impact of 18-fluorodeoxyglucose positron emission tomography on the management of pancreatic cancer.We compared the usefulness of positron emission tomography with the glucose analogue 2-deoxy-2-[18F]-fluoro-D-glucose (FDG-PET) and multidetector-row computed tomography (MD-CT) in diagnosing pancreatic cancer and in determining the patients' suitability for surgery.We reviewed the clinical FDG-PET data of 103 consecutive pancreatic cancer patients between July 2004 and March 2009.The detection rates of pancreatic cancer by MD-CT (89%) and FDG-PET (91%) were similar. From the MD-CT findings, 38 patients were judged as operable, and 65, inoperable. Among the inoperable patients, noncurative factors (metastasis to the liver, peritoneum, remote lymph nodes, bones, and other organs and major arterial invasion) were detected by MD-CT and/or FDG-PET. Detection rates of liver metastasis and arterial invasion by FDG-PET were significantly inferior to those of MD-CT (neither was detected by FDG-PET alone). Remote lymph nodes and bone metastasis were detected in 20 lesions by FDG-PET alone; however, MD-CT indicated other noncurative factors in these patients. All 65 patients could be diagnosed as inoperable without FDG-PET.FDG-PET is not a suitable imaging modality for either diagnosis or preoperative treatment in pancreatic cancer patients. Since it is expensive, FDG-PET as a routine diagnostic tool in pancreatic cancer patients must be used with caution.The diagnostic accuracy and strength of agreement between endoscopic ultrasound and histopathology in the staging of ampullary tumors.Ampullary tumors are rare. Reports on ampullary tumor staging are heterogeneous and combine both periampullary and ampullary tumors. This study assessed the performance of endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) in the local staging of ampullary tumors only.Data were collected retrospectively. We included patients with an ampullary tumor who underwent EUS and surgical resection. Tumor (T) and nodal (N) TNM staging for EUS and histopathological (HP) staging were compared.From 2009 to 2010, a total of 79 patients with ampullary tumors were identified. Of these, 26 had both EUS and Whipple's surgery and were included (28 did not undergo resection, 13 had palliative surgery only and 12 had resection without EUS). For T staging by HP, there were 2 (7.7 %) T1, 11 (42.3 %) T2, 12 (46.2 %) T3 and 1 (3.8 %) T4 tumors. The accuracy of EUS T staging was 73.1 % with a Kappa value of 0.564 (p < 0.0001). The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), negative predictive values (NPV) of EUS, respectively were 50.0 %, 91.7 %, 33.3 % and 95.7 % for T1 tumors; 81.8 %, 80.0 %, 75.0 % and 85.7 % for T2; 75.0 %, 92.9 %, 90.0 % and 81.3 % for T3 tumors. For N staging by HP, 17 (65.4 %) were N0 and 9 (34.6 %) N1. The N staging diagnostic accuracy was 80.8 % with a Kappa value of 0.586 (p = 0.003). The sensitivity, specificity, PPV, NPV for N0 disease were 82.4 %, 77.8 %, 87.5 % and 70.0 %, respectively while for N1 they were 77.8 %, 82.4 %, 70.0 % and 87.5 %, respectively.EUS had a moderate strength of agreement with histopathology for both T and N staging, and a high diagnostic accuracy for nodal staging.Staging of ampullary and pancreatic carcinoma: comparison between endosonography and surgery.The aim of the study was to update our previously published data on the clinical TNM staging of ampullary and pancreatic carcinoma by endosonography.Endosonography was performed in 70 patients with pancreatic cancer and in 32 patients with ampullary carcinoma. TNM staging was carried out before surgery and compared with findings of histology and/or surgery.Endosonography was accurate in staging the depth of tumor invasion. Early-stage carcinomas could be distinguished from advanced cancers. Nonresectability was accurately assessed on the basis of vascular involvement using real-time ultrasound. Tumor compression due to peritumoral pancreatitis and direct tumor invasion into the base of the mesocolon could not be diagnosed by endosonography. The overall accuracy in tumor staging for pancreatic and ampullary carcinomas was 83.6% and 84.4%, respectively. Endosonography was accurate in diagnosing regional lymph node metastases but not accurate in defining nonmetastatic lymphadenopathy and distant metastases.Endosonography was accurate in staging tumor stage and lymph node metastases. Minimally invasive methods of resection for superficial ampullary cancers should be based on endosonography staging.Contrast-enhanced harmonic EUS with novel ultrasonographic contrast (Sonazoid) in the preoperative T-staging for pancreaticobiliary malignancies.Sonazoid is a new second-generation microbubble contrast for ultrasonography. In this pilot study, the diagnostic role of contrast-enhanced harmonic imaging endoscopic ultrasonography (CH-EUS) with Sonazoid was prospectively evaluated in preoperative T-staging of pancreaticobiliary malignancies.Patients with suspected pancreaticobiliary malignancies underwent CH-EUS by a single examiner. After the lesions were observed carefully with conventional harmonic imaging EUS (H-EUS), CH-EUS was performed with intravenous injection of Sonazoid. A reviewer who was blinded reviewed the recordings of H-EUS and CH-EUS and assessed the T-staging. The accuracy of H-EUS and CH-EUS for T-staging was compared to the results of surgical histopathology in patients who underwent surgery.Twenty-six patients underwent surgical resection and could be included in the study. The final diagnosis were pancreatic cancer in 11, bile duct cancer in 7, gallbladder cancer in 4 and ampullary cancer in 4. The overall accuracy of H-EUS and CH-EUS for T-staging were 69.2 (18/26) and 92.4% (24/26), respectively (p < 0.05). There were disagreement in six cases between H-EUS and CH-EUS. CH-EUS staged correctly in all of these six cases, whereas H-EUS misdiagnosed the depth of invasion in one case of gallbladder cancer and one case of ampullary cancer, and invasion of portal vein in two cases of pancreatic cancer and two cases of bile duct cancer.The depth of invasion of biliary cancer and vascular invasion of pancreatic and biliary cancer could be demonstrated more clearly with CH-EUS compared to H-EUS. CH-EUS has the potential to improve the diagnostic accuracy of preoperative T-staging of pancreaticobiliary malignancies.Assessment of resectability of pancreatic cancer with dynamic contrast-enhanced MR imaging: technique, surgical correlation and patient outcome.The aim of our work was to investigate the use of a dynamic contrast-enhanced MR (DCEMR) technique for staging apparently localised pancreatic cancer, and to determine the patterns of tumour and vascular enhancement with this technique. Thirty-five consecutive patients were examined. The MR findings were correlated with surgical findings in 13 patients and with clinical outcome in 22 patients. Breath-hold gradient-echo fast low angle shot (TR = 100, TE = 4, flip angle 80 degrees ) acquisitions were obtained at 10 and 40 s (right anterior coronal oblique plane) and at 90 s (axial plane) following intravenous gadolinium. Mean contrast-to-noise ratio was higher on the first than the second acquisition (p < 0. 001) and higher on the second acquisition than the third (p < 0.005). Tumour conspicuity was greatest and arterial anatomy was best demonstrated on the first acquisition and the portal venous anatomy on the second. Small tumours were isointense by the third acquisition. Maximal intensity projections were helpful. The MR findings correctly predicted the surgical findings in 11 of 13 cases (85 %) and the clinical course in the other 22 patients. The DCEMR imaging technique is valuable in the staging of patients with pancreatic cancer. Capillary and portal venous phase images are both required for complete local staging.[Comparison of multi-slice spiral CT and magnetic resonance imaging in evaluation of the un-resectability of blood vessels in pancreatic tumor].To compare the values of multi-slice spiral CT (MSCT) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in evaluating the un-resectability of blood vessels in pancreatic tumor.Images obtained from MSCT and MRI of pancreas in 14 patients with pancreatic cancer were retrospectively reviewed. MSCT scanning included arterial phase, pancreatic-portal phase, and delay-phase. MRI scanning included fat-suppressed T2WI, dual-echo T1WI, and fat-suppressed T1WI before and after injection of contrast (arterial phase, pancreatic-portal phase, delay-phase, and late delay phase). Seven patients received operations within two weeks after the examinations. The staging of peripancreatic blood vessels in MSCT and MRI images was evaluated and compared. The veracity of MSCT and MRI in assessing the un-resectability of peripancreatic blood vessels was calculated and compared according to the findings in operation.All the tumors were observed in MSCT and MRI images. Statistical difference existed in staging of peripancreatic blood vessels and in evaluating their un-resectability between MSCT and MR (P < 0.05). The sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value of the un-resectability assessed by MSCT were 77.8%, 95%, 91.8%, 77.8%, and 95%, respectively, and those assessed by MR were 66.7%, 90%, 85.7%, 60%, and 92.3%, respectively.Dynamic MSCT is better than dynamic MR to some extent in evaluating the un-resectability of peripancreatic blood vessels in pancreatic tumor.Clinical utility of endoscopic ultrasonography for pancreatic tumors.Staging of pancreatic carcinoma by endoscopic ultrasonography.The ability of EUS to diagnose small pancreatic cancer is well known. In this study, we present our experience with EUS in the local staging of 29 patients with pancreatic carcinoma who underwent surgery. EUS was 79, 83 and 79% accurate in determining anterior (including gastric), duodenal and retroperitoneal (vascular) invasion by the tumor. Ultrasonography (48, 39 and 55%, respectively) and CT (38, 33 and 41%, respectively) were less reliable. EUS was equal to angiography in diagnosing vascular involvement. EUS was more effective in detecting splenoportal infiltration (sensitivity 88%, specificity 78%) than arterial involvement (accuracy 50%). EUS was also less reliable in determining the N stage (66%) and in stage grouping (72%). Although EUS is superior to ultrasonography and CT in the local staging of pancreatic carcinoma, further studies must show whether improved staging criteria will lead to better results.Endoscopic ultrasonography in the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic adenocarcinoma. Results of a prospective study with comparison to ultrasonography and CT scan.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) was compared to ultrasonography (US) and CT scan (CT) in order to evaluate its role in the diagnosis and the locoregional spread assessment of pancreatic cancer. Sixty-four patients suspected of pancreatic cancer were studied prospectively, and the results of imaging techniques were compared to histology and surgical exploration. There were 49 cases of pancreatic adenocarcinoma, 11 of pancreatitis, 2 of common bile duct carcinoma, 1 lymphoma and 1 hepatocellular carcinoma with peripancreatic metastatic lymph nodes. EUS was significantly more accurate (91%) than CT (66%) and US (64%) for diagnosis of pancreatic cancer. EUS was able to image all 7 cancers less than 25 mm in diameter, US and CT only one. There were 4 false positives with EUS which were all cases of pseudotumorous pancreatitis. For detecting lymph node involvement, EUS was significantly more sensitive (62%) and accurate (74%) than US (8% and 37%) and CT (19% and 42%), respectively. Invaded lymph nodes adjacent to large tumors and micrometastatic involvement were responsible for this lack of sensitivity. EUS was significantly more sensitive (100%) than CT (71%) and US (17%) for detecting venous involvement. The specificity of EUS was lower (67%) because of duodenal bulb stenosis and large tumors. In conclusion, this prospective and comparative study confirms that EUS is an accurate tool for diagnosis and locoregional spread assessment of pancreatic cancer when performed in a reference center. EUS is of particular interest for small tumours. However, EUS does not enable differentiation of pseudotumorous pancreatitis from adenocarcinoma.Comparison of multidetector CT and endoscopic ultrasonography in malignant pancreatic mass lesions.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) has been shown to be superior to conventional CT in detecting and staging pancreatic cancer. We conducted a prospective trial to compare EUS and MDCT, in discriminating benign/malignant, in determining local and vascular invasion of a suspected pancreatic cancer and deciding its resectability.The study was performed at the Gastroenterology Department of Izmir Ataturk Training and Research Hospital, from June 2009 to June 2010, all patients with suspected pancreatic and periampullary tumors referred to our department were enrolled. A total of 56 patients were evaluated at the beginning. Five patients having distal CBD tumor (n=2), gallbladder tumor (n=1) and papillary tumor (n=2) were excluded from the study. Analysis was done for the remaining 51 patients.For the diagnosis of resectability/unresectability, EUS alone demonstrated a definite role in 4 (9%) of the 43 patients in confirming surgical and pathologic results and MDCT alone demonstrated a definite role in 6 (14%) of the 43 patients in confirming their results. An accurate diagnostic decision regarding resectability/unresectability was accomplished in 27 (63%) patients with EUS and MDCT.While MDCT is clinically quite effective, in terms of a correct resectability/unresectability decision, EUS should also be used.Value of helical computed tomography, angiography, and endoscopic ultrasound in determining resectability of periampullary carcinoma.High-quality preoperative radiographic evaluation is crucial in selecting patients with periampullary carcinomas who are candidates for surgical exploration and tumor resection while minimizing the rate of unnecessary laparotomy.Twenty-one consecutive patients were prospectively investigated using helical computed tomography (CT) scanning, endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS), and selective visceral angiography (SVA) to determine tumor resectability. All patients were explored and resectability determined.Helical CT had a sensitivity of 63%, a specificity of 100%, and an overall accuracy of 86%. EUS had a sensitivity of 75%, a specificity of 77%, and an overall accuracy of 76%. SVA had a sensitivity of 38%, a specificity of 92%, and an overall accuracy of 71%.Helical CT scanning is the best preoperative imaging test to determine tumor resectability. EUS is more sensitive than CT for tumor detection, but underestimates resectability. SVA is no longer helpful in the preoperative evaluation of these malignancies.Diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer: comparison of mangafodipir trisodium-enhanced MR imaging and contrast-enhanced helical hydro-CT.The purpose of this study was to compare mangafodipir trisodium-enhanced MR imaging performed with a phased array coil and contrast-enhanced single-detector helical CT for accuracy in the detection and local staging of pancreatic adenocarcinoma and in the differentiation between cancer and focal pancreatitis.Forty-two patients with suspected pancreatic masses underwent contrast-enhanced helical CT and mangafodipir trisodium-enhanced MR imaging at 1.5 T. The images were assessed for the presence or absence of tumors; characterization of masses; and presence of vascular invasion, lymph node metastases, or liver metastases. Imaging findings were correlated with findings at laparotomy, laparoscopy, biopsy, or follow-up.Focal masses were present in 36 patients (cancer, n = 26; focal pancreatitis, n = 7; other, n = 3). The sensitivity for lesion detection of MR imaging was 100% and of CT, 94%. Two small malignant lesions were missed on CT. For the diagnosis of tumor nonresectability, the sensitivity of MR imaging and CT was 90% and 80%, respectively. Liver metastases were missed on MR imaging in one of the eight patients and on CT in four. For differentiation between adenocarcinoma and nonadenocarcinoma, the sensitivity of MR imaging was 100% (positive predictive value, 90%; negative predictive value, 100%), and the sensitivity of CT was 92% (positive predictive value, 80%; negative predictive value, 67%). Receiver operating characteristic analysis revealed that the mean area under the curve for MR imaging was 0.920 and for CT, 0.832 (not significant).Mangafodipir trisodium-enhanced MR imaging is as accurate as contrast-enhanced helical CT for the detection and staging of pancreatic cancer but offers improved detection of small pancreatic metastases and of liver metastases compared with CT.Performance characteristics of EUS for locoregional evaluation of ampullary lesions.The accuracy of EUS in the locoregional assessment of ampullary lesions is unclear.To compare EUS with ERCP and surgical pathology for the evaluation of intraductal extension and local staging of ampullary lesions.Retrospective cohort study.Tertiary-care referral center.All patients who underwent EUS primarily for the evaluation of an ampullary lesion between 1998 and 2012.EUS.Comparison of EUS sensitivity/specificity for intraductal and local extension with ERCP and surgical pathology by using the area under the receiver-operating characteristic (AUROC) curves and outcomes of the subgroup referred for endoscopic papillectomy.We identified 119 patients who underwent EUS for an ampullary lesion, of whom 99 (83%) had an adenoma or adenocarcinoma. Compared with ERCP (n = 90), the sensitivity/specificity of EUS for any intraductal extension was 56%/97% (AUROC = 0.77; 95% confidence interval [CI], 0.64-0.89). However, when using surgical pathology as the reference (n = 102), the sensitivity/specificity of EUS (80%/93%; AUROC = 0.87; 95% CI, 0.76-0.97) and ERCP (83%/93%; AUROC = 0.88; 95% CI, 0.77-0.99) were comparable. The overall accuracy of EUS for local staging was 90%. Of 58 patients referred for endoscopic papillectomy, complete resection was achieved in 53 (91%); in those having intraductal extension by EUS or ERCP, complete resection was achieved in 4 of 5 (80%) and 4 of 7 (57%), respectively.Retrospective design.EUS and ERCP perform similarly in evaluating intraductal extension of ampullary adenomas. Additionally, EUS is accurate in T-staging ampullary adenocarcinomas. Future prospective studies should evaluate whether EUS can identify characteristics of ampullary lesions that appropriately direct patients to endoscopic or surgical resection.Preoperative evaluation of periampullary tumors by endoscopic sonography, transabdominal sonography, and computed tomography.The purpose of this retrospective study was to compare the sensitivity of endoscopic sonography (EUS), transabdominal sonography (US), and CT in the detection of, local staging of, and prediction of vascular involvement by or distant metastasis from periampullary tumors.Seventy-four consecutive patients with presumed periampullary tumors were evaluated by EUS, US, and CT during a 3.25-year period. The local staging accuracy of the modalities was assessed in the 36 patients with solid tumors who underwent surgery. The sensitivity of the modalities in predicting vascular involvement and distant metastasis was assessed in the 56 patients with carcinomas.EUS was the most sensitive modality in the detection (EUS, 97%; US, 24%; and CT, 39%; p < 0.001 for EUS versus US or CT) and T classification (EUS, 72%; US, 11%; CT, 22%; p < 0.001 for EUS versus US or CT) of periampullary tumors. EUS also had better sensitivity than US in detecting lymph node metastasis from periampullary cancers (EUS, 47%; US, 7%; and CT, 33%; p = 0.02 for EUS versus US; p = 0.7 for EUS versus CT). The accuracy of EUS in determining the T classification (without stent, 81%; with stent, 65%) and N classification (without stent, 80%; with stent, 70%) tended to decrease in the presence of an endobiliary stent, but the differences were not significant. EUS was the most sensitive modality in demonstrating vascular involvement (EUS, 100%; US, 0%; and CT, 33%; p = 0.002 for EUS versus US; p = 0.03 for EUS versus CT) but was not significantly different in detecting distant metastasis (EUS, 11%; US, 44%; and CT, 44%).EUS is superior to US and CT in the local assessment of periampullary tumors. The staging accuracy of EUS is minimally but not significantly affected by the presence of an endobiliary stent.Identification and staging of pancreatic tumours using computed tomography, endoscopic ultrasound and mangafodipir trisodium-enhanced magnetic resonance imaging.Pancreatic malignancy can be staged by a number of different investigations, either alone or in combination. The purpose of the present study was to compare the use of endoscopic ultrasound, CT and mangafodipir trisodium-enhanced MRI for the staging of pancreatic malignancy, particularly with respect to determining resectability prior to surgery. Twenty-seven patients referred for the investigation of a suspected pancreatic malignancy were entered into the trial. All patients had contrast-enhanced CT, gadolinium and mangafodipir trisodium-enhanced MRI, and endoscopic ultrasound (EUS). Images were assessed for nodal staging, tumour staging and resectability for each investigation, and the results compared with findings at surgery. The results for the accuracy of MRI, CT and EUS, in detecting T4 disease versus T3 or lower was 78, 79 and 68%, respectively; nodal involvement was 56, 63 and 69%, respectively; and overall resectability (including the T stage, presence of involved nodes and metastases) was 83, 76 and 63%, respectively. There was no significant difference demonstrated between the three tests. The present study suggests that for patients referred for investigation and staging of pancreatic malignancy, EUS and MRI scanning convey little advantage over contrast-enhanced CT. Furthermore, although mangafodipir trisodium improved the conspicuity of pancreatic tumours, it has little influence on T staging.Impact of F18-fluorodeoxyglycose positron emission tomography/computed tomography on the management of resectable pancreatic tumours.Positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) using F18-fluorodeoxyglucose has been shown to be valuable in the management of malignant disease. The aim of this study is to investigate the impact of this technique on the management of patients with resectable pancreatic tumours.Thirty-six patients with 37 potentially resectable pancreatic tumours on diagnostic CT imaging underwent PET/CT scans. Operative findings, histological reports and/or clinical follow-up served as standard of reference. The impact of PET/CT on patient management was estimated by calculating the percentage of patients whose treatment plan was altered due to PET/CT.Pancreatic adenocarcinoma was diagnosed in 30 patients, neuroendocrine tumours in 3, mass-forming pancreatitis in 3 and serous cystadenoma in 1. The median standard uptake (max) value was 5.0 (range 2.2-12.0). Sensitivity and specificity of detecting extrapancreatic metastatic disease were 73% and 100%, respectively. Three occult liver metastases were detected at laparotomy following negative PET/CT. PET/CT findings influenced the management of 8 (22%) patients - 3 with liver metastases, 3 with bone metastases, 1 with lymph node metastases and 1 by identifying the benign appearance of the pancreatic tumour.PET/CT achieves a significant diagnostic impact in detecting extrapancreatic metastatic disease. F18-fluorodeoxyglucose PET/CT appears to be useful in assessing suspicious pancreatic masses.Comparison of endoscopic ultrasonography and multidetector computed tomography for detecting and staging pancreatic cancer.Accurate preoperative detection and staging of pancreatic cancer may identify patients with locoregional disease that is amenable to surgical resection.To compare endoscopic ultrasonography and multidetector computed tomography (CT) for the detection, staging, and resectability of known or suspected locoregional pancreatic cancer.Prospective, observational, cohort study.Single, tertiary referral hospital in Indianapolis, Indiana.120 participants with known or suspected locoregional pancreatic cancer.Endoscopic ultrasonography followed by multidetector CT was performed in all patients. Patients with known or suspected pancreatic cancer deemed potentially resectable by 1 or both tests were considered for surgery.Detection, staging, and resectability of pancreatic cancer. Surgically resected pancreatic cancer with negative microscopic histologic margins was considered resectable.Of 120 patients enrolled, 104 (87%) underwent endoscopic ultrasonography and CT. Of the 80 patients with pancreatic cancer, 27 (34%) were managed nonoperatively, and 53 (66%) treated surgically had resectable (n = 25) or unresectable (n = 28) cancer. For the 80 patients with cancer, the sensitivity of endoscopic ultrasonography (98% [95% CI, 91% to 100%]) for detecting a pancreatic mass was greater than that of CT (86% [CI, 77% to 93%]; P = 0.012). For the 53 surgical patients, endoscopic ultrasonography was superior to CT for tumor staging accuracy (67% vs. 41%; P < 0.001) but equivalent for nodal staging accuracy (44% vs. 47%; P > 0.2). Of the 25 resectable pancreatic tumors in patients recommended for surgery, endoscopic ultrasonography and CT correctly identified 88% and 92%, respectively, as resectable. Of the 28 unresectable pancreatic tumors in patients recommended for surgery, endoscopic ultrasonography and CT correctly identified 68% and 64%, respectively, as unresectable.Radiologists who read the scans and endosonographers were not blinded to previous radiographic information. Because of the modest sample size, CIs of the sensitivity estimates were sometimes wide.Compared with multidetector CT, endoscopic ultrasonography is superior for tumor detection and staging but similar for nodal staging and resectability of preoperatively suspected nonmetastatic pancreatic cancer.Preoperative staging of periampullar cancer with US, CT, EUS and CA 19-9.Several diagnostic methods are available for preoperative staging of periampullary cancers. It happens that on the basis of preoperative findings the patient is prepared for radical surgery, but during the operation the lesion turns out to be unresectable.We studied 43 patients operated on for periampullary cancer. Preoperatively, all patients were evaluated by ultrasonography, computed tomography, endoscopic ultrasonography and the level of carbohydrate antigen 19-9 was assessed. Statistical parameters were calculated and compared.Endoscopic ultrasonography has specificity of 70.8% and positive predictive value regarding tumor resectability 55.8%. Computed tomography has a specificity of 45.8% and carbohydrate antigen 19-9 of 66.7%. Positive predictive value for computed tomography and carbohydrate antigen 19-9 is 40.6% and 52.6%, respectively. Ultrasonography is the least accurate method with specificity of 12.5% and positive predictive value 29.7%. A combined use of different diagnostic methods has higher positive predictive value, highest (65.1%) being found for the combination of endoscopic ultrasonography and carbohydrate antigen 19-9. Statistical tests showed statistically significant differences between diagnostic methods.Among the diagnostic methods studied, endoscopic ultrasonography showed the highest accuracy in predicting tumor resectability. The use of either endoscopic ultrasonography and carbohydrate antigen 19-9 or computed tomography and carbohydrate antigen 19-9 is accurate enough for assessing tumor resectability.[Retroactive evaluation of perioperative staging and surgical decision making for patients with pancreatic cancer].[The endosonographic staging of pancreatic carcinoma].Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS), conventional ultrasound (US), computed tomography (CT) and angiography were compared in their assessment of local resectability in 35 consecutive patients (19 men, 16 women; mean age 49.8 [42-821] years) with non-metastatic carcinoma of the pancreas. The findings were made prospectively and independently of each other. EUS proved to be superior to transabdominal US and to CT in the diagnosis of tumour infiltration of the portal and splenic veins. For the portal vein the sensitivity was 93% by EUS, 14% by US and 36% by CT. Corresponding figures for the splenic vein were 92%, 39% and 69%. EUS was markedly superior to angiography in the diagnosis of portal vein involvement (sensitivity of 93% and 36%, respectively), but the two methods had similar sensitivity regarding splenic vein infiltration (92 and 100%). Tumour involvement of the coeliac trunk was diagnosed with higher sensitivity angiographically (86%) than by EUS (57%), CT (71%) or US (29%). Regarding T and N staging, EUS was superior to both US and CT. These data indicate that EUS is the most accurate method for local tumour staging of potentially resectable pancreatic carcinoma. It can replace angiography in the diagnosis of portal vein infiltration.3DFT-flash MR imaging of pancreatic cancer with gadopentetate dimeglumine.We evaluated the usefulness of dynamic 3-dimensional Fourier transformation (3DFT) fast low angle shot (FLASH) MR imaging using gadopentetate dimeglumine (Gd-DTPA) to assess the extent of pancreatic cancer.Breath-hold 3DFT-FLASH MR images (20/4; 25 degrees flip angle; 7 partitions; 3-5-mm slice thickness) were obtained before the ++administration of 0.1 mmol/kg of Gd-DTPA, just after (early phase), and 1 and 2 min (late phases) after in 14 patients with pancreatic cancer. All patients underwent surgical removal or laparotomy. We compared the findings of T1-, T2-, and postcontrast T1-weighted spin-echo (conventional SE) and 3DFT-FLASH imaging with histologic or surgical findings.Dynamic MR images could delineate the pancreatic tumors more clearly than the conventional SE images, and were useful for diagnosing vessel invasion. The contrast-to-noise ratio between the pancreatic cancer and the surrounding pancreatic parenchyma was significantly higher with the dynamic 3DFT-FLASH image than with the conventional SE images (p<0.01).Dynamic 3DFT-FLASH MR imaging with Gd-DTPA is useful in delineating and evaluating the extent of pancreatic cancer.Contribution of PET in the detection of liver metastases from pancreatic tumours.Although uptake of 2-deoxy-2-[fluorine-18]fluoro-D-glucose (FDG) in the liver is basically high, metastatic liver tumours are known to be positive on positron emission tomography (PET). The purpose of this study is to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of FDG-PET in detecting hepatic metastases from pancreatic cancer.Thirty-four patients with histologically proven malignant tumours of the pancreas underwent FDG-PET, computed tomography (CT) and transabdominal ultrasound (US). The findings of PET, CT and US were compared with the histopathologic findings at surgery or with clinical follow-up and the diagnostic accuracy of PET was evaluated.PET showed 28 regions of high FDG uptake (SUV = 3.3-9.1) in 13 patients. Twenty-six foci were metastatic lesions confirmed by surgery (n = 11), clinical follow-up (n = 10) or autopsy (n = 5). FDG-PET accurately differentiated seven metastatic lesions from cysts when the diagnosis by US or CT was unreliable because of the small size of the lesion. In two patients who had areas of high uptake in the liver, no metastases were detected by surgery. FDG-PET showed no areas of increased uptake in 21 patients. Surgery revealed no metastatic lesions in the liver in 20 of 21 patients, but a liver metastasis was found at surgery in one patient. The diagnostic accuracy of FDG-PET was 90%, which was comparable with that of US or CT.Our data suggest that PET is reliable in detecting liver, metastases from pancreatic cancer.Staging of pancreatic and ampullary carcinoma by endoscopic ultrasonography. Comparison with conventional sonography, computed tomography, and angiography.In a prospective study, endoscopic ultrasonography was compared with transabdominal ultrasonography, computed tomography, and angiography in 60 consecutive patients with pancreatic (n = 46) and ampullary (n = 14) cancer considered to be candidates for surgery. The diagnostic value of these imaging procedures in determining local resectability was assessed. The diagnosis of ampullopancreatic malignancy was made by operation (n = 40) or puncture/biopsy (n = 20). In the 40 patients who underwent surgery, endoscopic ultrasonography was significantly superior to abdominal ultrasonography and computed tomography in determining tumor size and extent and lymph node metastases of pancreatic and ampullary cancer. Furthermore, involvement of the portal venous system as judged by histopathology or surgical exploration was correctly assessed by endoscopic ultrasonography in 95%, whereas angiography (85%), computed tomography (75%) and abdominal ultrasonography (55%) were less sensitive. Of 11 cases of portal venous infiltration found at surgery, endoscopic ultrasonography correctly predicted 10, abdominal ultrasonography only 1, computed tomography 4, and angiography 5 (P less than 0.05 for all three comparisons). Twenty patients did not undergo surgery for different reasons: of those, 9 patients were excluded from operation because of portal venous involvement as shown by angiography. Endoscopic ultrasonography detected portal venous invasion in all these cases. In contrast to the venous system, arterial encasement was less reliably detected by endoscopic ultrasonography. In conclusion, endoscopic ultrasonography is the most effective single imaging procedure for local tumor staging in pancreatic and ampullary cancer. Thus, endoscopic ultrasonography will improve the assessment of tumor resectability and further decrease the need for explorative laparotomy.[Prospective comparison of ultrasonography, helical computed tomography, magnetic resonance imaging, and endoscopic ultrasonography in assessing locoregional invasion of primary pancreatic carcinoma].To evaluate prospectively the efficacy and clinical significance of ultrasonography (US), helical computed tomography (HCT), endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in assessing locoregional invasion to the surrounding tissue or organs of primary pancreatic carcinoma.Sixty-eight consecutive patients with pancreatic carcinoma underwent US, HCT, EUS and MRI examinations before surgical exploration. All imaging results in terms of tumor size and locoregional invasion were assessed separately by two diagnostic radiologists and compared with the surgical and pathological findings.Among the HCT, US, EUS and MRI examinations, EUS had the highest accuracy in assessing tumor size with a regression coefficient for the maximal and minimal diameter of 1.0250 (P = 0.0426) and 0.9873 (P < 0.0001), respectively. In the assessment of locoregional invasion to the surrounding tissue or organs, EUS also had the highest accuracy (75.8%) and sensitivity (80.0%), but MRI had the highest positive predicting value (97.4%). None of these four imaging techniques was significantly correlated with the surgical findings when analyzed by univariate logistic regression.Endoscopic ultrasonography may be the most useful imaging technique in assessing tumor size, but for assessing loco-regional invasion of primary pancreatic carcinoma, combination of more than one imaging techniques may be necessary.Radial endoscopic ultrasound and spiral computed tomography in the diagnosis and staging of periampullary tumors.The early detection and accurate staging of pancreatic and ampullary cancer is of utmost importance for the achievement of surgical radical treatment. The aim of this study was to assess prospectively the role of endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in detection and staging of pancreatic and ampullary cancer, comparing its results to those obtained with spiral computed tomography (SCT).Sixty-one patients with suspected pancreatic and ampullary tumors were included, 46 (75, 4%) of whom presented with obstructive jaundice. Patients underwent EUS and SCT within a 7-day period. Examiners were unaware of the previous imaging results, except conventional echography. Image interpretation was compared to surgical and histopathological findings.Fifty-six (91, 8%) patients were surgically explored. Clinical follow-up and/or tissue diagnosis determined the correct diagnosis in the remaining five patients. Pancreatic cancer and ampullary cancer were observed in 29 (47, 6%) and 10 (16, 4%) patients, respectively. Chronic pancreatitis and choledocholithiasis were the most common diagnosis in patients with non-neoplastic disease. EUS was more effective than SCT for the definition of the final diagnosis in patients with obstructive jaundice (87.0 vs. 67.4%, p = 0.04). Both exams were equally effective for detecting pancreatic cancer but EUS predicted more accurately the involvement of portal-mesenteric axis by the tumor (87.0 vs. 67.4%, p = 0.04). EUS was particularly useful in the diagnosis of cancer of papilla of Vater.In patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma without unequivocal signs of distant metastatic disease, EUS is more accurate than SCT to predict venous involvement by the tumor. EUS is superior to SCT to detect ampullary adenocarcinoma. Both methods are equally ineffective to detect nodal involvement in pancreatic and ampullary cancer.Role of EUS in the management of pancreatic and ampullary carcinoma: a prospective study assessing resectability and prognosis.Endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is highly accurate for the staging of tumors, but its role in the management of periampullary carcinoma is still being defined.Seventy-nine patients with pancreatic (n = 73) or ampullary (n = 6) carcinoma underwent prospective evaluation by means of assessment of resectability and survival according to the following three-step staging algorithm: (1) ultrasonography and computed tomography; (2) if tumor appears resectable, EUS; (3) if criteria of resectability are found at EUS, laparotomy for curative resection.The first step of the algorithm helped predict unresectability of tumors and need for palliative treatment for 36 patients. Among the other 43 patients EUS revealed signs of unresectability in 20 additional patients who then underwent palliative surgical or medical treatment (median survival time 7 to 8 months). Twenty-three carcinomas were considered resectable according to EUS findings: Palliative surgery was performed in 9 cases (survival time 6 months), and 14 tumors could be resected in a curative way with a median survival period of 15 (pancreatic) to 16 months (ampullary). In evaluation of resectability, EUS had a 50% sensitivity (positive examination), 100% specificity, 100% positive predictive value, 61% negative predictive value, and 72% accuracy.EUS is accurate for evaluating resectability of ampullary and pancreatic cancer. EUS staging can prevent unnecessary surgery, and the findings correlate well with prognosis. The management of ampullary and pancreatic cancer could be improved with EUS.Diagnosis and staging of pancreatic cancer by endoscopic ultrasound.The aim of this study was to evaluate the usefulness of and problems associated with endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in the diagnosis and pre-operative staging of pancreatic cancer. 96 patients suspected of having pancreatic cancer were pre-operatively examined with EUS. 37 of these 96 patients had pancreatic cancer. Results of the EUS imaging were compared with findings of histology and/or surgery, and the patient's clinical course. The sensitivity and specificity of EUS for diagnosing pancreatic cancer were 89% and 97%, respectively. EUS had excellent sensitivity regardless of tumour size or location. EUS was accurate (90%) in determining tumour size in pancreatic cancers less than 3 cm in maximum diameter, but not for tumours greater than 3 cm (30%). The accuracy of tumour (T) and nodal (N) staging were 64% and 50%, respectively. EUS is a promising method for the early diagnosis and pre-operative staging of pancreatic cancers, but requires further refinement.Sensitivity and specificity of FDG PET-CT scan in detecting lymph node metastasis in operable periampullary tumours in correlation with the final histopathology after curative surgery.18F-Fluorodeoxyglucose-positron emission tomography/computerised tomography (FDG-PET/CT) was investigated for evaluation of periampullary tumours and other gastrointestinal neoplasms. The aim of this study was to evaluate the utility of FDG-PET/CT for detection of lymph node metastasis in periampullary tumours by comparing the preoperative FDG-PET/CT scan finding with postoperative histopathology of lymph nodes. Study was done on 24 patients with diagnosis of periampullary carcinoma either proven or suspected on conventional radiology. Standard uptake value (SUV) were measured for lymph node areas with uptake in FDG-PET/CT and compared with histopathological lymph node status. For detection of lymph node metastasis, FDG-PET/CT with cutoff value SUV max ≥2.0 had a sensitivity of 71.4 % and specificity of 77.8 % and that for SUV max ≥2.5 and 2.8 were 57.1, 42.9 and 77.8, 77.8 %, respectively. The sensitivity and specificity of FDG-PET/CT at each lymph node groups were 72 and 89 % in peripancreatic area, 100 and 93 % in hepatoduodenal area and 100 and 100 % in aortocaval area at SUV max ≥2.0, respectively. At SUV max ≥2.5 the values were 57 and 89 % in peripancreatic area, 100 and 93 % in hepatoduodenal area and 100 and 93 % in aortocaval area. FDG-PET-CT has a possible role in detection of lymph node metastasis in periampullary carcinomas and may be used as a guide for possible lymphadenectomy during surgery and for prognostic purpose.Malignant mediastinal lymphadenopathy detected by staging EUS in patients with pancreaticobiliary cancer.In patients with pancreatic cancer, the presence of malignant mediastinal lymphadenopathy (MML) would preclude definitive resection. A recent study suggested routine evaluation for mediastinal lymph-node metastases in all patients being evaluated for pancreaticobiliary masses. In our practice, we routinely assess for mediastinal lymph-node metastases in all patients undergoing EUS for pancreaticobiliary cancer.We retrospectively evaluated the presence of MML by EUS-guided FNA (EUS-FNA) in 160 consecutive patients with a definite diagnosis of pancreaticobiliary cancer (pancreatic and periampullary cancers) who underwent EUS-FNA by a single operator from 2000 to 2004. Lymph nodes that were round and hypoechoic with sharp margins were considered suspicious and were sampled by FNA.Of the 160 patients included in this study, 78 had peripancreatic lymph nodes (49%: 95% CI[41%, 58%]), 25 had celiac lymph nodes (16%: 95% CI[10%, 22%]), and 14 patients had mediastinal lymph nodes (9%: 95% CI[4%, 13%]) that were suspicious for malignancy by morphologic criteria. In 8 of 14 patients with suspicious mediastinal lymph nodes, FNA documented MML in 5%: 95% CI[2%, 8%]. Only one of these 8 patients with MML had other sites of documented distant metastases by CT and/or positron emission tomography scans. However, 7 of 8 patients had locally advanced cancers.MML is detected by staging EUS-FNA in 5% of patients with pancreaticobiliary cancer. Because of its important implications, endosonographers should routinely assess for MML in patients who undergo staging EUS for pancreaticobiliary malignancy.[Combined conventional magnetic resonance, magnetic resonance angiography, and magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography in the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic carcinoma].This study was aimed to integrating MR CholangioPancreatography (MRCP) and MR Angiography (MRA) to conventional MR images in the diagnosis and resectability assessment of pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Twenty-three consecutive patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma (16 in the head and 7 in the body-tail region) were examined with MR. Conventional MR, 3D MRCP and venous and arterial MRA images were acquired to assess biliary and vascular involvement. Acquisition time never exceeded 40-45 minutes. The images were independently studied by two radiologists and the final reading was decided upon consensus among readers. Sixteen patients underwent surgery.The diagnosis was confirmed at surgery in 16 patients and at percutaneous biopsy in 7. Interreader agreement was considered high, with .83 interobserver variability. Pancreatic adenocarcinoma was found in all patients examined. Unresectability because of vascular involvement was correctly assessed in all patients but 1. Biliary obstruction was demonstrated in 13 patients, involving the biliary and pancreatic ducts in 9 and the biliary ducts only in 4.Technical advances now permit the extensive application of MRI to the study of abdominal conditions. The combination of MRI, MRCP and MRA can provide most of the information needed for the diagnosis and resectability assessment of pancreatic adenocarcinoma, which can otherwise be obtained only performing three different exams.Pancreatic carcinoma: MR assessment of tumor invasion of the peripancreatic vessels.Our goal was to determine the value of MRI in the assessment of vascular invasion in the preoperative staging of pancreatic carcinoma.In 53 consecutive patients with an established diagnosis of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma, SE T1-weighted and breath-hold gradient echo images at 0.5 T were obtained before and after bolus injection of Gd-DTPA. Major peripancreatic vessels were evaluated for the presence of (a) no tumor invasion, (b) contiguity with tumor, and (c) tumor encasement. All patients subsequently underwent surgery. Results of unenhanced and contrast-enhanced MRI studies were compared with the histologic findings in the resected specimens in 34 cases and with the surgical findings in 19 nonresected cases.In six patients, pathologic examination showed the presence of tumor confined to the pancreas with no vascular invasion. With MRI, five of these cases were correctly evaluated; in the remaining case, tumor-vessel contiguity was erroneously diagnosed. In 21 patients, tumor contiguity with adjacent vessels was found at pathologic examination. At MRI, 16 of these cases were correctly assessed, and 5 were understaged as tumors confined to the pancreas. Of the remaining 26 patients, 7 had vascular encasement by tumor at pathologic examination of the resected specimen; the other 19 patients had unresectable tumors encasing the adjacent vessels at surgical evaluation. MRI detected vascular encasement in 21 of these 26 cases; in the other 5, tumor contiguity was incorrectly diagnosed. The overall accuracy of MRI for determining vascular invasion was 79%.MRI is a helpful method for preoperative assessment of vascular involvement due to pancreatic carcinoma.Role of endoscopic ultrasound and magnetic resonance imaging in the preoperative staging of pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) have both been assessed individually as staging modalities for pancreatic cancer. The aim of our study was to assess whether tumor staging by both EUS and MRI in the same cohort of patients could predict resectability and unresectability in patients with pancreatic cancer.A review of 63 patients evaluated preoperatively with both EUS and MRI for pancreatic adenocarcinoma between January 1995 and December 1998 was done. Patients were staged as resectable or unresectable by predefined criteria. Preoperative staging by both modalities was compared to surgical outcome and the sensitivity and predictive values of each modality for determining resectability and unresectability was determined.EUS did not allow for complete T- and N-staging in 10 patients; therefore, for EUS, the final analysis was done on 63 of 73 patients (86%). EUS correctly staged 22 of 36 patients with resectable tumors. The sensitivity of EUS for resectability was 61%, with a positive predictive value of 69%. All 73 patients had complete MRI examinations; therefore, the final analysis was done on all 73 patients. MRI correctly staged 30 of 41 patients with resectable tumors. The sensitivity of MRI for predicting resectability was 73% with a positive predictive value of 77%. MRI and EUS both predicted resectability in 18 patients, of whom 16 (89%) were found to be resectable on surgical exploration. MRI and EUS both predicted unresectability in 17 (27%) patients, of whom 4 (24%) were found to be resectable on surgical exploration. When both MRI and EUS agreed on resectability, the positive predictive value for resectability was 89%. When both MRI and EUS agreed on unresectability, the positive predictive value for unresectability was 76%.Neither MRI nor EUS alone were highly sensitive or predictive of resectability. However, when both tests agreed on resectability, nearly all patients were found to be resectable on surgical exploration.Positron emission tomography/computed tomography influences on the management of resectable pancreatic cancer and its cost-effectiveness.We sought to determine the impact of positron emission tomography/computed tomography (PET/CT) on the management of presumed resectable pancreatic cancer and to assess the cost of this new staging procedure.PET using 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) is increasingly used for the staging of pancreatic cancer, but anatomic information is limited. Integrated PET/CT enables optimal anatomic delineation of PET findings and identification of FDG-negative lesions on computed tomography (CT) images and might improve preoperative staging.Patients with suspected pancreatic cancer who had a PET/CT between June 2001 to April 2004 were entered into a prospective database. Routine staging included abdominal CT, chest x-ray, and CA 19-9 measurement. FDG-PET/CT was conducted according to a standardized protocol, and findings were confirmed by histology. Cost benefit analysis was performed based on charged cost of PET/CT and pancreatic resection and included the time frame of staging and surgery.Fifty-nine patients with a median age of 61 years (range, 40-80 years) were included in this analysis. Fifty-one patients had lesions in the head and 8 in the tail of the pancreas. The positive and negative predictive values for pancreatic cancer were 91% and 64%, respectively. PET/CT detected additional distant metastases in 5 and synchronous rectal cancer in 2 patients. PET/CT findings changed the management in 16% of patients with pancreatic cancer deemed resectable after routine staging (P = 0.031) and was cost saving.PET/CT represents an important staging procedure prior to pancreatic resection for cancer, since it significantly improves patient selection and is cost-effective.Pancreatic adenocarcinoma: combination of MR imaging, MR angiography and MR cholangiopancreatography for the diagnosis and assessment of resectability.The purpose of this study was to determine the possibility of integrating MR cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) and MR angiography (MRA) to conventional MR images in the diagnosis and assessment of resectability of pancreatic adenocarcinoma. Twenty-three patients with pancreatic adenocarcinoma were prospectively examined with MR. Conventional MR images were acquired in all patients. Three-dimensional MRCP and MRA images were acquired in all patients with suspected biliary and vascular involvement. Acquisition time was less than 45 min in all cases. Images were independently evaluated by two radiologists, with final reading decided by consensus among readers. Diagnosis was confirmed with surgery in 16 patients and with percutaneous biopsy in 7. Concordance among readers was high with a kappa value of 0.83. Pancreatic adenocarcinoma was observed in all patients. Correct assessment of unresectability due to vascular involvement was found in 22 of 23 patients. Biliary obstruction was evident in 13 patients, involving the biliary and pancreatic ducts in 9 and the biliary ducts only in 4. Technical advances permit extensive use of MRI in the evaluation of abdominal pathologies. The combination of MR imaging, MRCP, and MRA can provide sufficient information for the diagnosis and assessment of resectability of pancreatic adenocarcinoma, which otherwise would require three different exams.Radial scanning and linear array endosonography for staging pancreatic cancer: a prospective randomized comparison.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is known to be accurate for staging pancreatic cancer. Little data exist to determine if linear array or radial scanning EUS is superior for staging pancreatic cancer. This prospective comparison was undertaken to assess the accuracy of linear array and radial scanning EUS for staging pancreatic cancer.Patients with pancreatic cancer referred for EUS staging were randomized to linear array or radial scanning EUS. Staging accuracy for each was determined by comparison to surgical pathology in those patients going to surgery.Seventy-nine patients with pancreatic cancer were enrolled and 33 had surgical resection. Of these, 17 patients were randomized to linear array and 16 to radial scanning EUS. The remaining 46 patients did not have surgery because of comorbid illness or clinically unresectable disease. EUS staging accuracy for linear array was 94% (16 of 17) for T and 71% (12 of 17) for N staging, whereas radial scanning was 88% (14 of 16) for T and 75% (12 of 16) for N staging. For predicting vascular invasion, radial scanning was 100% accurate (16 of 16) while linear array was 94% (16 of 17) accurate. There was one false-negative assessment of invasion using linear array EUS.Overall, both EUS designs appear equivalent for staging pancreatic cancer and assessing vascular invasion. In view of our findings and the capability for ultrasound-directed fine-needle aspiration with linear array EUS, this instrument may be the preferred choice for evaluating pancreatic masses.Endoscopic ultrasound criteria for vascular invasion in the staging of cancer of the head of the pancreas: a blind reevaluation of videotapes.It has been claimed in several prospective studies that endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) is highly accurate in the locoregional staging of pancreatic cancer. However, the value of the EUS criteria for the diagnosis of vascular involvement is less well established. To totally exclude potential bias introduced by the availability of prior information, a completely blinded analysis of videotapes of patients with cancer of the pancreatic head was therefore conducted.Videotape sequences of 75 patients with cancer of the head of the pancreas with surgical confirmation or unequivocally positive angiography demonstrating vascular invasion were reevaluated without any clinical data or information from other imaging studies. Involvement of the vascular system (portal vein with confluence, superior mesenteric vein, celiac axis) was assessed on EUS with special emphasis on EUS parameters of the tumor-vessel relationship.The overall sensitivity and specificity of EUS in the diagnosis of venous invasion were 43% and 91%, respectively, when using predetermined parameters (visualization of tumor in the lumen, complete obstruction, or collateral vessels). If the parameter "irregular tumor-vessel relationship" had been added to these criteria, the sensitivity would have risen to 62%, but the specificity would have fallen to 79%. The only vascular system that could be properly visualized by EUS was the portal vein/confluence area. The positive and negative predictive values for the single parameters chosen to diagnose portal venous involvement were as follows: 42% and 33% for irregular tumor-vessel relationship, 36% and 34% for visualization of tumor in the vascular lumen, 80% and 28% for complete vascular obstruction, and 88% and 18% for collateral vessels.In a completely blinded evaluation of the EUS diagnosis of vascular invasion by cancer of the head of the pancreas it was not possible to find suitable morphologic parameters with clinically useful sensitivity and specificity values (over 80%).Pancreatic carcinoma: what is the best imaging test?[Comparison of color Doppler ultrasonography and endoscopic ultrasonography for preoperative evaluation of the mesenteric-portal axis in pancreatic lesions].This prospective study was undertaken to evaluate the accuracy of ultrasonography combined with colour Doppler and endoscopic ultrasonography for predicting superior mesenteric and portal vein involvement in pancreatic diseases.The study was prospective. Forty-four patients were included. Ultrasonography with colour Doppler was performed in 30 patients, endoscopic ultrasonography in 43. Prediction of superior mesenteric vein or portal vein involvement was blindly assessed by physicians without knowledge of results of other imaging methods. Resectability or potential resectability (n = 34) and irresectability (n = 10) were assessed in all patients by surgery. Thirty patients underwent a pancreaticoduodenectomy.For endoscopic ultrasonography the sensitivity (0.90), the specificity (0.88), the positive predictive value (0.69) and the negative predictive value (0.97) were better than those observed with ultrasonography and Doppler (050, 0.88, 0.69, 0.97, respectively). The specificity of computed tomography (0.96) was better than that of endoscopic ultrasonography but predictive negative values were similar.Imaging methods to predict superior mesenteric or portal vein involvement in pancreatic diseases are becoming increasingly numerous, complex, and expensive. Endoscopic ultrasonography has a better diagnostic value for correctly predicting resectability than ultrasonography with Doppler. However, for decision making, usefulness of these methods seems to be limited.The value of 18F-FDG positron emission tomography/computed tomography on the pre-operative staging and the management of patients with pancreatic carcinoma.To evaluate the value of FDG-PET/CT on the pre-operative staging of pancreatic cancer and its impact on clinical management.From December 2006 to January 2013, data of pancreatic carcinoma patients who underwent surgical treatment at our center was collected retrospectively. MDCT and FDGPET/CT were used separately to diagnose and stage the tumor. Pre-operation staging by MDCT with chest x-ray and by FDG-PET/CT was compared according to the final pathological staging.A total of 79 histologically proven pancreatic cancer patients were enrolled in this study. FDG-PET/CT was more accurate in the detection of tumor (PET/CT vs. MDCT: 93.67% vs. 88.61%, p=0.402). The SE (60.00% vs. 24.00%, p=0.01) and accuracy (87.81% vs. 76.83%, p=0.015) of PET/CT to detect distant metastasis is significantly higher than those of MDCT. FDG-PET/CT also showed advantage over CT in the detection of metastatic lymph nodes (52.83% vs. 16.98%, p<0.001; accuracy: 66.67% vs. 41.33, p=0.002). The extra staging information PET/CT provided could have skipped eight patients (10.13%) of unnecessary surgical exploration.FDG-PET/CT is an important staging procedure and helps to make the clinical decision for the patients with pancreatic carcinoma.Comparison of linear array endoscopic ultrasound and helical computed tomography for the staging of periampullary malignancies.The purpose of this study was to compare linear array endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and helical computed tomography (CT) scan in the preoperative local staging evaluation of patients with periampullary tumors.Patients evaluated with EUS and CT for suspected periampullary malignancies from 1996 to 2000 were analyzed. Surgical/pathology staging results were the reference standard.Forty-eight patients (28 men and 20 women; mean age, 62 +/- 4.9 years; range, 18-90 years) were identified. Malignancy was histologically confirmed in 44 patients. Parameters evaluated included tumor size, lymph node metastases, and major vascular invasion. EUS was significantly more sensitive (100%), specific (75%), and accurate (98%) than helical CT (68%, 50%, and 67%, respectively) for evaluation of the periampullary mass (P <.05). In addition, EUS detected regional lymph node metastases in more patients than helical CT. Sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of EUS were 61%, 100%, and 84%, in comparison to 33%, 92%, and 68%, respectively, with CT. Major vascular involvement was noted in 9 of 44 patients. EUS correctly identified vascular involvement in 100% compared with 45% with CT (P <.05).Linear array EUS was consistently superior to helical CT in the preoperative local staging of periampullary malignancies.[Prospective evaluation of ultrasonography, multi-slice spiral CT, endoscopic ultrasonography, and magnetic resonance imaging in assessment of TNM staging and assessment of resectability in pancreatic carcinoma].To evaluate prospectively the efficacy and clinical significance of ultrasonography (US), multi-slice spiral CT (MSCT), magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), and endoscopic ultrasonography (EUS) in assessment of the TNM staging and resectability of pancreatic carcinoma.Consecutive 68 patients with pancreatic carcinoma underwent US, MSCT, MRI, and EUS to assess their efficacies in assessment of the size of carcinoma, lymph node metastasis, and distant metastasis. The results of theses imaging techniques were compared with the surgical and pathological findings.EUS was the most precise technique in evaluating the T staging of pancreatic carcinoma with the coefficients of regression of maximum and minimum radii of 1.025 (P=0.043) and 0.987 (P<0.0001). In the assessment of lymph node metastasis, EUS had the highest sensitivity (75.0%), accuracy (87.5%), and negative predictive values (91.7%). Univariate logistic regression showed that EUS was significantly correlated with the surgical findings (OR: 33.00, 95%CI: 7.18-151.77 P<0.0001). Multivariate logistic regression analysis confirmed that EUS had an independent predictive value (OR: 34.50, 95%CI: 6.54-182.09, P<0.0001). MSCT had the highest sensibility (88.9%) in the assessment of distant metastasis and had the highest accuracy (61.8%) in preoperative TNM staging of pancreatic carcinoma. All 4 imaging techniques were correlated with surgical findings in assessment of the resectability. Multivariate logistic regression analysis confirmed that none of the imaging techniques had independent predictive value.MSCT is the best method in preoperative TNM staging of pancreatic carcinoma. EUS is the best methods in the assessment of tumor size and lymph node metastasis. Preoperative assessment of pancreatic carcinoma needs combination of at least two kinds of imaging techniques.Role of EUS in the preoperative staging of pancreatic cancer: a large single-center experience.Current methods for staging pancreatic cancer can be inaccurate, invasive, and expensive. Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is reported to be highly accurate for local staging of gastrointestinal tumors including pancreatic cancer. The aim of this study was to assess the utility of EUS and CT for staging pancreatic cancer by comparing staging accuracies in surgical patients and evaluating the potential impact of EUS staging and training.This was a preoperative comparison of the diagnostic operating characteristics of these procedures in a referral-based academic medical center. Data were collected on 151 consecutive patients referred with confirmed pancreatic cancer between April 1990 and November 1996. All patients had preoperative CT and EUS performed for staging. In patients undergoing surgery, the surgical staging and/or findings were used to confirm EUS and CT staging.Eighty-one (60%) of 151 patients underwent surgery and made up the study subset. In these 81 patients, surgical exploration provided a final T staging in 93% (75 of 81), N staging in 88% (71 of 81) and data on vascular invasion in 93% (75 of 81). In the surgical patient group, with surgical correlation, EUS accuracy for T staging was as follows: T1 92%, T2 85%, T3 93%, and for N staging was: N0 72%, and N1 72%. CT accuracy for T staging was as follows: T1 65%, T2 67%, T3 38%, and for N staging was as follows: N0 52% and N1 100%. CT failed to detect a mass in 26% of patients with a confirmed tumor at surgery. Overall accuracy for T and N staging was 85% and 72% for EUS and 30% and 55% for CT, respectively. The ability to accurately predict vascular invasion was 93% for EUS and 62% for CT (p < 0.001). EUS was 93% accurate for predicting local resectability versus 60% for CT (p < 0.001). Last, the data were divided into two groups for the senior endosonographer's experience: procedures performed between 1990 and 1992 (98 cases) and 1993 and 1994 (53 cases). This analysis revealed that 7 of 9 instances of mis-staging (78%) occurred in the earlier group, during the learning phase for EUS.EUS is more accurate than CT for staging pancreatic malignancies, including predicting vascular invasion and local resectability. EUS staging was significantly better than CT for T1, T2, and T3 tumors. EUS staging accuracy improved after 100 cases, thus suggesting a correlation between the accuracy of EUS staging and the number of procedures performed.EUS, PET, and CT scanning for evaluation of pancreatic adenocarcinoma.Preoperative diagnosis of pancreatic adenocarcinoma can be difficult. Computed tomography (CT) is the standard, noninvasive imaging method for evaluation of suspected pancreatic adenocarcinoma, but it has limited sensitivity for diagnosis, local staging, and metastases. Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) and fluoro-deoxyglucose/positron emission tomography (FDG-PET) are imaging methods that may improve diagnostic accuracy.Thirty-five patients with presumed resectable pancreatic adenocarcinoma were prospectively evaluated with helical CT, EUS, and FDG-PET.Sensitivity for the detection of pancreatic cancer was higher for EUS (93%) and FDG-PET (87%) than for CT (53%). EUS was more sensitive than CT for local vascular invasion of the portal and superior mesenteric veins. EUS diagnosis of vascular invasion was associated with poor outcome after surgery. EUS-guided, fine-needle aspiration allowed tissue diagnosis in 14 of 21 attempts (67%). FDG-PET diagnosed 7 of 9 cases of proven metastatic disease, 4 of which were missed by CT. Two of three metastatic liver lesions suspected by CT were indeterminate for metastases. FDG-PET confirmed metastases.EUS and PET improve diagnostic capability in pancreatic adenocarcinoma. EUS is useful in determining local vascular invasion and obtaining tissue diagnosis. FDG-PET is useful in identifying metastatic disease. Both techniques are more sensitive than helical CT for identification of the primary tumor. (Gastrointest Endosc 2000;52:367-71).The role of endoscopic ultrasound in the preoperative staging of pancreatic malignancies.The role of CT and endoscopic ultrasound in pre-operative staging of pancreatic cancer.The aim of our study was to compare the accuracy of computed tomography and endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) in pre-operative staging of pancreatic cancer.Comparative retrospective study of 86 patients with pancreatic cancer. CT was done in 55 patients, 41 patients were examined by EUS. Each patient underwent surgery and had proven pancreatic cancer by histology. CT and EUS results were correlated to per-operative and histological findings. The main attention was paid to the description of peri-pancreatic lymphadenopathy, para-aortic lymphadenopathy, peri-coeliac lymphadenopathy and tumor relationship to superior mesenteric vein, superior mesenteric artery, portal vein, inferior caval vein and common hepatic artery. A description rate was defined as number of pre-operative findings where the structures and relationships mentioned above were described.The description rates of peri-pancreatic lymph nodes were 11 (20%) at CT and 36 (88.0%) at EUS. Para-aortic lymphadenopathy was described in 9 (16.0%) cases at CT and none at EUS. Peri-coeliac lymphadenopathy was mentioned only one time (2.0%) at CT contrary to 12 (29.0%) at EUS. Relationship of the tumor to the mesenteric vessels was well depicted in nine (16.0%) at CT versus nine (22.0%) at EUS. Portal vein relationship was well described in two (4.0%) at CT and seven (17%) cases at EUS. This description rate in vena cava inferior was one (2%) at CT and three (7.0%) at EUS, in hepatic artery it was one (2%) at CT and six (15%) at EUS. In the group of CT, resectability or non-resectability were well predicted in 33 (60%) patients and wrong predicted in 22 (40%) patients. In the group of EUS, resectability or non-resectability were well predicted in 34 (83%) patients and wrong predicted in 7 (17%) patients.According to our study, EUS is more accurate in prediction of local PC resectability than CT.Pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma: preoperative assessment with helical CT versus dynamic MR imaging.To compare helical computed tomography (CT) and dynamic, magnetic resonance (MR) imaging in the evaluation of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinoma.Dynamic MR images obtained with breath holding, 256 phase- and 512 frequency-encoding steps, 5-mm section thickness, phased-array multicoil, and double-dose gadolinium were available from 21 patients. Dynamic MR images were retrospectively compared with helical CT images in the evaluation of tumor detection, local tumor extension, and vascular involvement.Tumors were detected on dynamic MR images of 19 of 21 (90%) patients and on helical CT scans of 16 (76%) patients. Dynamic MR imaging had equal or better sensitivity, accuracy, and agreement of tumor grade than did helical CT in the comparison of imaging findings and histopathologic findings. Dynamic MR imaging also had equal or better specificity than had helical CT in determination of local tumor extension and vascular involvement, except in the factors of duodenal invasion and portal venous system involvement. However, there was no statistically significant difference among any of these measurements.Dynamic MR imaging may be better than helical CT in the preoperative detection and evaluation of local tumor extension and of vascular involvement of pancreatic ductal adenocarcinomas.Prospective evaluation of EUS versus CT scan for staging of ampullary cancer.Malignancies of the biliary and pancreatic systems are associated with a poor prognosis. However, ampullary cancer carries a better prognosis and is often diagnosed when curative treatment is still possible. Accurate staging is important for the determination of the most appropriate treatment option.(1) To determine the test performance characteristics of EUS and CT in loco-regional staging of ampullary neoplasms, and (2) to determine the impact of CT scan results on the test performance characteristics of EUS.Prospective single-arm intervention study performed in 2 academic hospitals. RESULTS AND MAIN OUTCOME MEASUREMENTS: Thirty-seven patients were screened and 33 staged with EUS and CT. A total of 27 patients (13 men; mean age, 69.5 years; mean serum bilirubin level, 12.6 mg/dL) with locally advanced disease completed the protocol with EUS and CT and underwent surgical resection. Tumor classifications were as follows: 2 patients (7.4%), T1 tumors; 13 patients (48.1%), T2 tumors; and 12 patients (44.4%), T3 tumors, as per surgical pathology. Seventeen tumors (62.9%) were classified as N0 and 10 (37.1%) as N1. The difference in proportion of correct tumor (74.1% vs 51.8%; P = .15, 95% CI, -0.06-0.50) and lymph node (81.4% vs 55.5%; P = .07, 95% CI, -0.01-0.53) staging by EUS and CT, respectively, was not statistically significantly different. However, the strength of tumor (kappa 0.51 vs 0.11) and nodal (kappa 0.59 vs 0.05) agreement with pathology was statistically significantly higher for EUS than for CT (P < .05). EUS was more sensitive and specific than CT for tumor and nodal staging, and the association of CT to EUS data did not improve the final test accuracy.Low number of T1 tumors.EUS is an accurate diagnostic test and exhibits a high level of agreement with surgical pathology. CT findings do not improve the test performance characteristics of EUS. Therefore, the evaluation for metastatic disease should not be compromised by CT protocols that aim to perform tumor and nodal staging. Further studies to determine the role of specialized CT protocols in patients with ampullary malignancies are needed.Is peritoneal cytology a predictor of unresectability in pancreatic carcinoma?Demonstration of unresectability often requires diagnostic laparotomy with high co-morbidity in pancreatic carcinoma. The value of detected peritoneal tumor cells and influence on outcome should be determined.In a prospective study 150 consecutive patients with pancreatic carcinoma were evaluated. Improvement of diagnostic accuracy in diagnosing unresectability was calculated for combination of CT, endoscopic ultrasonography and peritoneal cytology.Unexpected subglissonian metastases were found in 10%. 87 patients with peritoneal washings were included in the study, 20 patients with detected peritoneal tumor cells (n=22) were inoperable. In all patients of this group the ventral integrity of pancreas was damaged. In 23 patients with preoperative existent ascites, only in 4 cases could peritoneal tumor cells be detected. In patients with positive cytology together with disrupted ventral pancreatic margin as predictors of unresectability, sensitivity was 100% and specificity 96%.Addition of diagnostic laparoscopy combined with peritoneal cytology and minimally invasive palliation procedures (endoscopic biliary prosthesis, laparoscopic gastrojejunostomy) to the staging-protocol for pancreatic carcinoma may decrease operative lethality and unnecessary laparotomies may be avoided safely. As unexpected subglissonian micrometastases may additionally be present in 5-10%, perioperative laparoscopy is always advisable.[Endosonography in the T-staging of pancreatic cancer].Pancreatic cancer is the sixth among all oncologic diseases and takes the 4th place on cancer mortality in the world. Pancreatic cancer has poor prognosis. Survival for the 5 years after diagnosis is less than 5%. The objective was the evaluation of endosonography diagnostic significance in identification of tumor vascular invasion and tumor resectability. The treatment results of 82 patients with pancreas adenocarcinoma, technique of endosonography, the types of echo-endoscopes and ultrasonic criteria of vascular invasion are presented in the article. Tumor invasion was suspected in 48 patients (58.5%) during endosonography. Tumor invasion into the blood vessels of the upper abdomen was observed in 51 patients (62.2%). Endosonography sensitivity for detection of tumor invasion was 90.2%, specificity - 93.5%, accuracy - 91.5%. In view of modern criteria of pancreatic cancer resectability endosonography is leading method for selection of patients for surgical treatment. Magnetic resonance imaging with magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography accurately predicts resectability of pancreatic carcinoma.Accurate preoperative staging of pancreatic malignancy aids in directing appropriate therapy and avoids unnecessary invasive procedures. We evaluated the accuracy of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) with magnetic resonance cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) in determining resectability of pancreatic malignancy. Twenty-one patients with suspected pancreatic malignancy underwent dynamic, contrast-enhanced breath-hold MRI with MRCP prior to surgical evaluation. Results of this study were correlated with operative results and pathologic findings. The sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of MRI with MRCP in detecting a mass, determining the nature of the mass, and predicting lymph node involvement and resectability were determined. MRI with MRCP correctly identified the presence of a pancreatic mass in all 21 of these patients. Following pathologic correlation, it was determined that MRI with MRCP was 81% accurate in determining the benign or malignant nature of the pancreatic mass and 43% accurate in predicting lymph node involvement. In predicting resectability, MRI with MRCP had a sensitivity of 100%, specificity of 83%, positive predictive value of 94%, negative predictive value of 100%, and accuracy of 95%. MRI with MRCP is an accurate, noninvasive technique in the preoperative evaluation of pancreatic malignancy. Information obtained from MRI with MRCP including identification of a mass and predicting tumor resectability may be of value in staging and avoiding unnecessary invasive diagnostic procedures in patients with pancreatic cancer.A prospective evaluation of an algorithm incorporating routine preoperative endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration in suspected pancreatic cancer.Whether tissue diagnosis is required in the preoperative evaluation of patients with suspected pancreatic cancer remains controversial. We prospectively evaluated the accuracy, safety, and potential impact on surgical intervention of endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration (EUS-FNA) in the preoperative evaluation of suspected pancreatic cancer.All patients who underwent EUS-FNA at our institution (n = 547) over a 4.5-year period were enrolled. Patients underwent surgical exploration and resection based on their comorbidity status, evidence of resectability based on spiral computed tomography (CT) and EUS imaging reviewed in a multidisciplinary approach.Of 547 patients enrolled (median age 64 years, 60% male), 49% presented with obstructive jaundice. The operating characteristics of EUS-FNA of solid pancreatic masses were: sensitivity 95% (95% CI: 93.2-95.4), specificity 92% (95% CI: 86.6-95.7), positive predictive value 98% (95% CI: 97-99), negative predictive value 80% (95% CI: 74.9-82.7). The overall accuracy of EUS-FNA was 94.1% (95% CI: 92.0-94). Of the 414 true positive patients by EUS-FNA, 138 (33%) were explored. Of patients deemed operable by combined imaging, 42% had surgical resection. Eighty-two percent of true positive patients were ultimately found inoperable and received palliative therapy or chemotherapy. Of the 94 patients with true negative cytology based on extended follow-up, only 7 (7%) underwent surgical resection. Of those with false negative diagnoses (n = 24), 5 patients underwent exploration/resection based on detection of mass lesions by EUS. The remaining patients had unresectable disease. Mild self-limiting pancreatitis occurred in (0.91%).EUS-FNA is a safe and highly accurate method for tissue diagnosis in suspected pancreatic cancer. This approach allows for preoperative counseling of patients, minimizing surgeon's operative time in cases of unresectable disease, and avoids surgical biopsies in the majority of patients with inoperable disease. In addition, it allows for conservative management of patients with benign biopsies. We still, however, recommend exploration of patients with clinical scenario suspicious for pancreatic cancer, a mass found on EUS or CT, but inconclusive or negative cytology.Detection of liver metastases from pancreatic cancer using FDG PET.We evaluated the potential of the glucose analog [18F]fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) as a PET tracer for the hepatic staging in 168 patients designated for resective pancreatic surgery.Metastatic liver disease was confirmed or excluded during surgery or with CT follow-up for at least 6 mo. Proven metastases were then retrospectively identified on preoperative CT (gold standard). Hepatic PET scans of all patients were interpreted blindly. Any focal FDG uptake was considered malignant. Both proven hepatic metastases and suspicious hepatic PET lesions were then compared, lesion by lesion, with CT. Standardized uptake values (SUV) and tumor-to-liver ratios (T/L) were determined for the most intense lesion of each patient.Sensitivity of FDG PET was 68% (15 of 22 patients). The lesion detection rate was 97% (28 of 29 metastases) for lesions >1 cm and 43% (16 of 37 metastases) for lesions < or = 1 cm. Specificity was 95% (138 of 146 patients). Six of eight patients with false-positive results had marked intrahepatic cholestasis (versus 3 of 15 patients with true-positive lesions), one had an infrahepatic abscess and one had a right basal pulmonary metastasis. The SUV and T/L were 4.6+/-1.4 and 2.3+/-1.1, respectively, for malignant lesions and 4.1+/-1.5 and 1.9+/-0.3, respectively, for false-positive lesions and therefore are of limited value.FDG PET provides reliable hepatic staging for lesions >1 cm. False-positive results are associated with the presence of marked intrahepatic cholestasis. For lesions < or = 1 cm, FDG PET can define malignancy in 43% of suspicious CT lesions in the absence of dilated bile ducts.Optimal interpretation of FDG PET in the diagnosis, staging and management of pancreatic carcinoma.This study had two purposes: to optimize the semiquantitative interpretation of 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose (FDG) PET scans in the diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma by analyzing different cutoff levels for the standardized uptake value (SUV), with and without correction for serum glucose level (SUV(gluc)); and to evaluate the usefulness of FDG PET when used in addition to CT for the staging and management of patients with pancreatic cancer.Sixty-five patients who presented with suspected pancreatic carcinoma underwent whole-body FDG PET in addition to CT imaging. The PET images were analyzed visually and semiquantitatively using the SUV and SUV(gluc). The final diagnosis was obtained by pathologic (n = 56) or clinical and radiologic follow-up (n = 9). The performance of CT and PET at different cutoff levels of SUV was determined, and the impact of FDG PET in addition to CT on patient management was reviewed retrospectively.Fifty-two patients had proven pancreatic carcinoma, whereas 13 had benign lesions, including chronic pancreatitis (n = 10), benign biliary stricture (n = 1), pancreatic complex cyst (n = 1) and no pancreatic pathology (n = 1). Areas under receiver operating characteristic curves were not significantly different for SUV and SUV(gluc). Using a cutoff level of 3.0 for the SUV, FDG PET had higher sensitivity and specificity than CT in correctly diagnosing pancreatic carcinoma (92% and 85% versus 65% and 61%). There were 2 false-positive PET (chronic pancreatitis, also false-positive with CT) and 4 false-negative PET (all with true-positive CT, abnormal but nondiagnostic) examinations. There were 5 false-positive CT (4 chronic pancreatitis and 1 pancreatic cyst) and 18 false-negative CT (all with true-positive FDG PET scans) examinations. FDG PET clarified indeterminate hepatic lesions or identified additional distant metastases (or both) in 7 patients compared with CT. Overall, FDG PET altered the management of 28 of 65 patients (43%).FDG PET is more accurate than CT in the detection of primary tumors and in the clarification and identification of hepatic and distant metastases. The optimal cutoff value of FDG uptake to differentiate benign from malignant pancreatic lesions was 2.0. Correction for serum glucose did not significantly improve the accuracy of FDG PET. Although FDG PET cannot replace CT in defining local tumor extension, the application of FDG PET in addition to CT alters the management in up to 43% of patients with suspected pancreatic cancer.Preoperative staging of cancer of the pancreas: value of MR angiography versus conventional angiography in detecting portal venous invasion.The purpose of this study was to compare contrast-enhanced MR angiography with conventional catheter angiography for detecting portal venous invasion in the preoperative staging of pancreatic cancer, using the surgical confirmation of vascular involvement as the standard of truth.MR and conventional angiography were performed in 20 patients with pancreatic carcinoma, with surgical confirmation in all cases. MR angiography was performed at 1.5 T, with coronal (2.9 mm) and axial (6.0 mm) contrast-enhanced breath-hold two-dimensional time-of-flight imaging. Data from each imaging technique were collected prospectively and analyzed in a blinded fashion by expert vascular radiologists. Vascular involvement in each patient and in each vessel (main portal vein, confluence, splenic vein, and superior mesenteric vein) determined whether the tumor was resectable (normal, abutment) or nonresectable (encased, occluded). Surgical confirmation of the vascular involvement of the portal venous structures was used as the standard of truth in all patients.Among the 20 patients, 11 tumors were surgically resectable and seven were nonresectable with performance of a palliative bypass. MR angiography and conventional angiography had an overall concordance in 65% of patients (13/20; seven resectable, four nonresectable, two false-negatives) on the basis of the vascular status in each patient of the portal venous structures and in 84% (47/56) of the individual vessels surgically confirmed. MR angiography correctly identified 11 of 11 resectable patients and five of nine nonresectable patients, with four false-negative cases. Conventional angiography correctly identified seven of 11 resectable patients and six of nine nonresectable patients, with three false-negative cases and four false-positive cases.The lack of false-positives by MR angiography suggests that MR imaging may provide a noninvasive screen for nonresectability on the basis of vascular involvement, with no patients with potentially resectable tumors being denied surgery by MR angiography in this cohort. However, the presence of false-negatives using MR angiography indicates the procedure would still not fully eliminate unnecessary laparotomies.Pancreatic adenocarcinoma: CT versus MR imaging in the evaluation of resectability--report of the Radiology Diagnostic Oncology Group.To compare findings with computed tomography (CT) and magnetic resonance (MR) imaging in pancreatic adenocarcinoma and to determine optimal pulse sequences for MR imaging.CT scans and MR images were compared of 189 adult patients with known or suspected adenocarcinoma of the pancreas. Levels of confidence were correlated with surgical and pathologic results.The accuracy of CT was 0.73 and of MR imaging was 0.70. The negative predictive value of CT was 0.28 and of MR imaging was 0.23. The positive predictive value of CT was 0.89 and of MR imaging was 0.88. Gradient-echo and T1-weighted spin-echo sequences ranked equally in evaluation of vascular invasion, T1-weighted spin-echo sequences were preferred for assessing lymphadenopathy, and T2-weighted spin-echo sequences were preferred for detecting hepatic metastases.Cross-sectional imaging modalities are useful in the identification of unresectable pancreatic carcinoma. CT is recommended for initial imaging assessment.Pancreatic cancer staging. Endoscopic ultrasonography criteria for vascular invasion.Endoscopic ultrasound (EUS) is the most sensitive imaging test available for examining the pancreas and associated structures. Small (< 2 cm) pancreatic malignancies can be detected with accuracy rates of more than 90%. Several EUS criteria have been proposed for their ability to diagnose malignant venous invasion. Although obstruction of a mesenteric vein and the resulting venous collaterals is a specific sign of unresectability, it is a rather insensitive parameter. As an alternative, signs of venous wall invasion, such as "irregular wall" have been proposed as being sensitive (67%-100%) and specific (100%) for malignant invasion of mesenteric veins. EUS appears to be particularly sensitive for detecting invasion of the portal and splenic veins. In contrast, the superior mesentera veins are more difficult to image with EUS and the results of staging of pancreatic masses demonstrate poor sensitivity (12%-17%) for detecting vascular invasion of the superior mesenteric vein.Detection of pancreatic carcinoma and liver metastases with gadoxetic acid-enhanced MR imaging: comparison with contrast-enhanced multi-detector row CT.To intraindividually compare gadoxetic acid-enhanced magnetic resonance (MR) imaging with contrast material-enhanced multi-detector row computed tomography (CT) in detection of pancreatic carcinoma and liver metastases.The ethics committee approved this retrospective study with waiver of informed consent. This study included 100 patients (53 men, 47 women; mean age, 67.8 years) consisting of 54 patients with pathologically confirmed pancreatic carcinoma (mean size, 33 mm) and 46 without a pancreatic lesion. Sixty-two liver metastases (mean size, 10 mm) in 15 patients with pancreatic carcinoma were diagnosed at pathologic examination or multimodality assessment. Three readers blinded to the final diagnosis interpreted all MR (precontrast T1- and T2-weighted and gadoxetic acid-enhanced dynamic and hepatocyte phase MR images) and tetraphasic dynamic contrast-enhanced CT images and graded the presence (or absence) of pancreatic carcinoma and liver metastasis on patient-by-patient and lesion-by-lesion bases. Receiver operating characteristic analysis, McNemar test, and Fisher test were performed to compare the diagnostic performance of CT and MR imaging.No significant differences were observed between CT and MR images in depiction of pancreatic carcinoma. However, MR imaging had greater sensitivity in depicting liver metastasis than did CT for two of the three readers in the MR imaging-versus-CT analysis (85% vs 69%, P = .046) and for all three readers in the lesion-by-lesion analysis (92%-94% vs 74%-76%, P = .030-.044).Gadoxetic acid-enhanced MR imaging was equivalent to dynamic contrast-enhanced CT in depicting pancreatic carcinoma and had better sensitivity for depicting liver metastases, suggesting the usefulness of gadoxetic acid-enhanced MR imaging for evaluation of patients with pancreatic carcinoma.Endoscopic ultrasonography in diagnosis and staging of pancreatic and biliary tumors.Preoperative evaluation of pancreaticobiliary tumor using MR multi-imaging techniques.To evaluate the clinical value of MR multi-imaging techniques in diagnosing and preoperative assessment of pancreaticobiliary tumor.MR multi-imaging techniques, including MR cross-sectional imaging, MR cholangiopancreatography (MRCP) and 3D dynamic contrast-enhanced MR angiography (3D DCE MRA), were performed to make prospective diagnosis and preoperative evaluation in 28 patients with suspected pancreaticobiliary tumors. There were 17 cases of pancreatic adenocarcinoma, 8 cases of biliary system carcinoma and 3 cases of non-neoplastic lesions.Using MR multi-imaging techniques, the accuracy in diagnosing the patients with pancreaticobiliary tumors was 89.3% (25/28). The accuracy in detecting the range of tumor invasion was 80.3% (57/71). The sensitivity, specificity, accuracy, positive and negative predictive value of MR multi-imaging techniques in preoperative assessment of the resectability of pancreaticobiliary tumor were 83.3%, 89.5%, 88.0%, 71.4%, and 94.4%, respectively. There was well diagnostic consistency between MR multi-imaging techniques and CT (kappa = 0.64, P<0.01). The fusion image could be made from MRCP and 3D DCE MRA images.MR multi-imaging techniques can integrate the advantages of various MR images. The non-invasive "all-in-one" MR imaging protocol is the efficient method in diagnosing, staging and preoperative assessment of pancreaticobiliary tumor.[The value of 3-phase spiral CT and magnetic resonance tomography in preoperative diagnosis of pancreatic carcinoma].The purpose of this study was to assess the role of spiral computed tomography (SCT) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in the preoperative work-up of patients with pancreatic carcinoma, regarding local resectability and vascular involvement.A total of 28 patients (19 men and 9 women; mean age 58 years) with known or highly suspected carcinoma of the pancreas were included in this study. All patients prospectively underwent MRI ( +/- gadolinium-DTPA ) and SCT (3-phase examination) as preoperative diagnostic imaging studies, and laparotomy was carried out within 7 days, irrespective of the MRI or SCT findings. SCT and MR studies were reviewed independently by two radiologists, without knowing the results of the surgical exploration. Standardized image analysis was correlated with findings at laparatomy.Laparotomy identified 10 patients to be suitable for surgical resection and 18 pancreatic carcinomas to be unresectable. In 17 of 18 non-resectable carcinomas MRI and SCT were able to obtain correct information about unresectability (sensitivity 94%), in 7 (MRI), resp. 8 (SCT) carcinomas were correctly considered to be resectable (sensitivity 70% of MRI and 80% for SCT). The presence of vascular involvement was depicted by SCT with a sensitivity of 82-100% and 62-100% by MRI. The specificity varied between 85-100% for SCT and 77-100% for MRI.Both MRI and SCT are good techniques for the preoperative work-up of pancreatic carcinomas in order to obtain a correct assessment of local resectability.Pancreatic adenocarcinoma: assessment of vascular invasion with high-field MR imaging and a phased-array coil.We performed this study to determine the value of MR imaging for assessing vascular invasion in preoperative staging of pancreatic carcinoma.In 73 consecutive patients with an established diagnosis of pancreatic duct adenocarcinoma, spin-echo T1-weighted and breath-hold multiplanar gradient-recalled (MPGR) images were obtained at 1.5 T with a phased-array coil before and after bolus injection of gadopentetate dimeglumine. Major peripancreatic vessels were evaluated for contiguity with tumor and tumor encasement. All patients subsequently underwent surgery. Results of unenhanced and enhanced MR imaging studies were compared with the histologic findings in the resected specimens of 49 tumors and with the surgical findings of 24 nonresected tumors.In 39 patients, tumor contiguity with adjacent vessels was found at pathologic examination. Of the remaining 34 patients, 10 had vascular encasement by tumor seen on pathologic examination of the resected specimen; the other 24 had unresectable tumors encasing adjacent vessels at surgical evaluation. In the assessment of vascular tumor contiguity, the accuracy was 85% for unenhanced spin-echo T1-weighted imaging, 87% for enhanced spin-echo T1-weighted imaging, 67% for unenhanced MPGR imaging, and 69% for enhanced MPGR imaging. In the assessment of vascular tumor encasement, the accuracy was 91% for unenhanced spin-echo T1-weighted imaging, 94% for enhanced spin-echo T1-weighted imaging, 74% for unenhanced MPGR imaging, and 76% for enhanced MPGR imaging.MR imaging is helpful for preoperative assessment of vascular involvement caused by pancreatic carcinoma. For this purpose, unenhanced and enhanced spin-echo T1-weighted images seem to be more accurate than images obtained with other pulse sequences.Impact of endoscopic ultrasound on the management and outcome of pancreatic carcinoma.Although endoscopic ultrasound and endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration have been shown to aid in the diagnosis and staging of pancreatic carcinoma, whether the general use of these new techniques impacts the overall management and survival of pancreatic cancer, is less clear.Clinical data on all patients diagnosed with pancreatic carcinoma were assessed for two equal time periods during which computerized tomography-guided fine needle aspiration and biopsy was used (1/93-5/95) and then during which endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration was used (8/95-12/97) for the primary diagnosis of these patients.Comparative data for the computerized tomography era versus the endosonography era showed that 1) pancreatic carcinomas diagnosed: 52 versus 84 patients (stage I-III at diagnosis: 33% vs 54%; p < 0.05); 2) diagnosis by aspiration or biopsy of a pancreatic mass, nodes, liver metastasis, or by operation: 46%, 0%, 19%, 29% versus 52%, 8% (p = 0.02 nodes plus pancreatic masses), 20%, 7% (p = 0.002); 3) pancreatic resections: 13% versus 14%; 4) median survival without liver metastases: 102 versus 205 days (p < 0.02, log-rank test). Endoscopic ultrasound detected carcinomas that were either not seen or only possibly seen by computed tomography in 34%.More patients (62%) were diagnosed with pancreatic carcinoma when using endoscopic ultrasound and 75% fewer required operations for diagnosis. The 3-month improvement in median survival is probably multifactorial but most likely represents lead bias because of the greater sensitivity of endoscopic ultrasound for pancreatic carcinoma. Using endoscopic ultrasound with endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration in patients with pancreatic carcinoma significantly affects their management and outcomes.